You don't practice until you get it right. 
You practice until you can't get it wrong.
 -- Jason Elam, All-Pro kicker, Denver Broncos


This is the toughest job you love to hate.
 -- Overnight, about the markets


You don’t trade the markets, you trade your beliefs about the markets; and if
your beliefs are not useful, you’re in big trouble as a trader.
 -- Van Tharp


To succeed in life requires a total inability to do anything that makes you
uncomfortable when you look at yourself in the mirror.
 -- Nassim Nicholas Taleb


El valiente vive mientras el cobarde quiere.


The greatest shortcoming of the human race is our inability to understand the
exponential function.
 -- Professor Albert Bartlett


  hey ADF, once in a while do u ever get on tilt a bit when trading. Does some
  confluence of events and losses make u attempt to get your account back to the
  high water mark in one frantic day. Kind of a manic state? I still get that- so
  scary
   -- PugPlunger

Of course I go on tilt. Why do u think I have all these systems, track all this
data, & have all these risk management rules, even though they suck the
excitement and fun out of trading?  it is to protect me from MYSELF. The human
brain is NOT wired for trading. period.

The brain wants to take profits quickly & let losers run. Which is the EXACT
opposite of profitable trading. Thats why ppl bank over & over again, but
eventually give it all back. Then 2yrs later they realize they have a 70-90%
winrate yet are barely at breakeven, if not negative

U'll never break free frm that cycle until u realize that ur brain is the enemy.
And the ONLY way to counter ur primal impulses is to systematize ur trading.
SPECIFIC entry rules, SPECIFIC exit rules, SPECIFIC stock selection rules. none
of that freestyling shit.
 -- AllDayFaders, via Twitter



You're neither right nor wrong because other people agree with you. You're right
because your facts are right and your reasoning is right - that's the only thing
that makes you right.
 -- Warren Buffett


First central assumption: the flips are independent of one another.
The coin has no memory. The fact that you got heads or tails in the previous
toss does not change the odds or your getting heads or tails on the next one.
You do not become a "better" coin flipper over time. Introduce memory, or
skills in flipping, and the entire Gaussian business becomes shaky.
Second central assumption: no "wild" jump. The step size in the
building block of the basic random walk is always known, namely one step
here. There is no uncertainty as to the size of the step. We did not
encounter situations in which the move varied wildly.
Remember that if either of these central two assumptions is not met,
your moves +1 and -1 (your coin tosses) will not cumulatively lead to the
bell curve. Depending on what happens, they can lead to the wild
Mandelbrotian-style scale-invariant randomness.
 -- NN Taleb, "The Black Swan"


Bro I fucking lovethis  !!! everybody please tattoo this to the back of your fat
ass neck !! I say this time and time again, GET RID of that "gotta close green
today" mindset. it has buried more traders than I can count. The moment I take a
trade I think "welp, time to get raped"

    Accept today as a losing day before you even start. That way you you dont have
    pressure to find winners. Look for best setups and if you end up with anything
    better its a win
     -- Mike Katz
 -- AllDayFaders, via Twitter



Every time I see a single variable linear determination drawn in an extremely
complex multivariable environment, a small piece of whatever little respect I
have left for humanity dissipates into the black void of nothingness.
 -- Wheezooo, on ET


Enthusiasm is common. Endurance is rare.
 -- Angela Duckworth, "Grit"


I get this DM SO damn much. "ADF how do I cut through all the noise & find
consistency"

FOCUS on ONE thing!

Find a strategy/setup that is:
1 simple
2 common
3 DEFINABLE
4 winrate >50%
5 RR >3:1

then IMMERSE urself in it until u MASTER it. Burn everything else
 -- AllDayFaders, via Twitter



2 trades a day, a 50%+ winrate, a 3:1 RR & a max loss of $50 will turn ur $2K
acct into $4K in just a month (no fees). ALL u need is a 50% winrate & the
discipline to keep ur RR at 3:1 or higher. Easier said than done but u get the
point. Focus on RR optimization
 -- AllDayFaders, via Twitter


Across all market conditions, trading styles, time frames & traders, one rule
holds true: 5-10% of all trades account for 90% of profits. Awareness of the
90/10 rule provides you with an opportunity to focus on those trades that, if
they work, will produce material profits, while if they don't, won't cripple
you from a capital-preservation perspective.
 -- Ken Grant, risk manager for Paul Tudor Jones


Good trading is built around "if/then" statements.
Bad trading is built around "I think" statements.
What you think simply does not matter. The market doesn't care.
 -- @KK_Quant, via Twitter


Every once in a while go to cash, take a break. Don't try to play the market all
the time. Too tough on the emotions.
 -- Jesse Livermore


Salary is nothing but the monthly subscription paid by the employer for retaining
your services. They can unsubscribe from you anytime. You can also decide to
cease providing the service.
 -- dmuthuk, via Twitter


True wealth consists of:

Worriless sleeping
Clear conscience
Reciprocal gratitude
Absence of envy
Good appetite
Muscle strength
Physical energy
Frequent laughs
No meals alone
Some physical labor
No meeting rooms
Periodic surprises
 -- N. N. Taleb


I don't call lack of knowing the future a "mistake".
 -- Bill Buchanan


Am I only one that recognizes that volatility has increased, and what worked a
couple years ago is now all gone, zero, shit, worthless? And it all started on
Jerome Powell's first day as Fed Chairman. Does nobody remember this day?

Powell made history by simply assuming his new job. 

https://money.cnn.com/2018/02/05/investing/stock-market-today-dow-jones/index.html
 -- Overnight, on ET


Variance risk premium (VRP) is *massively* overpriced in indexes;
less so for single names.
 -- Leonardo Valencia (leov)


If you're buying options, the Golden Rule is to buy cheap gamma and
sell expensive gamma. Focus on NEAR-TERM options and OTM strikes
(which have cheap gamma that will turn expensive if the expected
move happens.)
 -- Leonardo Valencia (leov)


Volatility is simply standard deviation of the log returns scaled to
represent an annual percentage.
 -- Leonardo Valencia (leov)


When buying options (especially on weeklies) u ALWAYS ALWAYS wanna buy calls
into weakness & puts into strength (w/some exceptions). Especially on a stock
like $BYND. If u chase short on weakness, 1 tiny pullback (which is inevitable)
will WRECK ur premiums #BearTipOfTheDay
 -- alldayfaders on Twitter


Options make volatility a tradable attribute, and many treat it as a
unique asset class in its own right. Those that trade options in combination
with the underlying asset or other options engage in an investment strategy
known as *volatility arbitrage*.
 -- "The Options Edge", M.C. Khow & M.W. Guthner


You can never "fix" someone else's mindset if they are not *receptive* to it.
People can only truly change if they themselves want to change.
This is why you should not try to "fix" or "save" anyone.
It won't work, your time will be wasted, and it will probably backfire.
 -- LifeMathMoney, via Twitter


My top 10 are $TSLA $NFLX $BA $ROKU $NVDA $TWLO $SHOP $BYND $AMD $BABA

1 find 20 HV largecaps
2 remove the ones w shitty volume
3 remove the ones w shitty range
4 u shuld be left w about 10 names
5 for direction, LCs are 80% $SPY 20% technicals (pivots, MAs etc)

Once you have your top 10, create a top 3-5 out of the top 10. u'll trade those
almost every day. With good risk management (all i fucking preach about) & a
>3:1 RR ratio all u need is a 50% win rate to be profitable. So ignore winrate.
Focus on risk management #BearTipOfTheDay
 -- alldayfaders on Twitter



During the 10 years I traded for George Soros, I never heard him speak about a
winning trade. To hear him talk, you'd think he had nothing but losers.
Conversely, listening to the biggest losers, you’d think they had nothing but
winners.
 -- Victor Niederhoffer


Three main rules of trading:
Stay small;
Be committed to liquidity and indifferent to the underlying;
Manage trades aggressively.
 -- Tom Sosnoff


When making a personal finance decision, ask yourself the following:

How will this help me get closer to my ideal life?
What is the range of outcomes here? What's the best case and worst case scenario?
At what point will I change course? What would have to happen for me to change from this decision down the road?
What are my other options?
Who could this impact, and what do they think about the decision?


"My daddy used to tell me not to chew on something that was eatin you."
 -- Cormac McCarthy, "All the Pretty Horses"


"A goodlookin horse is like a goodlookin woman, he said. They're always more
trouble than what they're worth. What a man needs is just one that will get the
job done." 
 -- Cormac McCarthy, "All the Pretty Horses"


IV follows option prices - which rise when markets decline and fall when markets rally.
It expands when stock price goes down, and collapses when stock price goes up.


Truth is not what you want it to be; it is what it is, and you must bend to its
power or live a lie.
 -- Miyamoto Musashi


What's important is not how long you live but whether you live a meaningful
life. This doesn’t mean accumulating money and fame, but being of service to
your fellow human beings. It means helping others if you can, but if you can’t
do that, at least don't harm them.
 -- Dalai Lama


Going after a dream has a price. It may mean abandoning our habits, it may make
us go through hardships, or it may lead us to disappointment.
But however costly, it's never as high as the price paid by people who live in
their comfort zone.
 -- Paul Coelho


Best trading rules:
1. Trade to trade well, not to make $
2. Fiercely protect capital
3. Act immediately without hesitation on qualified setups
4. Only thing worse than being wrong is staying wrong
5. If confused, see rule #2


At age 11, in 1942 Warren Buffett had a total savings of $115. If invested in
S&P 500, the value now would be $606,811. If invested in gold, the value now
would be $4200. Gold has delivered only 1% of what the index has delivered.
Better to own businesses than gold.
 -- @dmuthuk, on Twitter


It takes courage to be yourself, to leave the crowd, to defy your tribe, to
express thoughts contrary to the political group you typically support. If I
start with the notion of human equality between groups, some will praise me if I
apply it to race ("well, of course racial groups are equal in worth or
capacity”) but criticize me if I apply it to gender ("what do you mean men don't
run the world, and haven't crushed women throughout history? Sexist!") and
suggest that your tribe's political opponents are not monsters, but frightened
people capable of monstrous things (as are we all, when frightened and angry)
and you catch shit THERE.

It's all good. I don't need agreement or support as much as I need a sense of my
own integrity. When I die, I'm going in the box by myself, and what you think of
me will have zero to do with it.
 -- Steve Barnes


Whenever I have lost money in the stock market I have always considered that I
have learned something; that if I have lost money I have gained experience, so
that the money really went for a tuition fee. A man has to have experience and
he has to pay for it.
 -- Jesse Livermore


Trading will teach you about yourself. You will KNOW your strengths and weaknesses.
You can't trade well without managing fear, greed, ego, and risk. Trading makes you a better person.
Trading is a good measure of your abilities. It is competitive, but happens on an even playing field.
Nothing else offers personal control over your financial freedom like trading.

Quitters give up when they are tired and frustrated. Winners don't quit until after they have won.


Investment psychology is by far the more important element, followed by risk
control, with the least important consideration being the question of where you
buy and sell.
 -- Tom Basso


We always look for cyclicality, some sort of two-sided action. We never trade
expecting the market to move in one direction only;  if you do that throughout
your career, you're destined to be a huge loser. If you play the market to move
outside the normal distribution curve, you're going to lose for your entire
career - this is why most investors lose. The market doesn't do that. It doesn't
accommodate your directional ideas or thoughts; it always stays in a range.
That's the nature of any marketplace.
 -- Tom Sosnoff


Everyone who is calm and sensible is insane
 -- Rumi


How can a troubled mind understand the way? An untroubled mind, a mind beyond
judgments, watches and understands. Your worst enemy cannot harm you as much as
your own thoughts, unguarded. But once mastered, no one can help you as much,
not even your father or your mother.
 -- Buddha, "The Dhammapada"


Change is inevitable. Growth is not.
 -- John C. Maxwell


High IV doesn't mean you have a better chance of winning; it means you have a
better chance of making more money if you're right.
 -- Tom Sosnoff


Doubling volatility approximately squares the option price (via the Black-Scholes model)


Cowardice comes from the illusion that inaction or bad action will increase your
safety. Once you grasp that life demands risks, that aversion to action can be a
greater risk than the action itself, once you have begun to connect with your
basic right to breathe and live... courage expands.

ANYTHING that stands between you and this life drive is a delusion, a
socialization, perhaps a maladaptation to abuse and neglect. Until you feel
safe, you cannot really love and give to others fully. When you feel safe, you
can open yourself to contributing to the world and trusting - because the bottom
line is that even if you make a mistake you know you can recover.
 -- Steven Barnes


Traders have a hard time taking losses b/c they've been brainwashed into
thinking that losses & red days are bad. That's like tellin a Poker player that
folding is bad. A well executed stopout is NOT a loss. It is preservation of
mental and $$ capital
 -- Tim Grittani, on Twitter


They say the market is the enemy. Meanwhile it:

-helps u meet incredible ppl
-humbles u when u think u're the shit
-forces u to look deep inside urself & fix ur mental issues

My friend, the market is only ur enemy if u choose to remain a stubborn fucking
cunt
 -- AllDayFaders on Twitter


Narrower but relevant oft-heard version: "But it would take me X years to
accomplish/learn Y!" [sigh] You're right, dear whiner. Those years will not
elapse if you don't learn/accomplish that useful thing. Carry on.
 -- me, on Twitter


If ur goal is to "just be profitable", then that's cute. that's all you'll be. a
trader who's just profitable. Nothing wrong with that, but that's not good
enough for me. I dont pour sweat, tears & all nighters into my craft to make
pennies. im in this shit to break records.
 -- AllDayFaders on Twitter


U NEED shitty volume for SUPPLY to take over. Stock manipulators NEED volume to
execute their operations. It is MANDATORY.
 -- AllDayFaders on Twitter


I always tell ppl to NEVER check PNL midtrade. They say "i need to see how much
im up/down". Ur PLAN (predetermined entries/targets/size) should have already
accounted for that. If u have to check ur PNL to make decisions then you're
trading ur amygdala, not ur system.
 -- AllDayFaders on Twitter


Ur jumpshot improves w/ the more shots u MISS. Thats how u figure out what to
adjust in ur shooting mechanics. Trading losses are NECESSARY for growth. But
most size up so fast & so early in their journey that they blowup before things
finally click. EARN ur size.
 -- AllDayFaders on Twitter


The journey of a trader is one of struggle and endless failures. you need thick
skin and a stubborn fucking mentality to make it in this biz, simply b/c there
are SO many steps u have to climb, SO many pieces of ur shitty personality u
have to shed, in order to finally "make it".
 -- AllDayFaders on Twitter


When u are right, LEARN how to maximize profits so that u can make up for fees,
taxes, & losses.
When u are wrong, LEARN how to take the baby dick so u can live to fight another
day.
Risk management is the alpha & omega of trading, PERIOD. Feed all that other
shit to the birds.
 -- AllDayFaders on Twitter


U should never see a stock and say "hmm, i THINK i should enter here, or here.
hmm maybe here, oh no, i THINK here". wtf is that? u "think"? motherfucker this
is a warzone!! The market is DESIGNED to take ur money, and u're going to enter
it with an opinion? a "i think"? really?
 -- AllDayFaders on Twitter


Never be mean to someone who could hurt you by doing nothing.
 -- Chris Voss


STAY SMALL. Every other order type COSTS YOU.
 -- Tom Sosnoff


You make a good trade on entry, you don't make a good trade on exit.
 -- Tony "The Bat" Battista


The #1 takedown (what destroys an account) is SIZE.
 -- Tom Sosnoff


There's a reason everybody should have a currency, oil, and social media
position: when you do, you're watching the market.
 -- Tom Sosnoff


In order to know whether you should stay with a trade, you have to keep asking
yourself: "Would I do this trade right now?" If the answer is "no", then get out.
 -- David Jaffee


If you say to somebody, 'hey, when do you want to take risk?', they'll say 'when
I have the best chance of being successful!' But the reality of it is - the
optimal time to take risk is when the risk, the pot odds, are the greatest.
The worst time to take risk is when the fear level is lowest. This is counter to
everything we've always thought.
 -- Tom Sosnoff


You can actually measure fear; it's tradeable. It's called the 'expected move'.
You can buy and sell fear in the market place - it's a penny-wide.
 -- Tom Sosnoff


Urgency diminishes if investors give themselves time to reflect. Our initial
impulses are more emotional and may prompt irrational actions.
 -- "Observations of a Prop Trader"


Strotz explained one of the key problems of self-control with a help of a
discount utility function in which short-term satisfaction presides over
long-term satisfaction. Despite wishing to be slim, for example, people overeat
because they like to eat. They subordinate long-term goals to immediate
gratification.In investing and life, we react to announcements, events,
information, or our own discoveries. Some create urges to act. Many lead to
irrational decisions.

Our urge to act is most intense immediately after the onset of a stimulus and
dissipates with time. By relocating a decision away from the immediate moment we
can manage our personal psychologies.
 -- "Observations of a Prop Trader"


For he possessed the happy gift
Of unaffected conversation;
To skim one topic here, one there,
Keep silent with an expert's air
In too exacting disputation.
 -- Alexander Pushkin


There is no greater agony than bearing an untold story inside you.
 -- Maya Angelou


"Comment ca va?"
"Eh... 's haricots (les haricots) sont pas de sale!"
 -- Origin of "Zydeco" music; translated as "Snap Beans Ain't Got No Salt" for English speakers


Cut your losses short and let your profits run.


"A losing trader is not going to TRANSFORM himself. That's the kind of thing
WINNING traders do."
 -- Ed Seykota/Market Wizard


There is a well-known story in Japan about a man who goes in search of an
archery teacher.  When he finds one, the master agrees to be the mans sensei and
advises that proficiency will take 10 years.
The prospective archer is impatient. What if I practice every day? he says. What
if you tell me everything you know, and I practice into the night, twice as hard
as any other student?
"If you do that", the master says, "it will take 20 years."


The cause of economic despair, however, is human natures propensity to sway from
fear to euphoria and back, a condition that no economic paradigm has proved
capable of suppressing without severe hardship. Regulation, the alleged
effective solution to todays crisis, has never been able to eliminate history's
crises.
 -- Alan Greenspan


Boxing is simple: 1) Hit. 2) Don't get hit.


The game of speculation is the most uniformly fascinating game in the world. But
it is not a game for the stupid, the mentally lazy, the person of inferior
emotional balance, or the get-rich-quick adventurer. They will die poor.
 -- Jesse Livermore, "How To Trade In Stocks"


All through time, people have basically acted and reacted the same way in the
market as a result of greed, fear, ignorance, and hope. That is why the
numerical formations and patterns recur on a constant basis.
 -- Jesse Livermore


"No trade" is a trade; cash is a position.
 -- redtexture, in r/options


Behavior is truth.
 -- Steve Barnes


Whenever non-existent rights are claimed, people are endorsing theft.


The journey of a trader is one of struggle and endless failures. you need thick
skin and a stubborn fucking mentality to make it in this biz, simply b/c there
are SO many steps u have to climb, SO many pieces of ur shitty personality u
have to shed, in order to finally "make it"
 -- AllDayFaders on Twitter


There are two types of information: one for the masses, and one for the classes.
Don't be misled.


Investing should be more like watching paint dry or watching grass grow. If you
want excitement, take $800 and go to Las Vegas.
 -- Paul Samuelson


The inherent vice of capitalism is the unequal share of blessings; the inherent
virtue of socialism is the equal sharing of miseries.
 -- Winston Churchill


Fisher's null hypothesis addresses the most basic epistemic question, "How do
we know what we know?" with "We don't - but we know that which is very unlikely."
 -- Sunil Abraham


Price is not mean-reverting, but volatility is.
 -- Tom Sosnoff, TastyTrades


Most people chose unhappiness over uncertainty.
 -- Tim Ferris


Avoiding mistakes makes people stupid and having to be right makes you obsolete.
 -- Robert Kiyosaki


The scientific process consists of six interrelated principles of inquiry:

* Pose significant questions that can be investigated empirically
* Link research to relevant theory
* Use methods that permit direct investigation of the question
* Provide a coherent and explicit chain of reasoning
* Replicate and generalize across studies
* Disclose research to encourage professional scrutiny and critique


Markets can remain irrational longer than you can remain solvent.
 -- John Maynard Keynes


90% of health determinants exist outside the healthcare system. It's mostly
genetics, lifestyle choices, social connections, nutrition, and our built
environment.

 -- Zubin Damania, MD on Medium 


If you always hire people who are smaller than you are, we shall become a
company of dwarfs. If, on the other hand, you always hire people who are
bigger than you are, we shall become a company of giants.
 -- David Ogilvy 


We all have the same amount of finite amount of "fucks" to give, and too
many of us waste them on petty things. I'm not willing to sacrifice any
"fucks" on stupid shit.
 -- Kris Gage, on Medium 


Political correctness has no place in history. Political correctness is an
infantile disease that is useful only for the intellectually challenged to
facilitate their constant manufacture of mythological bogeymen they can then
claim to be fighting.
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


One of the things that is a classic trope of the religious bigot, is while
they're denying people their rights, they claim that their rights are being
denied. While they are persecuting people, they claim to be persecuted.
While they are behaving colossally offensively, they claim to be the
offended party.
 -- Salman Rushdie 


I don't believe that [all] feminists are necessarily bitter bigoted morons
like they are in the west; not all of them anyway, but I do think they
misunderstand what the feminist movement stands for and the fact that it
does not actually represent their interests. I believe that human rights
organisations which are not rooted in gender fascism are far more effective
at tackling human rights issues. 
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


If you're REALLY concerned about the welfare of women, then take your
bullshit to islamic countries where there are honour killings, rapes, and
where women are often not allowed to leave the house without a male
"guardian", and do not even have the right to drive. THAT is where real
oppression is, not here. 
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


Svetlana Voreskova's views on the American and European left are not at all
out of sorts with those held by anyone with Eastern European roots living
in the West. They easily catch the scent of communism coming from the
American and European left, while born Americans seem to be dead to it.
And, once they catch that scent, they reflexively vomit all over it. In
short, they've seen what happens when what we now call "progressive" ideas
take power, know what social and economic devastation it wreaks, and are
shocked that any thinking person would ever associate with "progressivism"
as it is now defined in the West. 
 -- Kady M, on Medium


...[f]eminism is an illness of the left, specifically Marxism / Leninism.
It can probably be traced to the mother of the second wave Simone de
Beauvoir who decided after a short stint of playing the good little Nazi
during the war, decided that Marxism was now trending in the later 1940s.
But she also knew that blatant Marxism might not go down so well in a lot
of countries, especially in North America. Better to sugar coat that
particular poison to make it easier to swallow. So she basically copied and
pasted the Communist Manifesto, added a pink bow and called it the Feminist
Manifesto instead. Every single core principle of feminism, as preached
today in every gender studies course on every campus in the world, is pure
undiluted Marxism. Gender as a social construct; Patriarchy theory, the
concept of "equality" the belief in the need to destroy the traditional
family and that the state instead should become the family: These are the
core doctrines of feminism and they are all Marxist constructions. 
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


"How many feminists are arguing for the end of corporate ownership in favor of
state control of the means of production?"
Not many, I wouldn't imagine. I believe that most feminists, like the followers
of any ideology, are simply camp followers; useful idiots who actually
understand very little about the ideology they subscribe to outside of slogans.
How many of the people who stormed the Winter Palace actually understood the
economic theories of Marx? Very few I imagine.
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


Your identity follows your behavior, not necessarily the other way around
despite "common wisdom".
 -- Benjamin P. Hardy, organizational psychologist 


When it comes to achieving goals, commitment involves:
Investing upfront
Making it public
Setting a timeline
Installing several forms of feedback/accountability
Removing or altering everything in your environment that opposes your commitment


"In the East, Islam silences us violently. In the West, Islam tries to
silence us using the term 'Islamophobia.'"
 -- Moroccan #ExMuslim 


Blasphemers against politically correct orthodoxy - people who prefer scientific
scrutiny and objective analysis to faith-based politically-driven wishful
thinking - are still sent to the metaphorical gulag.

When an entire civilisation can so easily become enthralled by the idea
that genetics and biology and science itself are irrelevant, and that
reality is indeed measured not by what is demonstrably true, but by how
each individual feels about it; then it is a little late to assign blame to
a new administration simply because the new boss is doing it too. 
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


In the language of the Stalinist purge or the Medieval Witch Hunt, a denial or a
demand for proof is always just an admission of guilt in the mind of an
ideologue. It is not a search for truth. It is a means of silencing people; fear
posing as justice.

You are a racist — a fascist — a misogynist — a rape apologist — a homophobe —
counter-revolutionary — enemy of the peoples - etc - etc...

These accusations are not meant as statements of truth; they are not meant to
expose genuine racists. They are designed to send a message to the audience: if
any of you even think of diverging in any way from the accepted orthodoxy then
we will send the mob after you.

So you had better join the mob. Join in the condemnation of this blasphemer. You
need to demonstrate to us that you are morally and ideologically pure. You had
better make sure you do it enthusiastically enough for our approval too because
if you do not then we will assume you are an apologist for whether ism we are
currently accusing dissenters of.
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


For anyone else who is reading along and interested, there are a few things in
this response above that are classic SJW tactics / reveals:

* Instead of engaging in good faith and simply asking the question they pretend
they want me to answer, they answer it themselves.
* Arrogance that they are "right" and I have intellectual or moral failings that
prevent me from seeing the "truth" the way they do.
* Engaging in ad-hominem attacks on a person's character, rather than relying on
argumentation to communicate. Attempts to shame with said personal attacks.

All of these indicate to me that a person is not really interested in
understanding the other person or in engaging in dialogue. For to do so requires
epistemic humility, genuine curiosity, and a degree of civility.
 -- Keri Smith, on Medium 


I don't "fail to realize" some great truth about racism that you are here
to bestow upon me. I both realize what is meant by the Racism = Prejudice +
Power definition AND reject it as invalid. One reason being that it robs
individuals of agency and power while pretending to be about their very
benefit. Power is not a static concept that remains the same based on a
person's race, sex, class, etc. In fact, the very concept of
intersectionality is about the rather obvious fact that we are all
privileged and marginalized in different ways. Unfortunately I often see
people who subscribe to SJW ideology repeating as mantra concepts about
which they don't seem to have spent much time thinking.
 -- Keri Smith, on Medium 


God may forgive your sins, but your nervous system won't. 
-- Alfred Korzybski 


If words are not things, or maps are not the actual territory, then,
obviously, the only possible link between the objective world and the
linguistic world is found in structure, and structure alone.
-- Alfred Korzybski 


Ultimately, whether any regime approves or not, the human family mostly
manages to govern itself. Whether aided in the effort by "legitimate"
government or aggressively thwarted in it, what people do, is whatever it
takes to protect their own personal interests while doing what is necessary
to coexist with their neighbors. I don't even take the whole notion of
government very seriously either, frankly, but I do recognize why the
fiction of them seems to bring some comfort. Mostly it is a question of a
yin and yang conflict, between order and chaos, faith and secularism,
personal and collective, regional and national, et cetera. Neither force
can prevail more than temporarily, nor should it, and they will always
remain in conflict, as they should.

That's just how humanity operates. Anyone who tries to squeeze a parcel of
humanity into too tight a box or exercise too much force in trying to, finds the
box has all sorts of leaks and secret egresses, and that folks will unleash all
sorts of unintended consequences on anyone and their theories, when too much
power gets wielded on them. Those basic realities mean a lot more to me in
reading the human condition, than who gets to erect what border under what name
and under the pretense of what political theory.
 -- Ron Collins, on Medium 


We are with Europe but not of it. We are linked but not combined. We are
interested and associated but not absorbed.
 -- Winston Churchill 


No permanent allies; only permanent interests.
 -- Lord Palmerston


Capitalism didn't beat communism. Communism was doomed from day one because
state socialism is unsustainable. It simply doesn't work. 
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


UBI is just another word for centralised state socialism because it cannot
be implemented without state controls on production and on prices. The
theory falls apart completely without state controls on the market because
the extra income, which has no real value underlying it, simply gets
swallowed up by inflation. If it is universal then it is worthless because
the value of a currency lies in its relativity to the amount of it floating
about. You are also going to need strict border controls to prevent capital
flight because those who do have a lot of money are not going to share it
voluntarily; except this time that capital flight will be more severe given
that it is so easy now to transfer wealth electronically. 
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


From an economic point of view the communist system collapsed in 1920.
After that it was nothing more than state banditry and forced labour. That
lasted up until the Brezhnev era, when UBI was severely restricted and
market activity was unofficially encouraged. The communists understood what
you do not; that when people are free to do business and make profits, they
will do that for themselves and their families. They will not willingly do
it to pay their profits into some collective pot for re-distribution. They
need to be forced to comply. UBI is synonymous with mass repression because
it cannot work without that repression. 
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


I certainly think the market is far better at ironing out problems than
state commissars given the right to micro manage interaction between
private citizens, or interfering in how a private citizen can run a
business. 
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


It seems to me that the only time "progressive" types get all bothered
about discrimination is when white people, men, or Christians do it. They
seem perfectly OK with it from anyone else. 
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


Old Asian tale:
"One day, a mouse found himself being eaten alive by what he had though was his
friend, the cat. All the while, the mouse kept saying, "I'll just have a
talk with this cat. I'm sure that we can work out our troubles when we have both
calmed down and just listen to each other!"
The cat... thoroughly enjoyed his meal. 


"The lion is most handsome when searching for food."
 -- Rumi


Toxic femininity teaches girls that the rest of the world can - and
should - be held hostage to their feelings; that there is no other
consideration in the world for yourself or anyone else than acting on (or
reacting to) what you're feeling RIGHT NOW.
 -- Roger Williams, on Medium 


"No, thank you. I don't want to eat the apple."
"I KNEW IT! YOU LIKE ORANGES!"
"No. I don't like oranges."
"YOU ARE JUST LYING NOW. YOU DON'T WANT TO EAT THE APPLE SO YOU MUST LIKE
ORANGES. YOU ARE AN ORANGE LOVER. ADMIT IT!!!"
"No. I actually don't like orange or apples."
"THAT'S IMPOSSIBLE. YOU HAVE TO CHOOSE BETWEEN APPLES AND ORANGES AND NOT
CHOOSING THE APPLE MEANS YOU ARE AN ORANGE LOVER."
"I'm just going to excuse myself right now. I have a melon waiting for me."
 -- seen on Medium


Be distrustful of people who put a lot of energy into telling you about
themselves; they're trying to control your perception of them. Be even more
distrustful of people who put a lot of energy into telling you about youreself;
they're trying to control your perception of you. You are sovereign. Own those
perceptions. Reject any attempts to prevent you from owning what's yours as
aggressively as you need to.
[...]
It is at its core a betrayal of humanity for you to abdicate your authority over
your own worldview to anyone, be it Noam Chomsky or Ron Paul or me. Nobody
belongs in that throne but you. Trusting in any authority but your own is
shirking your most important existential responsibility. As far as you are
concerned, figuring out what's true is your job and no one else's.
 -- Caitlin Johnstone, on Medium 


The typical westerner is saturated in a barrage of corporate media propaganda
telling them what to believe about their world, their society and their leaders,
but it's so much more than that. There are religions, ideologies and limitless
agendas all vying for space in your mental playground. Anywhere you look there
are advertisers trying to manipulate you into buying stuff. Most of your
personal relationships will be with people who are deeply invested in your being
a certain way, and they're always nudging you in that direction in various
subtle and not-so-subtle ways.
[...]
We're born into this. From the very beginning of our lives, long before we have
the capacity to begin critically examining information, we are shaped and molded
by this chaotic torrent of agendas. A large part of our perspectives and mental
habits come from other people, and it can be very, very difficult to sort out
what's real and what's just some dead idea implanted there long ago that we made
the mental habit of taking for granted. But truly standing in your own authority
uninfluenced by propaganda, groupthink or societal pressures is one of the most
revolutionary things that anyone can possibly do.
 -- Caitlin Johnstone, on Medium 


A student asked [Richard Montañez, the inventor of Flamin' Hot Cheetos] how he
was teaching without a Ph.D.  "I do have a Ph.D.," he responded. "I've been
poor, hungry and determined."


"When fascism comes to America, it will be wrapped in a flag and carrying a
cross."
 -- Sinclair Lewis, 1935 


You can no more win a war than you can win an earthquake.
 -- Jeannette Rankin (1880-1973) 


"Let us not go to slaughter like sheep! Jewish youth, do not trust the
deceivers! Hitler has invented a system for the destruction of all the Jews on
Europe... It is true that we are weak and we have nobody to help us. But our
only dignified answer to the enemy must be resistance! Brothers, it is better to
die like free fighters than to live by the murderer's grace. Resist until your
last breath!" 
 -- Jan. 1, 1942, manifesto written by Abba Kovner, a young poet in Vilnius, Lithuania


Suffice to say that if you are a modern woman living in the west, then you
are a member of the most privileged, pampered and protected demographic in
the history of human civilisation. You have all the same rights and
opportunities that men have and then some; and you are also protected by
laws and societal protocols that are not available to men. So before you go
ahead and tear down the "patriarchy," you might want to be careful what you
wish for, because I doubt most western women would be able to withstand the
tsunami of reality that would overwhelm them if society suddenly began to
treat them with the same indifference that it treats men.
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


What men must do, according to the "modern feminists":

"Give me everything for free, pay me extra for not working, and don't make me
pay taxes. Subordinate all your needs, desires and life dreams to mine.
Prioritise me over yourself all the time; my needs are your needs, my health is
more important than yours. Create a world where I can be shameless, selfish and
entitled with no consequences, I demand never to be made to feel bad about
anything. Feel guilty and ashamed all your life about everything you do, you are
not allowed to exist without women in your personal space. Remember to ask why
there are not enough women in male spaces, but also remember not to talk so much
or too loudly. Feel bad when walking around outside that there aren't enough
buildings named after women (if there are then they are the wrong kind of
women). Have non-sexual relationships with women because no men before you have
ever done that. Watch rom-coms, read trashy romance novels and masturbate.
Program yourself to find overweight and unhealthy women attractive. Uncritically
accept far-left theories and talking points."
 -- Louis Mackenzie, on Medium


> But where did I say "that the South American kingdoms were some kind of
> peaceful harmonious utopia"?

You did not. You just implied it over and over again. Your entire argument was a
claim that white people were and by extension are uniquely evil in comparison
with the indigenous people of the America's. It is all up there in your own
words. It is historical nonsense backed up with nothing but politically correct,
factually devoid sanctimony tinged with some blatant anti-white racism. But the
fact remains that your entire argument revolves around your clear and constant
claim that the indigenous people of the Americas and their cultures were morally
superior to that of Europeans.

You are not guilty for the deeds of others just because they happen to have the
same skin colour as you. Your self-flagellation based on race is pathetic.
 -- Svetlana Voreskova, on Medium 


"You have enemies? Good. That means you've stood up for something, sometime
in your life."
 -- Winston Churchill 


"If everybody loves you, something is wrong. Find at least one enemy to
keep you alert."
 -- Paulo Coelho 


History is mostly guessing; the rest is prejudice.
 -- Will Durant 


This hostile impasse we've reached - women too terrified to step out of
the house and seeing every man as a rapist by default, men too terrified to
smile at a passing stranger to avoid having their lives destroyed by an
accusation, both chock-full of fear that is escalating to anger and
hatred - that's not a society; that's a locked asylum with shrieking
inmates and not a single doctor to be seen. It's intolerable for both, and
it serves neither one.
 -- me, on Medium 


I struggle with the question of personal agency in relationships. Namely: I
want agency over my own self. I want final say over the definition of my
person, and I want that same person to be the one that's seen and cared for
by others. I don't think it's fair for other, separate beings orbiting you
in the universe to claim to care about you while simultaneously assigning
things to you you don't want, or taking from you what wasn't offered.
 -- Kris Gage on Medium 


Our emotions are controlled by three things:
How we move
What we focus on
The words we say
 -- Steve Barnes 


"If you're doing business with a Christian get it in writing. His word
doesn't mean shit what with the Good Lord telling him how to fuck you on
the deal."
 -- William S. Burroughs 


Don't be distracted by criticism. Remember - the only taste of success some
people have is when they take a bite out of you.
 -- Zig Ziglar 


Every cause has its 'heroes': typically a bunch of 'educated' academics complete
with all the feelings of intellectual superiority the academic world
breeds - people who have a whole stack of 'clever' talking points and set ideas,
and make a nice living out of indoctrinating others to consider the movements
they lead as worthy of amassing power, support and money. Books are sold,
speeches are made and positions are won - some even becoming presidents of
nations. General popularity of any sort whatsoever is always a likely route to
relative wealth and privilege.

Whatever actual doctrine is used by the individual to further such goals is
arguably incidental to these 'heroes' carving out a market niche for themselves.
 -- John Hopkins on Medium 


У правды есть особенность одна,
О ней забыть стараются обычно:
логична ложь, а истина - без дна.
Она грязна, страшна, и алогична.
 -- Дмитрий Быков 


Red alert claxons blaring all morning and I just shut them down one by one
without addressing the underlying. *sigh*
 -- Kat, on FB 


"Anything is possible if you don't know what you're talking about..." 
 -- seen in a fishing forum


[The party system] is just a presentational layer that functions to make power
look more acceptable to the people.
 -- John Hopkins, on Medium 


The most merciful thing in the world, I think, is the inability of the
human mind to correlate all its contents. We live on a placid island of
ignorance in the midst of black seas of infinity, and it was not meant that
we should voyage far. The sciences, each straining in its own direction,
have hitherto harmed us little; but some day the piecing together of
dissociated knowledge will open up such terrifying vistas of reality, and
of our frightful position therein, that we shall either go mad from the
revelation or flee from the light into the peace and safety of a new dark
age.
 --  HP Lovecraft, "The Call of Cthulhu", 1926 


Many species of fungi, including chanterelles, tend to have killer immune
systems because mycelium is very permeable and sensitive to threats in its
habitat. Because it is only one cell wall thick and is a grand banquet for
bugs, bacteria, and other fungi, mycelium is constantly producing
antibacterial, antimicrobial, and other chemical cocktails that keep
unwanted visitors at bay, and these benefits accrue not just to the
mycelium, but also the root system of the partnered organism.
 -- Anna McHugh 


"When dealing with people, remember you are not dealing with creatures of
logic, but with creatures of emotion."
 -- Dale Carnegie 


Hitler was a socialist. He affirmed his commitment to socialism publicly
over and over again and everything about the state he built was socialist
to its core. State control of industry. State control of employment and the
unions. State control of education. State control of agriculture. A
"dictatorship of the proletariat" controlled by big brother. The definition
of socialism is state ownership of the means of production. The definition
of fascism, as defined by its father Benito Mussolini is - everything
to the state.
 -- Svetlana Voreskova on Medium 


Those who use automation as justification for an ideological position are
short-sighted about it. All this talk about UBI and GJB is WAY premature; it's
not being driven by necessity, it's being driven by ideology and sloth. It's an
attempt to strong-arm the conservative majority into a massive expansion of
government services through fear-mongering.
 -- via Kady M. on Medium 


I think "euthanasia" as a term has some problems. It's too easily hijacked
by the "death panel" lunatic fringe who believe that pain and suffering is
our destiny. Switch off your Internet and heating, you psychopaths, if
that's what you really think. No, what they really mean is "I claim the
authority over others."
 -- Pieter Hintjens 


The only alternative to coexistence is codestruction.
 -- Jawaharlal Nehru 


When people are desperate or wealthy, they turn to socialism; only when
they have no other alternative do they embrace the free market. After all,
lies about guaranteed security are far more seductive than lectures about
personal responsibility.
 -- Ben Shapiro 


Indeed, a major source of objection to a free economy is precisely that
it gives people what they want instead of what a particular group thinks
they ought to want. Underlying most arguments against the free market is a
lack of belief in freedom itself.
 -- Milton Friedman 


The most important single central fact about a free market is that no
exchange takes place unless both parties benefit.
 -- Milton Friedman 


The record of history is absolutely crystal clear. That there is no
alternative way, so far discovered, of improving the lot of the ordinary
people that can hold a candle to the productive activities that are
unleashed by a free enterprise system.
 -- Milton Friedman 


You suffocate hatred by exposing it to the sunlight, not by sweeping it
under the carpet. 
 -- Svetlana Voreskova on Medium 


I despise identity politics of all kinds, because identity politics refuses
to see nuance. It refuses objectivity. It measures everything by skin
colour, sex, or sexual orientation. It is the definition of bigotry.
 -- Svetlana Voreskova on Medium 


All any scientist is trying to do is establish what is objectively true and
share that. Whether or not it agrees with any of your prior philosophies.
 -- Neil deGrasse Tyson 


All identity politics is detestable.
 -- Sam Harris 


It looks like you need a lot of intelligence to figure probabilistic things
out when you don't have skin in the game. There are things one can only get
if one has some risk on the line.
 -- Nassim Nicholas Taleb 


Those of us who take risks have their priorities firmer than vague textbook
notions such as "truth".
 -- Nassim Nicholas Taleb, "How to Be Rational About Rationality" 


[The theory of evolution] can be summarized in a single (albeit slightly long)
sentence: Life on earth evolved gradually beginning with one primitive species -
perhaps a self-replicating molecule - that lived more than 3.5 billion years
ago; it then branched out over time, throwing off many new and diverse species;
and the mechanism for most (but not all) of evolutionary change is natural
selection. When you break that statement down, you find that it really
consists of six components: evolution, gradualism, speciation, common ancestry,
natural selection, and nonselective mechanisms of evolutionary change.
 -- Jerry Coyne. Why Evolution Is True 


In the end, violence is the bedrock upon which all other societal constructs are
built and maintained, and it is only violence that counters it.
 -- Ralph Ellis, on Quora 


The thing about her is, she's good-natured. He knew it the second he saw
her standing by the parking meters. He could just tell from the soft way
her belly looked. With women, you keep bumping against them, because they
want different things, they're a different race. Either they give, like a
plant, or scrape, like a stone. In all the green world nothing feels as
good as a woman's good nature.
 -- John Updike, Rabbit Run 


"Practice does not make perfect. Only perfect practice makes perfect."
 -- Vince Lombardi 


"The first principle is that you must not fool yourself and you are the
easiest person to fool."
 -- Richard P. Feynman 


"My father says that almost the whole world is asleep. Everybody you know.
Everybody you see. Everybody you talk to. He says that only a few people
are awake and they live in a state of constant total amazement."
 -- Patricia ("Joe Versus the Volcano") 


"Spirituality means waking up. Most people, even though they don't know it,
are asleep. They're born asleep, they live asleep, they marry in their
sleep, they breed children in their sleep, they die in their sleep without
ever waking up. They never understand the loveliness and the beauty of this
thing that we call human existence."
 -- Anthony de Mello 


"Our prime purpose in this world is to help others. And if we can't help
them, at least don't hurt them."
 -- Dalai Lama 


One of the most frightening things in the Western world, and in this
country in particular, is the number of people who believe in things that
are scientifically false. If someone tells me that the earth is less than
10,000 years old, in my opinion he should see a psychiatrist.
 -- Francis Crick


You can't argue with liars. The rules of argumentation by which people
convince each other of things start with the assumptions that they're at
least all working from the same truth.
 -- Joshua Engel, on Quora 


The soldier's credo can be stated in a triple formula: Don't trust, don't
beg, don't fear. It is a formula which did not originate in spetsnaz, but
in prisons many centuries ago. In it can be seen the whole outlook of the
spetsnaz soldier: his practically superhuman contempt for death, and a
similar contempt for everybody around him. He does not believe in justice,
goodness or humanity. He does not even believe in force until it has been
demonstrated by means of a fist, a whip or the teeth of a dog. When it is
demonstrated his natural reflex is to challenge it immediately.
 -- Victor Suvorov, "Spetsnaz" 


One of the things you learn as a data scientist is that most of the things
we think we know are actually illusions. You start with a hypothesis - a gut
instinct about what you think is happening in the data - but then you try
your hardest to prove that your gut instinct is wrong. If you "fail to
reject" that hypothesis with more than 95% confidence, then you can feel
confident that know something about that one specific question. The second
someone asks you a related but not identical question, you have to start
over from scratch and do it all again.
 -- Sam Harris, on Quora 


For any proposition there is always some sufficiently narrow
interpretation of its terms, such that it turns out true, and
some sufficiently wide interpretation such that it turns out
false...concept stretching will refute *any* statement, and will
leave no true statement whatsoever.
 -- Imre Lakatos


In general, we look for a new law by the following process: First we guess
it; then we compute the consequences of the guess to see what would be
implied if this law that we guessed is right; then we compare the result of
the computation to nature, with experiment or experience, compare it
directly with observation, to see if it works. If it disagrees with
experiment, it is wrong. In that simple statement is the key to science. It
does not make any difference how beautiful your guess is, it does not make
any difference how smart you are, who made the guess, or what his name is -
if it disagrees with experiment, it is wrong.
 -- Richard Feynman, "The Character of Physical Law" 


What I must do is all that concerns me, not what the people think. This
rule, equally arduous in actual and in intellectual life, may serve for the
whole distinction between greatness and meanness. It is the harder, because
you will always find those who think they know what is your duty better
than you know it. It is easy in the world to live after the world's
opinion; it is easy in solitude to live after our own; but the great man is
he who in the midst of the crowd keeps with perfect sweetness the
independence of solitude.
 -- Ralph Waldo Emerson 


"Men are most apt to believe what they least understand."
 -- Michael de Montaigne 


You only truly possess that which you cannot lose in a shipwreck.
 -- Imam Al-Ghazali


Islamophobia - A word created by fascists and used by cowards to
manipulate morons.
 -- Christopher Hitchens 


When you have scientific inquiry, and you make a discovery and publish that
discovery, it's not yet the truth. He's gotta do research, and get the same
result as you. She's gotta do the research and [the results] don't have to
be exactly the same, they have to be approximately the same. Then someone
is going to invent a new apparatus that you haven't dreamt of yet that's
going to test the same thing. If she gets the same answer, we have a new
emergent truth. Then that goes into the textbook. On the research frontier
before there is the verification of a result, it is a bloody, messy place.
Ideas come and go like the breeze. If there's not yet a consensus of
observation and experiment, there is no yet established truth in that
field.
 -- Neil deGrasse Tyson


There is no answer more attractive of subclinically defamatory responses
(Alinskyite labeling) than this [immigration] by reason of the unpleasant
truth(s) contained therein. Remember, in telling unpleasant truths, malice is
presumed.
 -- Steven Ostertag, Quora 


I'm not a utopian indoctrinated into the cult of Leftist identitarian
activism, the new pseudo-religion that is "social justice" activism of the
intersectional Left variety.
 -- Sam Morningstar 


"The great virtue of a free market system is that it does not care what
color people are; it does not care what their religion is; it only cares
whether they can produce something you want to buy. It is the most
effective system we have discovered to enable people who hate one another
to deal with one another and help one another."
 -- Milton Friedman, "Why Government Is the Problem" 


"What weakens us is feeling offended by the deeds and misdeeds of our
fellow men. Our self-importance requires that we spend most of our lives
offended by someone."
 -- Carlos Castaneda


A lawyer once told me that lawyers take facts and organize them into
narratives, creating emotional meaning in the minds and hearts of the jury.
If they believe your story, you win. 


I should like to say two things, one intellectual and one moral. The
intellectual thing I should want to say is this: When you are studying any
matter, or considering any philosophy, ask yourself only what are the facts
and what is the truth that the facts bear out. Never let yourself be
diverted either by what you wish to believe, or by what you think would
have beneficent social effects if it were believed. But look only, and
solely, at what are the facts. That is the intellectual thing that I should
wish to say. The moral thing I should wish to say... I should say love is
wise, hatred is foolish. In this world which is getting more closely and
closely interconnected we have to learn to tolerate each other, we have to
learn to put up with the fact that some people say things that we don't
like. We can only live together in that way and if we are to live together
and not die together we must learn a kind of charity and a kind of
tolerance which is absolutely vital to the continuation of human life on
this planet.
 -- BBC's Face to Face interview of Bertrand Russell 


Cultural distance is all about the death of jazz, literature, fine art and all
the edifying oats of Western Civ in favor of ‘degenerate art' and relativism
that has young people screaming about the ‘cultural appropriation' of their
ethnic charms.
 -- Michael Bowen, on Medium 


Sometimes it's instructive to be in alien observation mode.
 -- Michael Bowen, on Medium 


The anti-Semite has chosen hate because hate is a faith; at the outset he has
chosen to devaluate words and reasons. How entirely at ease he feels as a
result! How futile and frivolous discussions about the rights of the Jew appear
to him! He has pleased himself on other ground from the beginning. If out of
courtesy he consents for a moment to defend his point of view, he lends himself
but does not give himself. He tries simply to project his intuitive certainty
onto the plane of discourse. I mentioned a while back some remarks by
anti-Semites, all of them absurd: "I hate Jews because they make servants
insubordinate, because a Jewish furrier robbed me, etc." Never believe that
anti-Semites are completely unaware of the absurdity of their replies. They know
that their remarks are frivolous, open to challenge. But they are amusing
themselves, for it is their adversary who is obliged to use words responsibly,
since he believes in words. The anti-Semites have the right to play. They even
like to play with discourse for, by giving ridiculous reasons, they discredit
the seriousness of their interlocutors. They delight in acting in bad faith,
since they seek not to persuade by sound argument but to intimidate and
disconcert. If you press them too closely, they will abruptly fall silent,
loftily indicating by some phrase that the time for argument is past. It is not
that they are afraid of being convinced. They fear only to appear ridiculous or
to prejudice by their embarrassment their hope of winning over some third person
to their side.

If then, as we have been able to observe, the anti-Semite is impervious to
reason and to experience, it is not because his conviction is strong. Rather his
conviction is strong because he has chosen first of all to be impervious.
 -- Jean Paul-Sartre, "Anti-Semite and Jew"


The anti-Semite has no illusions about what he is. He considers himself an
average man, modestly average, basically mediocre. There is no example of an
anti-Semite's claiming individual superiority over the Jews. But you must not
think that he is ashamed of his mediocrity; he takes pleasure in it; I will even
assert that he has chosen it. This man fears every kind of solitariness, that of
the genius as much as that of the murderer; he is the man of the crowd. However
small his stature, he takes every precaution to make it smaller, lest he stand
out from the herd and find himself face to face with himself. He has made
himself an anti-Semite because that is something one cannot be alone.
 -- Jean Paul-Sartre, "Anti-Semite and Jew"


Еврейского характера загадочность
Не гений совместила со злодейством
А жертвенно хрустальную порядочность
С таким же неуемным прохиндейством
 -- И.М.Губерман 


At its root, political correctness is a socially sanctioned form of bullying and
suppression: its aim is to subjugate the perceived powerful segments of society
(e.g. white people) and get them to be quiet on certain topics.


I haven't eaten apples in days. The doctors are closing in. My barricade won't
last much longer. tell my family I love th-
.
.
.


The most foolish mistake we could possibly make would be to allow the
subject races to possess arms. History shows that all conquerors who have
allowed the subject races to carry arms have prepared their own downfall by
so doing. Indeed, I would go so far as to say that the supply of arms to
the underdogs is a sine qua non for the overthrow of any sovereignty.
 -- Adolf Hitler, "Hitler's Table Talk, 1941"


Of the many inhuman outrages of this present year, the only case where the
proposed lynching did not occur, was where the men armed themselves... and
prevented it. The only times an Afro-American who was assaulted got away
has been when he had a gun and used it in self-defense. The lesson this
teaches and which every Afro-American should ponder well, is that a
Winchester rifle should have a place of honor in every black home, and it
should be used for that protection which the law refuses to give.
 -- Ida Wells, "Southern Horrors: Lynch Law in All Its Phases"


Good artists copy, great artists steal.
 -- Pablo Picasso 


Arguing that you don't care about the right to privacy because you have
nothing to hide is no different than saying you don't care about free
speech because you have nothing to say.
 -- Edward Snowden 


Despair is the conclusion of fools.
 -- Benjamin Disraeli 


A computer lets you make more mistakes faster than any other invention with
the possible exceptions of handguns and Tequila.
 -- Mitch Ratcliffe 


I cannot praise a fugitive and cloistered virtue, unexercised and
unbreathed, that never sallies out and sees her adversary, but slinks out
of the race where that immortal garland is to be run for, not without dust
and heat. Assuredly we bring not innocence into the world, we bring
impurity much rather: that which purifies us is trial, and trial is by what
is contrary. That virtue therefore which is but a youngling in the
contemplation of evil, and knows not the utmost that vice promises to her
followers, and rejects it, is but a blank virtue, not a pure; her whiteness
is but an excremental whiteness.
 -- Milton, "Areopagitica" 


Porter Erisman shared one of the most revealing quotes about Jack Ma: "I
was in charge of the international website and I think for Jack's taste I
was moving too slowly. He told me, Porter, I'm not going to get mad at you
for making mistakes, but I can't accept you doing nothing. If you do
something and make a mistake, fine. But if you do nothing, I'll replace
you." 


"From whence shall we expect the approach of danger? Shall some
trans-Atlantic military giant step the earth and crush us at a blow? Never.
All the armies of Europe and Asia... could not by force take a drink from
the Ohio River or make a track on the Blue Ridge in the trial of a thousand
years. No, if destruction be our lot we must ourselves be its author and
finisher. As a nation of free men we will live forever or die by suicide."
 -- Abraham Lincoln 


The correct analogy for the mind is not a vessel that needs filling, but
wood that needs igniting - no more - and then it motivates one towards
originality and instills the desire for truth.
 -- Plutarch, "Moralia: On Listening to Lectures" (circa 100 A.D) 


Oxygen respiration is the most efficient form of respiration in existence
in biology. Molecular oxygen is the electron acceptor, and it happens to be
one with the lowest energy level of acceptance and the greatest electron
affinity in existence in the universe, and definitely the best in these two
aspects of all the commonly available substances in the universe that life
can easily get access to.
 -- Adam Wu, on Quora 


Evolution acts on a species ability to leave offspring. It doesn't care
about immortality. YOU do, but evolution doesn't care. It isn't
teleological. It doesn't "try" to make things a certain way. Evolution is a
blind force that acts on fertility. Evolution is simply this: every
creature is different than its parents. Some of those differences result in
one offspring being able to leave more offspring than its siblings or
peers. Over time, those small differences accumulate.
 -- Dan Holiday, on Quora 


Failure is an investment with compound interest.
 -- Ali AlShamsi, on Quora 


Тиран душой, сапожник родом
Воздвиг себя на пьедестал
И стал народ врагом народа
А он один народом стал.
 -- Осип Эмильевич Мандельштам 


Want to close the wage gap? Step one: Change your major from feminist dance
therapy to electrical engineering. 


It's the one thing I hate most about Islam: the presumption that it exerts
any authority of any kind on nonbelievers. Fuck that! I disrespect Islam
based on the content of its core texts (Quran and ahadith), as well as
Muhammad's example, Islam's history in Asia (particularly India) and
Islamic tradition (which has turned misogyny into an art-form).
 -- Jim Ashby, on Quora 


Trump did not cause the deep division in the country. It caused him.
 -- Fred Reed 


"Self righteous race-baiters, gender-oppression olympians, and apologists
for Islamofascism."
 -- description of SJWs on Quora 


"Many kinds of systems are evolutionary [...] In all such systems there are
populations, or groups, of entities; there is variation in one or more
characteristics among the members of the population; there is HEREDITARY
SIMILARITY between parent and offspring entities; and over the course of
generations there may be changes in the proportions of individuals with
different characteristics within populations. This process constitutes descent
with modification."
 -- Douglas Futuyma, "Evolutionary Biology" 


When liberals insist that only fascists will defend borders, then voters
will hire fascists to do the job liberals won't do.
 -- David Frum, in The Atlantic 


In coding, the opposite of DRY ("Don't Repeat Yourself") is WET ("We Enjoy
Typing" or "Write Everything Twice"). 


...around 1960, Nasser's KGB advisors created the Palestinian nation to
turn the narrative of "one tiny Israel vs all of the Arab world" into "the
mighty Israel against few Palestinians".
 -- Ilana Halupovich, on Quora 


Mankind are always predisposed to believe that any subjective feeling, not
otherwise accounted for, is a revelation of some objective reality.
 -- John Stuart Mill, "Utilitarianism" 


We (humans) are able to identify things that are manufactured. Whether they
be stone tools from 2 million years ago to shards of pottery to steel rods
to crime scenes to watches in a meadow. We do that by determining that there
is nothing in the environment that will produce the thing.
 -- Paul Lucas, on Quora 


The universe is under no obligation to make sense to you. It doesn't give a
rat's ass how your five senses interact with this world.
 -- Neil deGrasse Tyson


Men will never be free until the last king is strangled with the entrails
of the last priest.
 -- Diderot 


Warrior rule #1: Never start a fight. Never lose one. Pick your battles. 


The idea that some idiot has to find science "appealing", while at the same
time science is literally the glue which holds modern life together, is the
height of cognitive dissonance.
 -- Scott Welch, on Quora 


If all justified thought is against your idea X, just insist that justified
thought is merely ‘one way of many' and give justified thought a long and
precise name to make it seem like a narrow specialty. Then declare yourself
the expert in this new category of unjustified thought, a new field, which
is only unjustified to outsiders and amateurs. The expertise is defined by
possession of the fringe belief: if they disagree they're still just
ignorant and need to study more, until they agree. And then imagine an
anti-X ideology, an ideology synonymous with that narrow category of
justified thought, so that you can dismiss every inconvenient fact as being
biased by that ideology. Your baseless belief in X is now foolproof, though
the fool is you.
 -- Mark Ferguson, on Quora 


"The LSD phenomenon, on the other hand, is - to me at least - more interesting. It
is an intentionally achieved schizophrenia, with the expectation of a
spontaneous remission - which, however, does not always follow. Yoga, too, is
intentional schizophrenia: one breaks away from the world, plunging inward, and
the ranges of vision experienced are in fact the same as those of a psychosis.
But what, then, is the difference? What is the difference between a psychotic or
LSD experience and a yogic, or a mystical? The plunges are all into the same
deep inward sea; of that there can be no doubt. The symbolic figures encountered
are in many instances identical (and I shall have something more to say about
those in a moment). But there is an important difference. The difference - to put
it sharply - is equivalent simply to that between a diver who can swim and one who
cannot. The mystic, endowed with native talents for this sort of thing and
following, stage by stage, the instruction of a master, enters the waters and
finds he can swim; whereas the schizophrenic, unprepared, unguided, and
ungifted, has fallen or has intentionally plunged, and is drowning." 
 -- Joseph Campbell, "Myths to Live By"


Reading maketh a full man; conference a ready man; and writing an exact man.
 -- Francis Bacon


"But the problem with readers, the idea we're given of reading is that the
model of a reader is the person watching a film, or watching television. So
the greatest principle is, 'I should sit here and I should be entertained.'
And the more classical model, which has been completely taken away, is the
idea of a reader as an amateur musician. An amateur musician who sits at
the piano, has a piece of music, which is the work, made by somebody they
don't know, who they probably couldn't comprehend entirely, and they have
to use their skills to play this piece of music. The greater the skill, the
greater the gift that you give the artist and that the artist gives you.
That's the incredibly unfashionable idea of reading. And yet when you
practice reading, and you work at a text, it can only give you what you put
into it. It's an old moral, but it's completely true."
 -- Zadie Smith (via Kenneth Yu) 


Trying to lower facts to opinions is the typical tactic of someone with no
evidence.


Basic mistakes happen all the time with poorly-educated people. You need to
have standards of thought to keep out the garbage. 


Political debate is not about truth or evidence. It is an act of social
posturing, similar to peacocks showing their tails. Learn human weaknesses
and exploit them. Hammer simple points while ignoring objections. Leave on
a high note. Be thuggish yet classy. 


Luck will often save a man if his courage hold.
 -- Viking proverb 


"I have reigned now about 50 years in victory or in peace, beloved by my
subjects, dreaded by my enemies and respected by my allies. Riches and
honor, power and pleasure have waited on my call, nor does any earthly
blessing appear to have been wanting to my felicity. In this situation I
have diligently counted and numbered the days of pure and genuine happiness
which have fallen to my lot: they amount to 14."
 -- Abd-er Raman III of Spain, c. 960 AD


You make yourself special using two tools, discipline and courage. 


A priest who lived in a small village loved the rooster and ten hens he kept in
the hen house behind his church. But one Saturday night the rooster went
missing! The priest knew that cock fights went on in the village, so he decided
to question his parishioners in church the next morning.

During Mass, he asked the congregation, "Has anybody got a cock?"

All the men stood up.

"No," he said, "that wasn't what I meant. Has anybody seen a cock?"

All the women stood up.

"No, no," he said, "that wasn't what I meant. Has anybody seen a cock that
doesn't belong to them?"

Then half the women stood up.

"No," he repeated, "that wasn't what I meant! Has anybody seen MY cock?"

And all the altar boys stood up.


Toute nation a le gouvernement qu'elle mérite.
 -- Joseph de Maistre 


What is hateful to yourself, do not do to your fellow man. That is the
whole Torah; the rest is just commentary.
 -- Rabbi Hillel 


Trying to lower facts to opinions is the typical tactic of someone with no
evidence.
 -- Mark Ferguson, on Quora 


Reason is a whore, the greatest enemy that faith has; it never comes to the
aid of spiritual things, but more frequently than not struggles against the
divine Word, treating with contempt all that emanates from God.
 -- Martin Luther, father of Protestantism 


Show me a young conservative, and I'll show you a man without a heart. Show
me an old liberal, and I'll show you a man without brains.
 -- Winston Churchill 


Only the worst of fools dialog away their rights.
 -- Charles Tips, on Quora 


Any organization that designs a system will inevitably produce a design
whose structure is a copy of the organization's communication structure.
 -- Conway's Law 


We need to be more than intolerant with some intolerant minorities. It is
not permissible to use "American values" or "Western principles" in
treating intolerant Salafism (which denies other peoples' right to have
their own religion). The West is currently in the process of committing
suicide.
 -- Nassim Nicholas Taleb, "The Most Intolerant Wins" 


Everything's simpler when you have a scapegoat; every problem seems more
soluble if you can find a way to avoid complicity. But we're all in this
mess together and we all, in one way or another, create the context out of
which evil emerges.
 -- Michael Masiello, on Quora 


There have been some whom religion has elevated, and some whose monstrous
tendencies it has validated; there have been some whose unbelief has been
no impediment to virtue and goodness; there have been plenty whose unbelief
has not forestalled wickedness and depravity; it hardly seems the case that
a credal stance is the distinguishing criterion, given these facts; and
neuroscience would seem to suggest that our best and worst tendencies are
hardwired anyway.
 -- Michael Masiello, on Quora 


Российская нефть бывает 2-х типов. Вы все хорошо знаете этих двух типов... 


The Jews are a nervous people. Nineteen centuries of Christian love have
taken a toll.
-- Benjamin Disraeli 


I built a 1TB data warehouse for Shell in the 80s. It was 2500 disk drives
and took up over 360 standard racks and ate 1.5 MW of power at a cost of
nearly $20M. Oh yeah, and it ate like 7000 square feet of floor. Good
times.
 -- Stan Hanks on Quora 


It is a mistake to treat the imaginable set as the possible set, and it is
a second mistake to treat all possible states as equally likely.
 -- Mark Ferguson 


The willingness to believe garbage seems to come from a fundamental
weakness in humans: we prefer a bad explanation to no explanation, a
conspiracy theory to no theory; we can exploit patterns, even wicked
patterns, but we can't handle randomness. It would be better if we could
ensure a good harvest by sacrificing a goat. The people who believe in the
Illuminati orchestrating every disaster throughout history are actually
comforted by the belief, because a secret organization of diabolical people
in charge of everything is preferable to no one being in charge.

It also absolves the self: if something else caused this bad thing to happen it
wasn't my fault. I can stop worrying about all the things I might have done
wrong if I can attribute every problem to this bogus explanation. People who
feel guilty, maybe for legitimate reasons, are inclined to find these other junk
explanations. In parenting this is an old story: a child has a swastika on their
wall and is building a bomb in their garage over the course of months, crossing
off their classmates' names on a list with red ink, but their oblivious parents
blame the behavior on heavy metal music or violent video games after the
massacre.
 -- Mark Ferguson, on Quora 


It is the common tactic of people with no evidence to make up non-existent
ideologies for the opponents to have. This turns established facts of
science and history into opinions, allowing any argument to go on forever.
It's a typical propaganda trick: if you're losing the fight for X, just
declare an ideology of anti-X that biases all of your opponents. Their
belief blinds them to the reality of a Flat Earth (or whatever).
 -- Mark Ferguson, on Quora 


Whether things will be better if they are different, I do not know, but
that they will have to be different if they are to become better, that I do
know.
 -- Georg Christoph Lichtenberg 


Almost every vice has a community of enablers and a body of poor
justifications/excuses/lies to make leaving the community difficult.
 -- Mark Ferguson, on Quora 


In any case, if there be any Truth absolutely unrelated to humanity then
for us it is absolutely non-existing.
 -- Rabindranath Tagore, in a conversation with Einstein 


The opposite of love is not hate, it's indifference. The opposite of art is not
ugliness, it's indifference. The opposite of faith is not heresy, it's
indifference. And the opposite of life is not death, it's indifference.
 -- Elie Wiesel 


Tenda wema nenda zako.
"Do good, then be on your way."
 -- Swahili proverb


Argument by analogy is always weak. Analogy is always explanation, never
evidence, and only very rarely an intellectual argument.
 -- Barry Hampe, on Quora 


'Mokita' is a word in the Kilivila language, which is spoken on Kiriwina,
the largest of the Trobriand Islands (near Papua New Guinea). It means
"truth we all know but agree not to talk about." 


"We are all a little weird and life's a little weird, and when we find
someone whose weirdness is compatible with ours, we join up with them and
fall in mutual weirdness and call it love."
 -- Dr. Seuss 


"Wandering in a vast forest at night, I have only a faint light to guide
me. A stranger appears and says to me: 'My friend, you should blow out
your candle in order to find your way more clearly.' This man is a
theologian."
 --Diderot 


"There may be moderate Muslims, but Islam itself is not moderate. There is
no difference between Islam and Islamic fundamentalism: at most there is a
difference of degree but not of kind."
 -- Ibn Warraq 


"There are three religious truths: 1) Jews do not recognize Jesus as the
Messiah. 2) Protestants do not recognize the Pope as the leader of the
Christian faith. 3) Baptists do not recognize each other in the liquor
store or at Hooters."
 -- Unknown 


"The problem with fascism and communism, however, is not that they are too
critical of religion; the problem is that they are too much like religions.
Such regimes are dogmatic to the core and generally give rise to
personality cults that are indistinguishable from cults of religious hero
worship. Auschwitz, the gulag and the killing fields were not examples of
what happens when human beings reject religious dogma; they are examples of
political, racial and nationalistic dogma run amok. There is no society in
human history that ever suffered because its people became too reasonable."
 -- Sam Harris 


"The priests of the different religious sects dread the advance of science
as witches do the approach of daylight, and scowl on the fatal harbinger
announcing the subdivision of the duperies on which they live."
 -- Thomas Jefferson 


"The President of the United States summons the nation to church on
Thanksgiving Day to give thanks to"Almighty God" for the abundant harvest
and all other blessings. But what has Almighty God, as a personal being, to
do with the harvests? If it is he who produces our crops, then being
Almighty there should never be a failure of crops. But since crops
frequently fail, it follows that there is no Almighty person in charge of
them, unless he brings failure purposely. Therefore, if God is to be
thanked for large crops, he must be blamed when the crops are a failure. If
God sends the rain and the sunshine which develops and ripens our wheat,
who sends the storms and the insects which destroy much of it? And if he
sends both, then why not thank him for one and blame him for the other?"
 -- John Dietrich 


The PC [political correctness] movement exists not in order to improve the
well-being of those whose oppression it purports to combat. Rather, its
purpose is to wrap its proponents in a kind of verbal comfort-blanket.
Beneath its complacent cosiness and nauseating sanctimony, the intrepid
shock-troops of 'populist authoritarianism' pretend that suppressing the
language of prejudice is the same as eliminating prejudice itself. Smug and
self-satisfied, having assuaged whatever guilt they may have felt through
their attacks on the 'non-PC', they ignore the real inequalities,
ignominies and powerlessness of those whom they pretend to champion. They
are instead complacently content at their 'victory' in contorting the
language of 'acceptable' discourse in the classroom, in the textbook and in
the mass media. 


"The only position that leaves me with no cognitive dissonance is atheism.
It is not a creed. Death is certain, replacing both the siren-song of
Paradise and the dread of Hell. Life on this earth, with all its mystery
and beauty and pain, is then to be lived far more intensely: we stumble and
get up, we are sad, confident, insecure, feel loneliness and joy and love.
There is nothing more; but I want nothing more."
 -- Ayaan Hirsi Ali 


"The next time believers tell you that 'separation of church and state' does not
appear in our founding document, tell them to stop using the word 'trinity.' The
word 'trinity' appears nowhere in the bible. Neither does Rapture, or Second
Coming, or Original Sin. If they are still unfazed (or unphrased), by this, then
add Omniscience, Omnipresence, Supernatural,Transcendence, Afterlife, Deity,
Divinity, Theology, Monotheism, Missionary, Immaculate Conception, Christmas,
Christianity, Evangelical, Fundamentalist, Methodist, Catholic, Pope, Cardinal,
Catechism, Purgatory, Penance, Transubstantiation, Excommunication, Dogma,
Chastity, Unpardonable Sin, Infallibility, Inerrancy, Incarnation, Epiphany,
Sermon, Eucharist, the Lord's Prayer, Good Friday, Doubting Thomas, Advent,
Sunday School, Dead Sea, Golden Rule, Moral, Morality, Ethics, Patriotism,
Education, Atheism, Apostasy, Conservative (Liberal is in), Capital Punishment,
Monogamy, Abortion, Pornography, Homosexual, Lesbian, Fairness, Logic, Republic,
Democracy, Capitalism, Funeral, Decalogue, or Bible."
 -- Dan Barker


"You'll never find a dead Christian in a foxhole who didn't pray."
 --Christopher Hitchens 


"Teaching to solve problems is education of the will. Solving problems
which are not too easy for him [sic], the student learns to persevere
through unsuccess, to appreciate small advances, to wait for the essential
idea, to concentrate with all his might when it appears. If the student had
no opportunity in school to familiarize himself with the varying emotions
of the struggle for the solution his mathematical education failed in the
most vital point."
 -- George Polya, "How to Solve It"


Illusory power, the power of violence is about the denial of choice. Making
another human's choices for them. This need not be in the mode of violence.
It may be by provision. To make what is given the means of life. To
manufacture desires that can only be satisfied by an interested monopoly.
To pull the shades, and reduce the Sun to chosen beams.
 -- Kendrick Van Zant, Quora 


Will dissent be permitted? The answer to that question will determine
whether the society is a free society or a fear society.
 -- Natan Sharansky


Believe me, the drug of freedom is universally potent.
 -- Natan Sharansky


"Je n'avais pas besoin de cette hypothèse-là.
("I had no need of that hypothesis.")
 -- Laplace to Napoleon, when asked why he hadn't mentioned God in his writings 


"When life does get tough and the crisis is undeniably at hand, when we
must, in an instant, look inward for strength of character to see us
through, we will find nothing inside ourselves that we have not already put
there."
 -- Ronald Reagan, 1993 


If you don't have tools to build the tools, you build yourself into what it
takes to do it.
 -- Stan Hanks, on Quora 


For Ibn Khaldun, human society is necessary since the individual acting
alone could acquire neither the necessary food nor security. Only the
division of labour, in and through society, makes this possible. The state
arises through the need of a restraining force to curb the natural
aggression of humanity. A state is inconceivable without a society, while a
society is well-nigh impossible without a state. 


You ask my advice about acting? Speak clearly, don't bump into the
furniture and if you must have motivation, think of your pay packet on
Friday.
 -- Noel Coward 


very different from the God of the Christian and far and away from the God
of Islam, because both are depicted as omnipotent Oriental despots, cosmic
Saddam Husseins.
 -- Anthony Flew, describing the deist version of god 


Some conservatives do give me a hard time, but I still have that drill
instructor air of "fuck with me and I'll make love to your face with a
sledgehammer" about me, so most people are either nice or quiet.
 -- Sophia de Tricht, on Quora 


"Great poets imitate and improve, whereas small poets steal and spoil." 


Machine learning is poorly suited for making causal inference. It depends
almost entirely on correlation, much to the dismay of scientists who are
interested in discovering knowledge in the form of stronger causal claims. 
 -- Abhinav Maurya, on Quora


I had occasion in my younger days to sit in on USMC interrogation training.
And while it's fair to say that it's nothing like you envision, and that no
uniformed servicemember gets away with waterboarding or other physical
abuse, one thing I learned that I feel comfortable sharing with you is
something that a stern, bald sergeant told me when I asked what's the point
of all this. He looked at me with a glance that was swords through my calm
and said "Everyone breaks" and continued on like he didn't just say
something super ominous there. Everyone breaks. Everyone. No exceptions. It
may take an hour, it may take a week, it may take years, but the mind can
only take so much.
 -- Sophia de Tricht, on Quora 


That which can't be considered scientific data can't be asserted as proof. This
is a common failing in pseudo-scientific writings - an appeal to some other form
of proof or "other ways of knowing".
 -- Irvin Bussel 


Some people are like Slinkies. Not really good for anything but they bring
a smile to your face when pushed down the stairs. 


Man will never be free until the last king is strangled with the entrails
of the last priest.
 -- Denis Diderot 


"There is a deep-seated repugnance in the human breast against
understanding the processes in which we are involved. Such understanding
involves far too much responsibility for our actions."
 -- Marshall McLuhan 


Capital goes where it's welcome and stays where it's well treated.
 -- Walter Wriston (1919-2005), Citicorp Chairman, 1967-1984 


The demand in any market is exactly equal to the supply of goods and
services. If you know the cost of producing those goods and services, that
equals the total demand (or capacity of the market to purchase those goods
and services) for same. 
 -- Charles Tips, Quora


Do you know what we call opinion in the absence of evidence? We call it
prejudice.
 -- Michael Crichton 


Definition of social network sites: 'computers making people easier to use
every day.'


The most profitable ends to serve are "get paid, get laid, or lose weight."
 -- James Altucher, on Quora 


It doesn't take "deep industry expertise" to sell online. It takes (1) a
good offering, (2) compelling information on why someone should buy what
you are selling, and (3) eyeballs. The right eyeballs. Eyeballs that cost
you less than your gross profits. That's it.
 -- Zach Pinnell, on Quora 


Life ain't easy, you gotta be tough to live it right.
 -- Robert Miller, ex-con on Quora


There is only one thing that makes you a loser, and that is when you look
in the mirror and see one. You can only put that name on you, others may
"write it on the tag" but you have to stick it to your shirt. ya know?
 -- Robert Miller, on Quora 


Personally I think religion should be kept out of public life. Secularism
is the way forward. For all that religion gives people strength and solace
it also fuels divisions and hatred.
 -- Toby Low, on Quora 


If you are going to be brutally honest all of the time then you will be
unemployed and alone, albeit with your authentic self for company.
 -- Brendan Hickey, on Quora 


Religion is an insult to human dignity. With or without it, good people will do
good things and evil people will do evil things. But for good people to do evil
things, that takes religion.
 -- Steven Weinberg, Nobel Prize Laureate


Be peaceful, be courteous, obey the law, respect everyone; but if someone
puts his hand on you, send him to the cemetery.
 -- Malcolm X 


"It's not the critic who counts... it's not the man who points out how the
strong man stumbled. Credit belongs to the man who really was in the arena,
his face marred by dust, sweat and blood, who strives valiantly, who errs
to come short and short again, because there is no effort without error and
shortcoming. It is the man who actually strives to do the great deeds, who
knows the great enthusiasm and knows the great devotion, who spends himself
on a worthy cause, who, at best, knows in the end the triumph of great
achievement. And who, at worst, if he fails, at least fails while daring
greatly, so that his place shall never be with those cold and cruel souls
who know neither victory or defeat."
 -- Teddy Roosevelt 


After you become a millionaire, you can give all of your money away
because what's important is not the million dollars; what's important is
the person you have become in the process of becoming a millionaire.
 -- Jim Rohn 


When my information changes, I alter my conclusions. What do you do, sir?
 -- John Maynard Keynes


Science begins with problems. It attempts to solve them through bold, inventive
theories. The great majority of theories are false and/or untestable. Valuable,
testable theories will search for errors. We try to find errors and eliminate
them. This is science: it consists of wild, often irresponsible ideas that it
places under the strict control of error correction. 
 -- Karl Popper, "All Life is Problem Solving"


We exist purely as vehicles for our genes; our consciousness, our imaginations,
our creations: all these are simply manifestations of our genetically-implanted
instincts for survival. We believe we exist because it makes us better
replicators. There is no other reason for existence, no god, no destiny, no
karma. Our lives are neither random nor controlled: choice is an illusion, but
so is fate. We simply operate, like the very intelligent automatons we are. Our
minds are exquisitely adapted to solving large and complex problems, the bulk of
which come from our intraspecies competition with each other. Our societies are
hives, built through the collaboration of thousands and millions of minds. As a
species we are genetically so similar, due to near-extinction around 50,000
years ago, that we are practically clones. All our notions of "ethnicity" and
"color" are as meaningful as separating people by hair patterns or toe size. Our
species is incredibly successful mainly because we have managed to turn our
technological prowess onto ourselves, creating a feedback loop that has not
stopped since we invented fire and freed our jaws to shrink and make space for a
larger brain. Finally, although we all feel unique, we are in fact designed as
team players, male and female, young and old adopting clear and comfortable
roles that are so inate they are universal in all human cultures. Men solve
technical problems, women organize social networks. Young men learn and work,
young women dance and like to look pretty. Old women gossip and old men
accumulate power.
 -- Pieter Hintjens, 1 January 2004


Kaczynski must surely have known
What Lewinski and Clinton have shown:
That an intern is better
Than a bomb in a letter
When deciding just how to be blown. 


"The way you keep using my name makes me feel oddly violated; as if you dipped
your cock in my drink."


Intelligence, when not supported by wisdom, is worse than useless: it's a
sharp surgeon's knife being waved around by a silly child.
 -- me, on Quora 


Those who wish to fail must first prevent their friends from helping them. Those
who smile wisely and say: "I will not argue" remove themselves from help, and
withdraw from the communal effort.
 -- E. Yudkowsky


A man never tells you anything until you contradict him.
 -- George Bernard Shaw


The Scriptures are not teaching science. It's very hard for me to accept, not
just a literal interpretation of Scripture, but a fundamentalist approach to
religious belief. It's kind of a plague. It presents itself as science, and it's not.
 -- Father George Coyne, PhD, former director of the Vatican Observatory


If the world does come to an end here, or wherever, or if it limps into the
future, decimated by the effects of religion-inspired nuclear terrorism,
let's remember what the real problem was. We learned how to precipitate
mass death before we got past the neurological disorder of wishing for it.
That's it. Grow up or die.
 -- Bill Maher 


If you belonged to a political party or a social club that was tied to as
much bigotry, misogyny, homophobia, violence, and sheer ignorance as
religion is, you'd resign in protest. To do otherwise is to be an enabler,
a mafia wife, for the true devils of extremism that draw their legitimacy
from the billions of their fellow travelers.
 -- Bill Maher 


The only appropriate attitude for man to have about the big questions is
not the arrogant certitude that is the hallmark of religion, but doubt.
Doubt is humble, and that's what man needs to be, considering that human
history is just a litany of getting shit dead wrong.
 -- Bill Maher 


Faith means making a virtue out of not thinking. It's nothing to brag
about. And those who preach faith, and enable and elevate it are
intellectual slaveholders, keeping mankind in a bondage to fantasy and
nonsense that has spawned and justified so much lunacy and destruction.
Religion is dangerous because it allows human beings who don't have all the
answers to think that they do. Most people would think it's wonderful when
someone says, "I'm willing, Lord! I'll do whatever you want me to do!"
Except that since there are no gods actually talking to us, that void is
filled in by people with their own corruptions and limitations and agendas.
And anyone who tells you they know, they just know what happens when you
die, I promise you, you don't. How can I be so sure? Because I don't know,
and you do not possess mental powers that I do not.
 -- Bill Maher 


The irony of religion is that because of its power to divert man to
destructive courses, the world could actually come to an end. The plain
fact is, religion must die for mankind to live. The hour is getting very
late to be able to indulge having in key decisions made by religious
people, by irrationalists, by those who would steer the ship of state not
by a compass, but by the equivalent of reading the entrails of a chicken.
 -- Bill Maher 


"Just because you are oppressed doesn't mean you're not an asshole." 


If your goal is to lose ten pounds, you may wake up each day with failure
in mind because the goal is hard to reach, and you are only progressing by
small amounts. It takes up all your willpower. I recommend that instead of
a goal you have a system. Willpower is a finite resource. Don't pick a
model that has failure built into it and requires you constantly drain a
finite resource.
 -- Scott Adams 


If you follow this one basic rule for the rest of your life, you'll safely
bypass 99.9% of all cons, spam, political craziness, and advertising you'll ever
encounter:

**If it grabs your emotions, and you didn't ask for it, it's most likely a
scam.**
 -- me, on Quora 


 Those who use religion for their own benefit are detestable.
 -- Mustafa Kemal Atatürk 


All of religion, including the idea of God, lies within a realm of thought
which is imaginative, not reasonable.
 -- Søren Kierkegaard 


Many atheists tiptoe on eggshells for fear some smarmy theist might
challenge the central assertion that God is an imaginary friend used as an
emotional crutch by people who don't have the intestinal fortitude to stand
on their own two feet without horoscopes, tarot readings, fortune tellers
and delusional monologues called "prayer."
 -- Skeeter Thompson, on Quora 


The external world is the world of facts and science; the internal world is
the world of feelings and religion.
 -- Skeeter Thompson, on Quora 


I've survived some very hard times, in some very hostile social
environments, and I'm going to give you the best, most powerful thing I
know with regard to this: stop comparing yourself to others, including how
"easy" or how "difficult" it is for them, or you, to fit in, or to get
things done. You have your challenges; so does everyone else. Follow what
matters to you, and work at negotiating your social agreements. What it
takes you is what it takes you, and your abilities and intelligence is what
define how far you can climb.
 -- me, on Quora 


Named for the debate tactic created by creationist shill Duane Gish, a Gish
Gallop involves spewing so much bullshit in such a short span on that your
opponent can't address let alone counter all of it. To make matters worse a Gish
Gallop will often have one or more 'talking points' that has a tiny core of
truth to it, making the person rebutting it spend even more time debunking it in
order to explain that, yes, it's not totally false but the Galloper is
distorting/misusing/misstating the actual situation.
 -- http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=Gish+Gallop 


Viscerality is high. The contending sides hate each other more than they
care about the issues that provide pretexts.
 -- Fred Reed, "Fred On Everything" 


There's a saying in Chinese: "此地无银三百两 (300 ounces of silver are not
buried here)", meaning that when someone goes to the trouble of making a
seemingly unnecessary and oddly specific statement, the opposite is usually
true...


We don't see the world as it is, we see the world as we are. 


Yiddishe insults:
Chamchamooleh (vicious peasant)
glomp (cabbage stalk)
Klots mit oygn (a wooden stick with eyes)
a shtik flaysh mit oygn (piece of meat with eyes)
a pots mit oyrn (penis with ears)
Kee mit eiter (cow with an udder)
makeh (abscess)
tshirik (pustule)
a shlak mina shumeivim (an evil nuisance visited on us by heaven)
meeskite (human embodiment of ugliness)
shmuck, pots, zoonev, vaydl, shvants... (penis)
ver geharget or ver dershtict, or ver vorgn or ver derstockn (get killed, get
suffocated, get choked, get stabbed)
kakn afn yam (shit on the sea)
A vister pigeerah af deer (a dismal animal death on you)


Kus Emmak - "Your mother's vagina".
Kus Ochtak - "Your sister's vagina".
Kus Rabbak - "Your god's vagina";
Yikhrib Beytak - "May your house be destroyed";
Yilaan Abuk - "May god curse your father";
Yilaan Dinak - "May god curse your religion";
Yibki Aleikah Bakah - "May your loved ones cry over you";

Folowup from an Arabic speaker:

Mos 'Ayri (مص عيري): "Suck my dick"
Ilhas Teezi (إلحس طيزي): "Lick my ass" (used in a similar manner to kiss my ass)
Kil Khara (كل خرى): "Eat Shit"
Yekhrab Baitak (يخرب بيتك): "(May God) destroy your home"
Ebn al Kalb/bin Kalb (بن كلب): "Son of a dog"
Gahbah (قحبة): "Bitch"
Weld Al Gahba (ولد القحبة): "Son of a bitch"
Aneek Emek (أنيك امك): "I fuck your mother"
Wild Al Haraam (ولد الحرام): "You illegitimate child"

Arabic translations for ones you listed to use with your Arab friends:

Kis Emek (كس أمك)
Kis Ocktak (كس اختك)
Kis Rabbak (كس ربك)
Yikhrib Baitak (يخرب بيتك)
Yil'an Abuk (يلعن أبوك)
Yil'an deenak (يلعن دينك)
Yibki Aleik Bakah (يبكي عليك بكى)

All these are off the top of my head, there's probably a lot more, but I haven't
had the chance to refresh my memory in a few months. Use nicely!

 -- Arabic cursing, by Noam Kaiser on Quora


"If the statistics are right, the Jews constitute but one quarter of one
percent of the human race. It suggests a nebulous puff of star dust lost in
the blaze of the Milky Way. Properly, the Jew ought hardly to be heard of,
but he is heard of, has always been heard of. He is as prominent on the
planet as any other people, and his importance is extravagantly out of
proportion to the smallness of his bulk. His contributions to the world's
list of great names in literature, science, art, music, finance, medicine
and abstruse learning are also very out of proportion to the weakness of
his numbers. He has made a marvelous fight in this world in all ages; and
has done it with his hands tied behind him. He could be vain of himself and
be excused for it.
 -- Mark Twain 


Boss: Why are you late?
Worker: I went for a haircut.
Boss: What, during working hours?
Worker: It grew during working hours.
Boss: It didn't *all* grow during working hours!
Worker: That's why I didn't get it all cut off!


"But if I give ideas for free, what if they could have made a billion
dollars?" Don't be a trickle of ideas. Become a fountain of ideas where
people come to make wishes and throw money in. 
 -- James Altucher 


Whoever I let hold me back, is more than happy to do it. Fact. That's how
they live. That's their oxygen. Don't feed them. 
 -- James Altucher 


Without volatility, you can slip into nothing.
 -- James Altucher 


"There's no material safety data sheet for Astatine. If there were it would
just be the word 'NO' scrawled over and over in charred blood."
 -- from "What If?" by Randall Munroe 


"There is no such thing as an independent press in America, if we except that of
little country towns. You know this and I know it. Not a man among you dares to
utter his honest opinion. Were you to utter it, you know beforehand that it
would never appear in print. I am paid one hundred and fifty dollars a week so
that I may keep my honest opinion out of the newspaper for which I write. You
too, are paid similar salaries for similar services. Were I to permit that a
single edition of my newspaper contained an honest opinion, my occupation - like
Othello's - would be gone in less than twenty-four hours. The man who would be
so foolish as to write his honest opinion would soon be on the streets in search
of another job. It is the duty of the New York journalist to lie, to distort, to
revile, to toady at the feet of Mammon, and to sell his country and his race for
his daily bread - or, what amounts to the same thing, his salary. We are the
tools and the vessels of the rich behind the scenes. We are marionettes. These
men pull the strings and we dance. Our time, our talents, our lives, our
capacities are all the property of these men. We are intellectual prostitutes."
 -- (John Swinton, former Chief of Staff of the New York Times, quoted by T. St.
  John Gaffney in "Breaking The Silence", p. 4) 


"In March 1915 the JP Morgan interests were steel, ship-building and powder.
Their subsidiary organisations got together 12 men high up in the newspaper
world and employed them to select the most influential newspapers in the USA,
and a sufficient number of them to control generally the policy of the daily
press.  They found it was only necessary to purchase the control of 15 of the
greatest papers. An agreement was reached; the policy of the papers was bought
to be paid for by the month; an editor was furnished for each paper to properly
supervise and edit information regarding the questions of preparedness,
militarism, financial policies and other things of national and international
nature considered vital to the interests of the purchasers." 
 -- US Congressional Record (Vol. 54, 9 February 1917, p. 2947)


If your business is not on the Internet, then your business will be out of
business.
 -- Bill Gates 


This is why video has taken over marketing, because you can control the
pitch, you can control the story. It used to be, with text, people would
come to your site and they'd skim all over the place. You had to write for
skimmers, right? Now we get to control the pitch a little bit. That's why
they don't put controls on videos a lot of times. It's annoying as hell,
but nobody gives it up because it converts better because you don't want
people stopping and getting out of it. You need to create the science, the
sharing, this synchronous brain effect going, and it's all because of
story.
 -- Kevin Rogers 


60-second sales hook: Identity / struggle / discovery / surprise (result)
 -- Kevin Rogers 


When someone says "No", smile and keep on providing them with more and more
reasons to move forward.
 -- Grant Cardone 


Good stuff is the ultimate scarcity. And the market for it is basically
infinite. That is why the people who have it command insane, illogical
compensation for it.
 -- Ryan Holiday 


When you allow sunk costs to become your religion, you end up with a sunk
life. Learn from what got you here, but live into what will get you there. 


During the quarter century of the Progressive Era, a new idea of progress
dominated both parties. The Kantian liberal idea of progress had been
laissez faire, or "let things proceed through the initiative of the
people." The progressive Hegelian idea of progress was Reform: "Get some
experts in here to tell people what to do and fix this mess of everybody
doing as they please." In a nutshell, the bottom-up approach of liberalism
versus the top-down approach of progressivism.
 -- Charles Tips, Quora 


Don't learn by experience. Study, observe, and create experiences instead.
 -- Grant Cardone, "The Closer's Survival Guide" 


If you're not getting what you want, then you either don't know what you
want, or you don't know how to get it.
 -- Grant Cardone, "The Closer's Survival Guide" 


The concept of justice in the progressive view is social justice, a
high-sounding phrase grounded in a number of considerations such as race,
gender, sexual-orientation, historical relationship to colonialism and so
on, all of which are mutable and subject to higher or lower value at the
whim of the political class.
 -- Charles Tips, Quora 


Today, more than 80 million legal gunowners killed absolutely nobody. 


Life lesson #1: Insecurity is immune to disproof.
Life lesson #2: Healthy human beings want agency and some level of say over how
their relationships look.
 -- Franklin Veaux, Quora 


"People don't buy products; they buy better versions of themselves."
 -- Samuel Hulick


There are two kinds of people in the world: those who feel pressure, and
those who apply pressure. Only one gets what they want out of life. 


I do my groceries at a supermarket that is beset by people selling
newspaper subscriptions, collecting for charities, seeking signatures and
donations for petitions, giving out flyers or flogging HelloFresh boxes
with bio-organic meals. Most of the time I just shake my head and walk
past, but sometimes I just feel harassed. So someone came up to me with a
clipboard and his 'Can I ask you something?' and I said, 'Do I look
approachable to you?' He looked confused, then nodded. I smiled at him and
said, 'It's a trait shared with serial killers. You might end up in
someone's basement.' The guy paled and walked away.
 -- Martyn V. Halm, Quora 


1. As soon as possible, get the product ready to test.

2. Test it as aggressively and creatively as you can. Spend 80 percent of your
initial resources discovering the most cost-effective way to make the first sale
(your Optimum Selling Strategy).

3. Refine and adjust your sales process as market conditions change. At the same
time, gradually develop business procedures to service your customers and
improve your products according to their buying preferences.
 -- Mark Ford, "Ready, Fire, Aim!" 


The melodramatic imagination's obsession with helpless victims and powerful
predators is what's shaping the conversation of the moment, to the
detriment of those whose interests are supposedly being protected, namely
students. The result? Students' sense of vulnerability is skyrocketing.
 -- Laura Kipnis, "Sexual Paranoia Strikes Academe" 


"Speak from that place in your heart where you are most yourself. Speak
directly, simply, lovingly, gently, and without apologies. Tell us what you
see and want us to see; tell us what you hear and want us to hear... trust
your own heart. The words will come. There is nothing to fear. Those who
need you the most will help you the most."
 -- Henri J.M. Nouwen, "Life of the Beloved" 


We often point out that the phone you mostly play casual games on and keep
dropping in the toilet at bars is more powerful than all the computing we
used to go to space for decades. NASA had a huge staff of geniuses to
understand and care for their software. Your phone has you.
 -- Quinn, "Everything is Broken" 


"First be a professional - then be a virtuoso."
 -- Noam Kaiser, Israeli military saying 


...the sole way to wealth and increasing prosperity for all is Say's law, or
investment into the productivity cycle. Any nation that has become prosperous
(petroleum luck aside) has done so through the relentless application of it.
 -- Charles Tips, Quora 


Other people's heads are too wretched a place for true happiness to have
its seat.
 -- Arthur Schopenhauer 


I know that a number of people don't agree with my choices, but they're
choices I've made in good faith. Whatever happens to the world in my
lifetime, wherever the future takes us, I can take some solace in knowing
that it won't be because I bought into the same lies that so many people do
- that events are outside our control, that no single person can really
make a difference, that we lack the personal agency to change our lives
(and those around us), and that if only we don't make a fuss, someone else
will step in and fix things for us.
 -- Adrián Lamo, on Quora 


You don't have to be great to start, but you have to start to be great.
 -- Zig Ziglar 


Whatever got you to where you are today is not enough to get you any
further.
 -- Brian Tracy 


When someone start changing their story on the fly, I take that as a clear
signal that there's nothing further to be gained from continuing the
conversation. Have a good night, and thanks for trying.
 -- me, on Quora 


The world breaks everyone and afterward many are strong at the broken
places. But those that will not break it kills. It kills the very good and
the very gentle and the very brave impartially. If you are none of these
you can be sure that it will kill you too but there will be no special
hurry.
 -- Ernest Hemingway, "A Farewell to Arms" 


People being 98% chimpanzee, this stuff happens all the time in hierarchies
like the military. More paranoia, since you have no idea when this stuff is
gonna happen or what shape it will take. I personally have no idea whether
the two guys in the above stories were motivated by malice, laziness or
honest error. The military's ideal platonic structure gets pretty ragged
and fractal when it meets chaotic human reality, and sometimes your crank
gets caught in the machinery. It's not the rule, but it happens
unpredictably enough that it's in the back of your mind.
 -- Boris Kogan, Quora 


"If we were born where they were born, and brought up the way they were
brought up, we would believe what they believe."
 -- engraved in stone on a church in Ireland 


Ek chota sa lamha hai        There is a small span of time
Woh khatam nahi hota         but it never ends
Main Lakh Jalatha hoon       I tried burning it a million times
Woh Bhasm nahi hota          but it never turns in to ashes
 -- Gulzaar


You need to develop an air of superiority. You need what Dan Kennedy calls,
"controlled self-confidence, bordering on arrogance." Basically, everything
your mother told you was wrong.
 -- Craig Ballantyne 


[In a management role,] No one likes a tyrant; no one respects a
milquetoast and everyone despises a clown currying popularity.
 -- Jay Bazzinotti 


El Valiente Vive Hasta Que El Cobarde Quiere (The brave man lives
as long as the coward allows.)
 -- old Spanish saying 


It should be noted that prior to the productivity cycle making "make wealth" the
superior strategy, "take wealth" made more sense as for millennia pay for a
person's labor (for a loooong day) averaged out at $3.00 (in today's money). No
wonder no one got ahead, except by conquest, plunder, rapine, and piracy. Or as
Victor Hugo put it at the dawn of the age of free enterprise, "Behind every
great fortune is a great crime."
 -- Charles Tips, Quora 


Control what you can, cope with what you can't, and concentrate on what
counts. 


For many of us, the biggest gains in productivity do not come from
following a specific methodology for "getting things done." It comes from
erecting transaction costs to nonproductive behavior.
 -- Matt Might 


The least-resistance philosophy dictates that you should mold your
environment so that the path of least resistance is the path of maximum
productivity. The core principles are eliminating barriers to engaging in
productive behavior and erecting barriers to engaging in counter-productive
behavior.
 -- Matt Might 


We must all wear out or rust out, everyone of us. My choice is to wear out.
 -- Teddy Roosevelt 


It's not your fault ... but it might be your responsibility. That's a fork
in the road on the way to becoming a professional.
 -- Seth Godin 


"Use your best judgment, care about your impact, do work that matters..."
are significantly more powerful instructions than, "Do it this way. Say it
this way. Behave the way I told you to."
 -- Seth Godin 


The impossible conflict of feeling reluctance to do that which was
right - wasn't it the basic formula of moral corruption?
 -- Ayn Rand, "Atlas Shrugged" 


Cannibals prefer those who have no spines.
 -- Stanislaw Lem 


Go through the Yellow Pages (while they still exist), page by page, line by
line, and see what you can provide as a service for the businesses
advertising there. I promise you, they're all looking for someone to come
along, kiss their world, and make it better. Think like an entrepreneur at
all times. Remember that there is an infinite desire for goods and services
on the part of the 6 billion other people on the planet. Find out how you
can give them what they want, and the money will roll in.
 -- Doug Casey 


I hold that the first acid test of an executive is his ability to think and
act for himself. He should have the intelligence and ability to originate
ideas, develop plans, implement programs, solve problems, and meet
situations without running constantly to his superiors for advice. In my
opinion, a man who cannot do these things is not an executive. He is a
glorified office boy.
 -- J. Paul Getty, "How to Be Rich" 


On Team D we ask two questions:
#1: Are we in integrity, doing something good and useful? Yes? Great!
Then we proceed to question #2: How do we move boatloads of our goodness?
 -- Danielle LaPorte 


Resentment kills your money mojo. Bitching about the cost of doing business
and living life the way you want to is wasted precious energy. Spend that
energy on saving, earning more, and living to the fullest within your
means.
 -- Danielle LaPorte 


It's now very common to hear people say, 
"I'm rather offended by that."
As if that gives them certain rights. 

It's actually nothing more than a whine.

"I find that offensive."
It has no meaning;
it has no purpose;
it has no reason to be respected as a phrase.

"I am offended by that."
Well, so fucking what?

 -- Stephen Fry 


"Just because you can do something, doesn't mean you do do it."
 -- Evan Troyka's "Do-Do Postulate", (c) 1997


True happiness and satisfaction can only come from within. It doesn't come
from a bag or a box, a store, a car, a restaurant or on TV. We must replace
"living to eat" with something else more meaningful in our life. We must
overcome eating out of boredom or eating to satisfy other unmet desires.
Use a food journal to document what you eat, why you eat, where you eat,
who drives you to eat, and how you feel after you eat. Learn, apply the
lessons, make the right changes, implement new habits to replace the habits
that do not serve you and your goals, and always start your day with the
best meal possible, full of protein, fiber, and fresh fruits and
vegetables. Stay positive, look at every day and every meal as a learning
experience...and become the best "student of yourself" that you can. Look
at every stumble as the greatest gift...a learning experience to become
better. You can change and achieve your goals. I believe in you. Your time
is now.
 -- Craig Ballantyne 


September 22, 2015. Dear Diary: this day was spent yak-shaving. Result:
zero wool, but lots of puzzled-looking yaks. 

There's a certain plaintive air of "but *why*?" around the proceedings,
which lends it a certain pathos and perhaps a bit of charm. We have yet to
traverse the forbidding passes of MapReduce Mountains and the Caves of
Oozie... the green fields of Hive and Impala lie just beyond, but seem
unattainably distant. Shall I ever see my beloved $HOME again? 
 -- GeekBilbo (me!), on the Cloudera Skype chat


[...] there seems to be a dark human compulsion to take the best man around,
declare him a god, and then scrutinize him like a hawk for the sign of
human weakness that will allow us to slay him. Something in us likes to
watch the mighty topple, and most especially the good mighty.
 -- Spider Robinson, in a tribute to Robert Heinlein 


But today's society is characterized by achievement orientation, and
consequently it adores people who are successful and happy and, in
particular, it adores the young. It virtually ignores the value of all
those who are otherwise, and in so doing blurs the decisive difference
between being valuable in the sense of dignity and being valuable in the
sense of usefulness. If one is not cognizant of this difference and holds
that an individual's value stems only from his present usefulness, then,
believe me, one owes it only to personal inconsistency not to plead for
euthanasia along the lines of Hitler's program, that is to say, ‘mercy'
killing of all those who have lost their social usefulness, be it because
of old age, incurable illness, mental deterioration, or whatever handicap
they may suffer. Confounding the dignity of man with mere usefulness arises
from conceptual confusion that in turn may be traced back to the
contemporary nihilism transmitted on many an academic campus and many an
analytical couch.
 -- Viktor E. Frankl, "Man's Search for Meaning"


Q. What is the difference between a Harley and a Hoover?
A. The location of the dirt bag.


When your outgo exceeds your income, your upkeep becomes your downfall.
 -- Rick Rule 


The watchers always forget that the watchers need watching more than the
watched.
 -- Anne W. Zahra, on Quora 


I hate the word homophobia. It's not a phobia. You are not scared. You are an
asshole.
 -- Morgan Freeman


WHO said it could not be done? And what great victories has he to his credit
which qualify him to judge others accurately?
 -- Napoleon Hill


In the end, if you take anything away from this, I hope it's the same
lesson I learned to apply in all areas of my life: be honest, be
respectful, and don't take shit from anyone. It's not a bad way to live
your life, even outside a jail.
 -- Levi Wilder, Corrections officer (Quora) 


Noli Timere Messorum (Don't Fear the Reaper)
 -- Pratchett family motto 


Reality never came with any warranty, express or implied, for consistency.
You can pick a little from column A and a little from column B, but at the
end of the day no one makes the hard choices for you. Only you. And once
you do, you accept and live with them. It's not a great deal, but it's the
best one life has on offer.
 -- Adrian Lamo, Quora 


Religion comes begging to us, when it can no longer burn us.
 -- Heinrich Heine 


Today is difficult, tomorrow is much more difficult, the day after tomorrow
is very beautiful, but most die tomorrow evening.
 -- Jack Ma 


In the trailer for the first Trek movie (below, the finest trailer ever
made, period... in my opinion) when Kirk stands up and says, "Yeah we
do." (minute 2:10-ish) I remember having to choke back tears. Look. I love
scifi. My dad gets choked up watching "Old Yeller". People have what moves
them and I'm not afraid to say what moves me.
 -- Dan Holiday, Quora 


The three worst things in life: lose your parents when you're young; lose
your mate when you're strong; lose your children when you're old.
 -- Chinese proverb 


You ask, What is our policy? I will say; It is to wage war, by sea, land
and air, with all our might and with all the strength that God can give us:
to wage war against a monstrous tyranny, never surpassed in the dark
lamentable catalogue of human crime. That is our policy. You ask, What is
our aim? I can answer with one word: Victory - victory at all costs,
victory in spite of all terror, victory however long and hard the road may
be; for without victory there is no survival.
 -- Winston Churchill 


Всю Россию вверг еврей
в мерзость и неразбериху;
вот как может воробей
изнасиловать слониху.
 -- Игорь Губерман


Doubt is an uncomfortable condition, but certainty is a ridiculous one.
 -- Voltaire 


I cannot convey enough about the immensity of the fuck that I do not give
about [...] 
 -- seen on Quora


If you plunder from west to east you are great like Alexander. if you do
the same from east to west you are a barbarian like Chengiz.
 -- Javed Akthar, Quora


Век принес уроки всякие,
но один - венец всему:
ярче солнца светят факелы,
уводящие во тьму.
 -- Игорь Губерман


Слой человека в нас чуть-чуть 
наслоен зыбко и тревожно,
легко в скотину нас вернуть, 
поднять обратно очень сложно.
 -- Игорь Губерман


Я молодых, в остатках сопель, 
боюсь, трясущих жизнь, как грушу,
в душе темно у них, как в жопе, 
а в жопе - зуд потешить душу.
 -- Игорь Губерман


As a problem solving technique its main virtue was consistency; it didn't
work but at least it kept on not working, so you knew where you stood.
 -- Tom Holt in "Snow White and the Seven Samurai"


Five percent of the people think; ten percent of the people think they
think; and the other eighty-five percent would rather die than think.
 -- Thomas A. Edison 


Some part of our being knows this is where we came from. We long to return.
And we can. Because the cosmos is also within us. We're made of star-stuff.
We are a way for the cosmos to know itself.
 -- Carl Sagan 


We make our world significant by the courage of our questions and by the
depth of our answers.
 -- Carl Sagan 


It is impossible for me to be insulted or abused in any way. For I do
naught that deserves censure, and I care not for what is reported falsely.
As for the emperors who are dead and gone, they will avenge themselves in
case anyone does them a wrong, if in very truth they are demigods and
possess any power.
 -- Titus Flavius Caesar Vespasianus Augustus 


Religion is an insult to human dignity. With or without it you would have
good people doing good things and evil people doing evil things. But for
good people to do evil things, that takes religion.
 -- Steven Weinberg, Nobel prize winner in Physics 


It was, of course, a lie what you read about my religious convictions, a
lie which is being systematically repeated. I do not believe in a personal
God and I have never denied this but have expressed it clearly. If
something is in me which can be called religious then it is the unbounded
admiration for the structure of the world so far as our science can reveal
it.
 -- Albert Einstein 


Семиголовый восьмихуй с четырьмя пиздопроебинами
Сучемандаблядный попользованный недодрочник-геморрой
Низкопиздорезый мокросвиноёбанный кривогнойник
Аналоговноблудный промудоблядский кретин
Блядотроезвонный пиздоголовый мандасрач
Еблисвиноблудный страхопиздогнойник
Найвыебенищее распиздоблядство!
Склипездень двужопостворчатый
Облямудевшая страпиздихуюлина
Трипиздоблядский мандопроеб
Пидарастический мудаблядин
Хуеблядская пиздопроебина
Трипездоклятый мудопроеб
Злоебучее страхопиздище
Кривоблядский скотожоп
Мудагавнопердь

Стоебучее страхопиздище охуевающее в собственной пидарастической злоебучести

Промудохуеблядская пиздопроебина, невьебенно охуевающая от своей собственной
облядипизденелости

Трипиздоблядское мудопроебное трипиздие, ебоблядище охуевающее от собственной
злоебучести

Облямуденный злоебучий страхопизднутый трихуемандаблядский ебаквакнутый
распиздоеб... (сказал боцман и грязно выругался).

Да разъебись ты триебучим проебом, промондоблядское хуепуполо залупоглазое

Да разъебись ты тризлоебучим пропиздом тримандаблядская пиздопроушина охуевающая
от собственного блядского невъебения!


"[1] Learn a lot about things that matter, then [2] work on problems that
interest you [3] with people you like and respect."
 -- Paul Graham, on entrepreneurship 


If it's your job to eat a frog, it's best to do it first thing in the
morning. And If it's your job to eat two frogs, it's best to eat the
biggest one first.
 -- Mark Twain 


The default position in any debate is whatever both parties in the debate
can agree on. The more improbable the hypothesis, the greater the need for
justification. The common ground will be everything that appears to the
debaters to be true, such as the existence of the physical universe. It is
the theist who wants to go beyond it and posit the existence of a
transcendent being that stands in greater need of justification. Atheism
doesn't require defense because it is up to theists bear the burden of
proof of something implausible. 


"[It seems most strange that] the Creator of Heaven and Earth resorted to the
womb of a certain Jewish lady, grew there for nine months and was born as an
infant, and afterwards grew up and was betrayed into the hands of his enemies
who sentenced him to death and executed him, and that afterwards... he came to
life and returned to his original place. The mind of a Jew, or any other person,
simply cannot tolerate these assertions. If you have listened all your life to
the priests who have filled your brain and the marrow of your bones with this
doctrine, then it has settled into you because of that accustomed habit. [I
would argue that if you were hearing these ideas for the first time, now, as a
grown adult], you would never have accepted them."
 -- Rabbi Nahmanides (Ramban) at the Disputation of Barcelona, 1263 


We are not taught to say "no." We are taught not to say "no." "No" is rude.
"No" is a rebuff, a rebuttal, a minor act of verbal violence. "No" is for
drugs and strangers with candy. 


The Patrician took a sip of his beer. "I have told this to few people,
gentlemen, and I suspect I never will again, but one day when I was a young
boy on holiday in Uberwald I was walking along the bank of a stream when I
saw a mother otter with her cubs. A very endearing sight, I'm sure you will
agree, and even as I watched, the mother otter dived into the water and
came up with a plump salmon, which she subdued and dragged on to a
half-submerged log. As she ate it, while of course it was still alive, the
body split and I remember to this day the sweet pinkness of its roes as
they spilled out, much to the delight of the baby otters who scrambled over
themselves to feed on the delicacy. One of nature's wonders, gentlemen:
mother and children dining upon mother and children. And that's when I
first learned about evil. It is built into the very nature of the universe.
Every world spins in pain. If there is any kind of supreme being, I told
myself, it is up to all of us to become his moral superior.
 -- Terry Pratchett 


Narrated Abu Huraira: Allah's Apostle said, "The Hour will not be
established until you fight with the Jews, and the stone behind which a Jew
will be hiding will say. "O Muslim! There is a Jew hiding behind me, so
kill him."
 -- Sahih Bukhari, 52:177 


The question I get asked by religious people all the time is, without God,
what's to stop me from raping all I want? And my answer is: I do rape all I
want. And the amount I want is zero. And I do murder all I want, and the
amount I want is zero. The fact that these people think that if they didn't
have this person watching over them that they would go on killing, raping
rampages is the most self-damning thing I can imagine.
 -- Penn Jillette 


I am not what you think I am. I am not what I think I am. I am what I
think you think I am.
 -- Rick Bruno on Quora, as an answer to "Why are we different when we are alone
    and when we have people around us?" 


You are not in the business you are in - you are in the business of
marketing the business you are in.
 -- Jeff Paul / Dan Kennedy 


Now, there's this about cynicism, Sergeant. It's the universe's most
supine moral position. Real comfortable. If nothing can be done, then
you're not some kind of shit for not doing it, and you can lie there and
stink to yourself in perfect peace.
 -- Lois McMaster Bujold 


It's only been 200 years or so - an eye blink - that "scientific
enlightenment" began waging its rebellion against the nearly universal
pattern called feudalism, a hierarchic system that ruled our ancestors in
every culture that developed both metallurgy and agriculture. Wherever
human beings acquired both plows and swords, gangs of large men picked up
the latter and took other men's women and wheat. (Sexist language is
meaningfully accurate here; those cultures had no word for "sexism," it was
simply assumed.) They then proceeded to announce rules and "traditions"
ensuring that their sons would inherit everything.
 -- David Brin, in Salon magazine 


A three year old is basically a giant pylon of virgin mitochondria soaking
up and releasing energy.
 --Jason Coston, Quora 


The thing with peace is, that you have to make it with enemies.
And them thinking like you, cannot be a precondition.
 -- Noam Kaiser, Quora


A casual stroll through the lunatic asylum shows that faith does not prove
anything.
 -- Nietzsche 


Psychology of religion:
 
1. There is not enough significance in being finite.
2. I want the security that mommy-daddy provided for me.
3. I want to have someone else be responsible for the conditions around me.
4. I want to stop thinking about questions to which there are no answers.
5. I want to be comfortable in conformity.
6. I want everyone to agree.

 -- William Ranger, Quora


(Sanskrit) Om sarve bhavantu sukhinah. Sarve santu niraamayaah. Sarve bhadraani
pashyantu. Maa kaschid dukhbhaag bhavet.
(English) May all beings be happy. May all beings be healthy. May all beings
experience prosperity. May none in the world suffer. 


People either lack the skills, the motivation, the risk-taking, or the
arrogance (to go into business.)
 -- Robert Languay, Quora 


There is a ancient Sanskrit saying, usually said before taking a meal:
'Annadata Sukhi Bhava'. It means "Let all those associated with the food
in front of me be happy; farmer, retailer, cook... I pray for for their
prosperity."
 -- Shrikant Badhe, Quora 


Between what is said and not meant,
and what is meant, and not said,
most of love is lost.
 -- Khalil Gibran


Science flies you to the moon.
Religion flies you into buildings.


Stay wary and protect yourselves... but also be optimistic and eager and
friendly. Rancor in the heart never helps. Be pragmatic. Thrive.
 -- David Brin, on Quora


Let not him who is houseless pull down the house of another, but let him
work diligently and build one for himself, thus by example assuring that
his own shall be safe from violence when built.
 -- Abraham Lincoln 


A good general rule I've discovered is the "fuck yeah or no" rule. That
means, if someone is lukewarm about being with you (or if you're lukewarm
about being with them), say no.
 -- Franklin Veaux, on Quora 


Autonomy
Mastery
Making a contribution
 -- the most powerful driving forces in tech today


My definition of an entrepreneur is someone who steals office supplies from
home and brings them to work.
 -- Auren Hoffman, on Quora 


Programming is easy like riding a bike. Except the bike is on fire and
you're on fire and everything is on fire and you're actually in hell.
 -- Jurgen on Twitter 


If you find yourself in a fair fight, you didn't plan your mission
properly.
 -- David Hackworth 


Every human interaction is an exercise in mutual conditioning.
 -- Jason Coston, Quora 


"Reason is the greatest enemy that faith has; it never comes to the aid of
spiritual things, but more frequently than not struggles against the divine
Word, treating with contempt all that emanates from God."
 -- Martin Luther 


Don't sell the product - sell the story.
 -- Kevin Harrington 


If you are a really diligent worker who charges by the hour, you have
100,000 hours to sell in your lifetime, give or take. What can you average
per hour over your lifetime? That's your earning capacity. But what if you
have three or eight or eighty-eight employees working for you? Now it's
quite a bit more open-ended, yes? And for every working hour you have, you
will have about six times that number as your total life. Money...
equity... can be earning 24/7/52. It can be earning even while you're
sleeping or on vacation or working. If you can average a dollar of interest
an hour, that's the same as an extra $6 an hour in wages. If you want to
earn wealth as a capitalist, you have to build a grubstake and put it at
risk.
 -- Charles Tips 


I am but one, but I am one. I cannot do everything, but I can do something
and I will not let what I cannot do stop me from doing what I can do.
 -- Edward Everett Hale 


That's the way to get rewarded. Financially. With relationships. With
health. Everything else is myth.
 -- James Altucher, Quora 


"The word god is for me nothing more than the expression and product of
human weaknesses, the Bible a collection of honourable, but still primitive
legends which are nevertheless pretty childish. No interpretation no matter
how subtle can (for me) change this."
 -- Albert Einstein 


If someone tells me I've hurt their feelings I say 'I'm still waiting to
hear what your point is.'
 -- Christopher Hitchens 


You say you love rain, but you use an umbrella to walk under it. You say
you love sun, but you seek shelter when it is shining. You say you love
wind, but when it comes you close your windows. So that's why I'm scared
when you say you love me.
 -- Bob Marley 


Never make a decision when you are angry.
Never make a promise when you are happy. 
 -- Karal Bansal, 19, on Quora


"Software is getting slower more rapidly than hardware becomes
faster."
 -- Wirth's Law 


A fellow had just been hired as the new CEO of a large high tech corporation.
The CEO who was stepping down met with him privately and presented him with
three numbered envelopes. "Open these if you run up against a problem you don't
think you can solve," he said. Well, things went along pretty smoothly, but six
months later, sales took a downturn and he was really catching a lot of heat.
About at his wits's end, he remembered the envelopes. He went to his drawer and
took out the first envelope. The message read, "Blame your predecessor." The new
CEO called a press conference and tactfully laid the blame at the feet of the
previous CEO. Satisfied with his comments, the press -- and Wall Street --
responded positively, sales began to pick up and the problem was soon behind
him. About a year later, the company was again experiencing a slight dip in
sales, combined with serious product problems. Having learned from his previous
experience, the CEO quickly opened the second envelope. The message read,
"Reorganize." This he did, and the company quickly rebounded. After several
consecutive profitable quarters, the company once again fell on difficult times.
The CEO went to his office, closed the door and opened the third envelope. The
message said, "Prepare three envelopes." 


1) What am I going to focus on?
2) What does it mean?
3) What am I going to do with it?
 -- Tony Robbins, on resourcefulness and motivations


Biography is not destiny. Decision is the ultimate power.
 -- Tony Robbins 


People will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but
people will never forget how you made them feel.
 -- Maya Angelou 


[Real estate] is 100% a people business; perception is reality, first
impressions matter, and building trust is essential.
 -- Brandon Lee, Quora 


When the facts change, I change my opinion. What do you do, sir?
 -- John Maynard Keynes 


Down on the street we know that people with guns get to do anything they
want. The reason is because they have guns. People without guns get to be
told what to do. The reason? No guns.
 -- Josh Manson, Quora 


The only time you should look at your neighbor's plate is to make sure that
they have enough. 


Monk:     "Everyday we do work. For whom do we do it?"
Master:   "There is someone who requires it."
Monk:     "Then why not let that person do it?"
Master:   "He has no tools."


If you are deliberately trying to create a future that feels safe, you
will willfully ignore the future that is likely.
 -- Seth Godin 


Structure your pitch so that even if your competition delivers it, the customer
will still buy from you.
 -- Ted McKenna, CEB 


Joy threatens unconsciousness.
 -- Danielle LaPorte 


If we're going to go the culture tolerance route of "nobody is wrong, just
different", then I think it's up to OP to make their own decision. If they
instead turn to a public forum like Quora for advice, they'll get it, and
they have.
 -- David Frye, Quora 


You should get paid the most for the things that come easiest to you.
 -- Adam Urbanski 


People have a hard time letting go of their suffering. Out of a fear of
the unknown, they prefer suffering that is familiar.
 -- Thich Nhat Hanh 


Today's 'best practices' lead to dead ends; the best paths are new and
untried.
 -- Peter Thiel, Zero to One 


Don't save what is left after spending; spend what is left after saving.
 -- Warren Buffett 


"Freedom" and "responsibility" are erroneously separate English words for
the same thing.
 -- Janis Froehlig, Quora 


Care about what other people think and you will always be their prisoner.
 -- Lao Tzu 


Focusing on the money part killed me. I used to think having money solves
your money problems. The reality is: money magnifies every problem you've
ever had, and makes it worse until you find meaning and mastery.
 -- James Altucher 


People can be paid in three ways: in money, in mastery, or in meaning, and
ideally you want to be paid in all three.
 -- Adam Braun 


Everybody is a genius. But if you judge a fish by its ability to climb a
tree, it will live its whole life believing that it is stupid.
 -- Einstein 


We always determine our self-worth by comparing our behind-the-scenes
bloopers to someone else's highlight reel. This is why we have issues
with our self-esteem. 


Real progress in a startup means:

    building your product
    validating product-market fit
    talking with customers
    getting customers to pay you
    building your personal network
    building relationships with investors


Short story: [S]he [be]lie[ve]d.


Anxiety will never solve tomorrow's problems but it will definitely take
your energy away today. And for creatives, energy is our primary resource.
You only get today to use it. Thousands of candles can be lit from the fire
of a single candle and that candle won't die. Be that candle.
 -- James Altucher, Quora 


...You can now deliver value. You can now live another day. The gatekeepers
can no longer hold you hostage. They keep you in slavery by paying you
"just enough", by teasing you with a promotion you'll never get, by scaring
you with the thought you might not pay your mortgage, or have a happy
retirement. They are against you choosing yourself. But that's your choice,
not theirs.
 -- James Altucher on Quora


A ship in port is safe, but that's not what ships are built for.
 -- Grace Hopper, US Navy Admiral and Computer Scientist 


Don't do something just for the money. Money is a side effect of
persistence. You persist in things you are interested in. Explore your
interests. Then persist. Then enjoy all the side effects.
 -- James Altucher 


A good story, like any story ever told, starts with a problem, goes through
the painful process of solving the problem, and has a solution that is
better than anything ever seen before.
 -- James Altucher 


If two people believe in the same story they might be thousands of miles
apart and total strangers but they still have a sense they can trust each
other.
 -- James Altucher 


Exceptional founding teams usually have three major roles: (1) Visionary,
(2) Hustler and (3) an Engineer.
 -- Matthew Miller, Quora 


Don't think up startup ideas. Notice them.
 -- Paul Graham 


We are a plot-oriented species, in perpetual need of satisfying conclusions
to our stories.
 -- Neil Strauss, "Emergency" 


The best revenge is to not be like that.
 -- Ryan Holiday


"I cannot offer you money, position, or fame. I offer you in their place work -
hard, hard, work - the task of bringing a people from degradation, poverty, and
waste to full personhood." 
 -- Booker T. Washington recruiting George Washington Carver to the Tuskegee Institute


Great influencers don't push; they pull.
 -- Bob Burg 


I divide my officers into four classes; the clever, the lazy, the
industrious, and the stupid. Each officer possesses at least two of these
qualities. Those who are clever and industrious are fitted for the highest
staff appointments. Use can be made of those who are stupid and lazy. The
man who is clever and lazy however is for the very highest command; he has
the temperament and nerves to deal with all situations. But whoever is
stupid and industrious is a menace and must be removed immediately!
 -- General Kurt von Hammerstein


We are not evaluated or rewarded based on intellect or education but on
actual skills, especially social skills.
 -- Charles Tips on Quora 


Because nobody really knows anything. The laws of physics change every few
years. [...] Nobody knows anything about health, sex, love, atoms, and biology.
Nobody knows anything about economics and finance. We're all monkeys that have
been given typewriters by some extradimensional alien race and the joke is on us.
 -- James Altucher, on Quora 


The entire art of the startup is figuring out how to keep the nickels
coming independently of treadmill time.
 -- Charles Tips, Quora 


History records that the money changers have used every form of abuse,
intrigue, deceit, and violent means possible to maintain their control
over governments by controlling the money and its issuance.
 --James Madison


Reason, observation, and experience; the holy trinity of science.
 -- Robert Green Ingersoll


Everyone has a plan 'till they get punched in the mouth.
 -- Mike Tyson


Reading from /dev/urandom is less expensive than reading a Packt book and every
bit as informative.
 -- Tom Wheeler


Lie to yourself to get work done. Cheat on yourself to achieve something
bigger. Steal knowledge. Kill bad habits.
 -- CamMi Pham, on Quora


We often point out that the phone you mostly play casual games on and keep
dropping in the toilet at bars is more powerful than all the computing we used
to go to space for decades. [The difference is,] NASA had a huge staff of
geniuses to understand and care for their software. Your phone has you.
 -- Quinn Norton, "Everything is Broken"


Чтоб мудро жизнь прожить, знать надобно немало.
Два важных правила запомни для начала:
Ты лучше голодай, чем что попало есть,
И лучше будь один, чем вместе с кем попало.
 -- Омар Хайам, перевод О. Б. Румера


Blame up, credit down.
 -- Mike Olson


The Great Kaan causeth the bark of trees, made into something like
paper, to pass for money all over his country... And nobody, however
important he may think himself, dares to refuse them on pain of death.
 -- Marco Polo


Keep it pointed to where you want to go.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


Update your preferences.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


Audit the rules you play by.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


Get your halo dirty.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


Your success will be in direct proportion to the quality of relationships in
your life.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


Be the gift you bring.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


Let go of the promises that you've outgrown.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


Your life purpose is what you say it is.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


Say what your soul needs to say.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


The Universe can't resist authenticity.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


Your fulfillment stems from your motives.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


Unhook.
Return the hook to where it came from.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


Do it for the love.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


Don't buy it.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, #truthbomb


What I wanted to say was this: "For the Love, Love. I can't solve all
your problems from up here (in fact, I can't solve any of them). Go easy
on me. And, newsflash: Life is really really hard and I never said this
consciousness shiz was easy. You gotta work for it, babe."

And, that's pretty much my response nowadays, delivered with sincere lightness
and Love. Because it's the truth. And I'd rather be me - the human me in great
shoes - than tap dance for the price of admission. And you know...

The truth always leads to the light. So just say it. 

 -- Danielle LaPorte


What you stop doing is just as important to your success as what you
start doing.
 -- Danielle LaPorte


Reframe your obligations into conscious choices and it will liberate
your self-agency.
 -- Danielle LaPorte


If you accept the expectations of others, especially negative ones,
then you will never change the outcome.
 -- Michael Jordan


This is why the wealthy originally outlawed local currencies: so you'd
have to borrow central currency at interest in order to do anything.
This was a great idea, because it allowed those who had money to make
money by having money, and that was the object of the game. And it would
work as long as our economy expanded faster and faster as it grew, so
more and more money could be paid back to the central treasury.
 -- Douglas Rushkoff


Originality is at a premium, and the human neural architecture isn't
optimized for it - we are, by disposition, a conservative species,
because in a static ecosystem, that provides the best return on sunk
reproductive investment costs.
 -- Charlie Stross, "Accelerando"


"I can get another if I break it/so a clay cup trumps a grail."
 -- Mirza Asadullah Khan Ghalib, Urdu poet


Бабуина интеллектом не задавишь.
 -- anekdot.ru


Question with boldness even the existence of a God; because, if there
be one, he must more approve of the homage of reason, than that of
blind-folded fear.
 -- Thomas Jefferson


If you refuse to open attachments you aren't going to be able to keep an
office job in the modern world. There's your choice: constantly risk
clicking on dangerous malware, or live under an overpass, leaving notes
on the lawn of your former house telling your children you love them and
miss them.
 -- "Everything Is Broken", http://medium.com


A lot of devices and services we have seen during our research should
never be connected to the public Internet at all. As a rule of thumb, if
you believe that "nobody would connect that to the Internet, really
nobody", there are at least 1000 people who did. Whenever you think
"that shouldn't be on the Internet but will probably be found a few
times" it's there a few hundred thousand times. Like half a million
printers, or a million Webcams, or devices that have 'root' as a root
password.
 -- http://internetcensus2012.bitbucket.org/paper.html, "Carna Botnet"


We hope other researchers will find the data we have collected useful
and that this publication will help raise some awareness that, while
everybody is talking about high class exploits and cyberwar, four simple
stupid default telnet passwords can give you access to hundreds of
thousands of consumer as well as tens of thousands of industrial devices
all over the world.
 -- http://internetcensus2012.bitbucket.org/paper.html, "Carna Botnet"


All I have in this world are my balls and my word, and I don't break
them for anybody.
 -- Scarface


The more things you customize, the more you put yourself in a corner
alone on what has undergone rigorous testing. Cloudera Manager makes it
easy to configure a lot of things, but the more you do, the greater the
likelihood that you have a completely unique cluster configuration that
may not have ever been tested before.
 -- Ben Spivey on the Cloudera Supporters list


1.01^365 = 37.8
0.99^365 = 0.03

1.02^365 = 1377.4
0.98^365 = 0.0006


We have now sunk to a depth at which restatement of the obvious is
the first duty of intelligent men.
 -- George Orwell


Prices and money are tools to improve the efficient distribution of
resources.
 -- seen on Quora


Nobody likes the smell of sorry.


Jesus is Santa Claus for adults.
 -- Christopher Hitchens


What can be asserted without proof can be dismissed without proof.
 -- Christopher Hitchens


В сексе евреи признают три позы:
1) так, как вчера ту шиксу в кино,
2) так, шоб не закружилась голова, и
3) так, шоб не разбудить маму...


The entire art of the startup is figuring out how to keep the nickels
coming independently of treadmill time.
 -- Charles Tips, Quora


Recently, for a history book, I got to interview a lot of physicians.
All gave lip service to the pride of working in a cutting-edge, rapidly
evolving field. Then they started telling their war stories: "When
beta-blockers came along, I lost my gastric surgeries, a third of my
practice. I almost went out of business." "Colonoscopy wiped out my
exploratory bowel surgeries. I had a very rough year."
 -- Charles Tips, Quora


The undeserving poor prefer not to know that they are responsible for
their own well being. Socialists take advantage of that by telling the
myth that evil capitalists cause all misfortune and that socialists can
and will make everything right.
 -- seen on Quora


The sound of Nature is mostly the sound of millions of animals, birds,
and insects desperately trying to get laid.


Keep your heart open, as wide open as you possibly can. Keep it so soft.
Let it be tender. FEEL EVERYTHING. Feel your feelings, share your
feelings. Keep your heart gentle, gentle, open, open. And then... put a
big fucking fence around it. Make it tall and make it strong. Ask your
angels to guard the gate for you at all times. Do not let anybody past
your gate unless their own heart is open and gentle. Only let in people
who are respectful, kind, interested and loving. Emphasis on respectful,
kind, interested and loving.
 -- Danielle LaPorte


If you don't design your own life plan, chances are you'll fall into
someone else's plan. And guess what they have planned for you? Not much.
 -- Jim Rohn


Dude, you're way too self-controlled. Respect. :) One thread up seems
like contrarian attention-baiting with extra bikeshedding sauce, but I
could be wrong.
 -- seen on Quora


The intuitive mind is a sacred gift and the rational mind is a faithful
servant. We have created a society that honors the servant and has
forgotten the gift.
 -- Albert Einstein


Correlation Does Not Imply Causation.
 -- any basic statistics text anywhere ever


In God we trust. All others must bring data.
 -- William Edwards Demmings


Data is the new oil.
 -- European Consumer Commissioner Meglena Kuneva


One of my favorite business model suggestions for [web] entrepreneurs
is to find an old UNIX command that hasn't yet been implemented on the
Web, and fix that.
 -- Marc Hedlund


Conflict exists to delineate and clarify "self" from "other."
 -- Danielle LaPorte


If you're in business, you should really only be working on delegating,
motivating, and selling.
 -- Bedros Keuilian 


If you want something you've never had, you have to do something you've
never done.


If any who read this are willing to learn, my comments are sufficient;
if not, an act of god would not serve.
 -- Bottom


Our security strategies have not yet caught up with the risks we are
facing. The globalization that has swept away the barriers to the
movement of goods, ideas and people has also swept with it barriers that
confined and localized security threats.
 -- Mohamed ElBaradei


Maintain a constant watch at all times against a dogmatical spirit: fix
not your assent to any proposition in a firm and unalterable manner,
till you have some firm and unalterable ground for it, and till you have
arrived at some clear and sure evidence.
 -- Isaac Watts


Life is a tragedy for those who feel, and a comedy for those who think.
 -- Jean de La Bruyère


If there is no struggle, there is no progress. Those who profess to
favor freedom, and yet deprecate agitation, are men who want crops
without plowing up the ground. They want rain without thunder and
lightning. They want the ocean without the awful roar of its many
waters. This struggle may be a moral one; or it may be a physical one;
or it may be both moral and physical; but it must be a struggle.
 -- Frederick Douglass


Even if we accept, as the basic tenet of true democracy, that one moron
is equal to one genius, is it necessary to go a further step and hold
that two morons are better than one genius?
 -- Leó Szilárd


...the hills and groves were God's first temples, and the more they are cut down
and hewn into cathedrals and churches, the farther off and dimmer seems the Lord
himself.
 -- John Muir


The opposite of love is not hate, it's indifference. The opposite of art
is not ugliness, it's indifference. The opposite of faith is not heresy,
it's indifference. And the opposite of life is not death, it's
indifference.
 -- Elie Wiesel


No matter how much women prefer to lean, to be protected and supported,
nor how much men desire to have them do so, they must make the voyage of
life alone, and for safety in an emergency they must know something of
the laws of navigation.
 -- Elizabeth Cady Stanton


Widespread intellectual and moral docility may be convenient for leaders
in the short term, but it is suicidal for nations in the long term. One
of the criteria for national leadership should therefore be a talent for
understanding, encouraging, and making constructive use of vigorous
criticism.
 -- Carl Sagan


Me, I shall be an autocrat: that is my trade; and The Good God will
forgive me: that is His.
 -- Catherine the Great


A great book should leave you with many experiences, and slightly
exhausted. You should live several lives while reading it.
 -- William Styron


I have always read that the world, both land and water, was spherical,
as the authority and researches of Ptolemy and all the others who have
written on this subject demonstrate and prove, as do the eclipses of the
moon and other experiments that are made from east to west, and the
elevation of the North Star from north to south.
 -- Christopher Columbus


We control fifty percent of a relationship. We influence one hundred
percent of it.
 -- Joyce Brothers


I hate a fellow whom pride or cowardice or laziness drives into a
corner, and who does nothing when he is there but sit and growl. Let him
come out as I do, and bark.
 -- Samuel Johnson


Try to learn to breathe deeply, really to taste food when you eat, and
when you sleep really to sleep. Try as much as possible to be wholly
alive with all your might, and when you laugh, laugh like hell. And when
you get angry, get good and angry. Try to be alive. You will be dead
soon enough.
 -- William Saroyan


Being inoffensive, and being offended, are now the twin addictions of
the culture.
 -- Martin Amis


When childhood dies, its corpses are called adults and they enter
society, one of the politer names of hell. That is why we dread
children, even if we love them. They show us the state of our decay.
 -- Brian Aldiss


The road to wisdom? - Well,
It's plain and simple to express:
Err and err and err again
But less and less and less.
 -- Piet Hein


Nationalism is an infantile disease. It is the measles of mankind.
 -- Albert Einstein


When others asked the truth of me, I was convinced it was not the truth
they wanted, but an illusion they could bear to live with.
 -- Anaïs Nin


Cloudera has pretty deep open source roots. This platform would never
have gotten this good or advanced this quickly if it had been owned by
one company; if we hadn't been able to bring together the genius of the
entire planet. It is my deep conviction that as a society, we're going
to attack really important problems in the next decade. And we're going
to do that with data. I know we're not going to cure cancer at Cloudera,
we're not going to feed 2 billion people, but we're going to make
software that lets the planet attack those problems in new ways.
 -- Mike Olson


A nation is a society united by a delusion about its ancestry and by common
hatred of its neighbors.
 -- William Ralph Inge


And in that state of nature, no arts; no letters; no society; and which
is worst of all, continual fear and danger of violent death; and the
life of man, solitary, poor, nasty, brutish, and short.
 --Thomas Hobbes, Leviathan


Now is the time to get serious about living your ideals. Once you have
determined the spiritual principles you wish to exemplify, abide by
these rules as if they were laws, as if it were indeed sinful to
compromise them. Don't mind if others don't share your convictions. How
long can you afford to put off who you really want to be?
 -- Epictetus, "The Art of Living"


The reason I have never bought a lottery ticket is that I don't want to
soil my belief system with fantasies of striking it rich through pure
luck.
 -- Robert Ringer


Nothing about Facebook makes sense until you view it as a well-honed system for
persuading you to check Facebook one more time.
 -- Tim Harford, The Undercover Economist


Fiat is the currency of the masses.
Gold is the currency of governments and elites.
Power/control is the currency of the Uber Elites.


When money speaks, truth is silent.


It's important (read: critical) to approach any technology with eyes
open. There's no silver bullet. There's no single solution that solves
all problems, and applies cleanly to all use cases, and anyone who tells
you so should immediately cause a mental red flag to ascend the highest
flag pole of the critical mind.
 -- Eric Sammer


Be very, very careful what you put into that head, because you will
never, ever get it out.
 -- Thomas Cardinal Wolsey (1471-1530)


We can neither confirm nor deny that your competitors product sucks.
 -- Cloudera customer, about DataStax


I think that's how Chicago got started. A bunch of people in New York said,
"Gee, I'm enjoying the crime and the poverty, but it just isn't cold
enough. Let's go west."
 -- Richard Jeni


I have struck a city - a real city - and they call it Chicago. [...] I
urgently desire never to see it again. It is inhabited by savages.
 -- Rudyard Kipling, 1891 


Training is standup comedy with the computer as the straight man.
 -- Bruce Tannenbaum, Cloudera


И в каждом из юмористических рассказов Антона Павловича я слышу тихий,
глубокий вздох чистого, истинно-человеческого сердца, безнадежный вздох
сострадания к людям, которые не умеют уважать свое человеческое достоинство
и, без сопротивления подчиняясь грубой силе, живут, как рабы, ни во что не
верят, кроме необходимости каждый день хлебать возможно более жирные щи, и
ничего не чувствуют, кроме страха, как бы кто-нибудь сильный и наглый не
побил их.
 -- Горький, о Чехове


In each of Chekhov's humorous stories I hear the quiet, deep sigh of a pure and
truly human heart, the hopeless sigh of sympathy for men who do not know how to
respect their own human dignity, and who, submitting without resistance to mere
force, live like slaves, believe in nothing but the necessity of swallowing
every day a hopefully richer bowl of soup, and feel nothing but fear that
someone, strong and insolent, will give them a hiding.
 -- Maxim Gorky


The first human who hurled an insult instead of a stone was the founder
of civilization.
 -- Sigmund Freud


A stiff apology is a second insult... The injured party does not want to
be compensated because he has been wronged; he wants to be healed
because he has been hurt.
 -- G. K. Chesterton


Dostoevky's lack of taste, his monotonous dealings with persons
suffering with pre-Freudian complexes, the way he has of wallowing in
the tragic misadventures of human dignity - all this is difficult to
admire.
 -- Vladimir Nabokov


The great majority of American colleges are so incompetent and vicious
that, in any really civilized country, they would be closed by the police.
... In the typical American state they are staffed by quacks and hag-ridden
by fanatics. Everywhere they tend to become, not centers of enlightenment,
but simply reservoirs of idiocy. Not one professional pedagogue out of
twenty is a man of any genuine intelligence. The profession mainly
attracts, not young men of quick minds and force of character, but flabby,
feeble fellows who yearn for easy jobs. The childish mumbo-jumbo that
passes for technique among them scarcely goes beyond the capacities of a
moron. To take a Ph.D. in education, at most American seminaries, is an
enterprise that requires no more real acumen or information than taking a
degree in window dressing... Their programs of study sound like the
fantastic inventions of comedians gone insane.
 -- H.L. Mencken, "The War Upon Intelligence," Baltimore Evening Sun


Cynicism is for bench warmers. You wanna play, put your ego and your
sneer away.
 -- John Carlton


Everything we hear is an opinion, not a fact. Everything we see is a
perspective, not the truth.
 -- Marcus Aurelius


It's OK to be afraid, but it will never be the same.


Если ты вдруг обнаруживаешь себя запряженным в повозку и тупо тащащим ее
куда-то по бесконечной дороге, то может в том, что тебя впрягли, и виноват
впрягший. Но в том, что ты выглядел ездовым осликом, которому только этого
и надо - не виноват никто кроме тебя.


Let us not look back in anger or forward in fear, but around in
awareness.
 -- James Thurber


[Markets are a] result of human action, but not the execution of any
human design.
 -- Adam Ferguson, economist


The most civilized man is simply that man who has been most successful
in caging and harnessing his honest and natural instincts - that is, the
man who has done most cruel violence to his own ego in the interest of
the commonweal. The value of this commonweal is always overestimated.
What is it at bottom? Simply the greatest good to the greatest
number - of petty rogues, ignoramuses, and poltroons.
 -- H.L. Mencken, "In Defense of Women"


Items in our world become meaningful when we have willingly torn our
flesh in winning them from some resisting force.
 -- Corey Anton


Success is a lousy teacher. It seduces smart people into thinking they
can't lose.
 -- Bill Gates


Leave nothing to willpower first thing in the morning.
 -- Craig Ballantyne


@WinoForever: Don't think of it as "single." Think of it as "not with
the wrong person."
 -- Nilla Waffler @ Gawker


Yahoo!'s homepage [...] tests more than forty-five thousand unique
combinations of story headlines and photos every five minutes.
 -- Ryan Holiday, "Trust Me, Dude, I'm Lying"


The most powerful predictor of virality is how much anger an article
evokes.
 -- Wharton School research


If you don't know what you want, you'll _always_ get the leftovers.


Ah, when to the heart of man
Was it ever less than a treason
To go with the drift of things,
To yield with a grace to reason,
And bow and accept the end
Of a love or a season?
-- Robert Frost, "Reluctance"


People don't do what they believe in, they just do what's most
convenient, then they repent.
 -- Bob Dylan, "Brownsville Girl"


In the long run, propaganda will reach the broad masses of the people only
if at every stage it is uniform. Nothing confuses the people more than lack
of clarity or aimlessness. [...] The essence of propaganda is not in
variety, but rather the forcefulness and persistence with which one selects
ideas from the larger pool and hammers them into the masses using the most
varied methods.
 -- Joseph Goebbels, "Wille und Weg", 1931


A worldview does not govern the things of life, but rather the
relationships of those things. The task of explaining this relationship
in the details of public life, of persuading the broad masses of its
desirability, is the task of our political propaganda.
 -- Joseph Goebbels, "Wille und Weg", 1931


The task of propaganda is not to discover a theory or to develop a
program, but rather to translate that theory and program into the
language of the people, to make them comprehensible to the broad masses
of the people.
 -- Joseph Goebbels, "Wille und Weg", 1931


You cannot fail. You can only get results.
 -- Ted Nicholas


The fragrance always stays in the hand that gives the rose.
 -- Rumi


The Success Formula:

* Decide exactly what it is you want.
* Make it a primary goal.
* Establish a series of yearly, monthly, weekly,
  and daily objectives to achieve that goal.
* Resist the urge to give up along the way.

 -- Mark Ford


Find out what people want and help them get it.
 -- Harry Browne, "The Secret of Selling Anything"


Success comes in spurts.
 -- Craig Ballantyne


Success is simple once you accept how hard it is.
 -- Craig Ballantyne


Any word that does not help to make the sale endangers the sale.
 -- Elmer Wheeler


It's important to resist the temptation to get sidetracked by peripheral
issues that cannot yield a payoff no matter what their outcome.
 -- Robert Ringer


Always be asking, Is this moving me towards my goals and Where is the
profit in this?
 -- Dan Kennedy


We are all imperfect, flawed, neurotic, and quirky. If you think a
perfect team (or partner) is one that is quirk-free and collectively has
their shit sorted out, then you should probably consider hermitude as an
option. Everyone has their weird stuff, they will bring it to the table,
and it will cost you money and time. That's just the way it is.
 -- Danielle LaPorte


"If you can see John Smith through John Smith's eyes, you can sell John
Smith what John Smith buys."
 -- Old sales maxim


Either you run the day or the day runs you.
 -- Jim Rohn


The few who do are the envy of the many who only watch.
 -- Jim Rohn


If you want to reach a goal, you must "see the reaching" in your own
mind before you actually arrive at your goal.
 -- Zig Ziglar


Rich people have big libraries. Poor people have big televisions.
 -- Brian Tracy


Money is attracted to the individual operating free of guilt or shame.
People with inferiority feelings about their information, expertise, or
business activities are at a profound disadvantage. They subliminally
communicate their guilt to others and unconsciously sabotage themselves.
 -- Dan Kennedy


Our life is what our thoughts make it. A man will find that as he alters
his thoughts toward things and other people, things and other people will
alter towards him.
 -- James Allen


Кто-то из Великих и Мудрых сказал: "Когда меняют пастуха, только стадо
считает, что меняется хозяин".


Remembering that I'll be dead soon is the most important tool I've ever
encountered to help me make the big choices in life. Because almost
everything - all external expectations, all pride, all fear of
embarrassment or failure - fall away in the face of death, leaving only
what is truly important. Remembering that you are going to die is the
best way I know to avoid the trap of thinking you have something to
lose.
 -- Steve Jobs


There are lovers content with longing. I'm not one of them.
 -- Rumi


There is a principle which is a bar against all information, which is
proof against all arguments and which cannot fail to keep a man in
everlasting ignorance - that principle is contempt prior to investigation.
 -- Herbert Spencer


Life is like stepping onto a boat that is about to sail out to sea and
sink.
 -- Shunryu Suzuki Roshi


A soldier will fight long and hard for a bit of colored ribbon.
 -- Napoleon


My argument-in-a-nutshell, to date, has been this: don't worry about
what is going on in your mind. If you want to accomplish something, just
focus on the specific behavior that will get you there. Find out the
exact actions that others have taken to achieve a similar objective, and
imitate those actions, step by step.
 -- Mark Ford


Most of the people I know who focus on getting their heads right are
losers who never achieve anything in life. The most successful people I
know are doers... achievers.
 -- Mark Ford


What you see in the world around you is what you are.
 -- Steve Barnes


Funny thing about risks that I learnt in my profession - every now and
then they tend to materialize.
 -- Don Man


What must be, shall be; and that which is a necessity to him that
struggles is little more than choice to him that is willing.
 -- Seneca


The better you write, the higher you go in Ogilvy & Mather.
People who think well, write well.
Woolly minded people write woolly memos, woolly letters and woolly speeches.
Good writing is not a natural gift. You have to learn to write well. Here are
10 hints:

1. Read the Roman-Raphaelson book. Read it three times.
2. Write the way you talk. Naturally.
3. Use short words, short sentences and short paragraphs.
4. Never use jargon words like 'reconceptualize,' 'demassification,'
   'attitudinally,' 'judgmentally.' They are hallmarks of a
   pretentious ass.
5. Never write more than two pages on any subject.
6. Check your quotations.
7. Never send a letter or a memo on the day you write it. Read it aloud the
next morning and then edit it.
8. If it is something important, get a colleague to improve it.
9. Before you send your letter or your memo, make sure it is crystal clear what
   you want the recipient to do.
10. If you want ACTION, don't write. Go and tell the guy what you want.


People will do anything for those who encourage their dreams, justify their
failures, allay their fears, confirm their suspicions, and help them throw
rocks at their enemies.
 -- Blair Warren


In hyperinflation, a kilo of potatoes was worth, to some, more than the
family silver; a side of pork more than the grand piano. A prostitute in
the family was better than an infant corpse; theft was preferable to
starvation; warmth was finer than honour, clothing more essential than
democracy, food more needed than freedom.
 -- Adam Fergusson, regarding the Weimar inflation, in "When Money Dies"


When I do good, I feel good. When I do bad, I feel bad. That's my
religion.
 -- Abraham Lincoln


Make up a story... For our sake and yours forget your name in the
street; tell us what the world has been to you in the dark places and in
the light. Don't tell us what to believe, what to fear. Show us belief's
wide skirt and the stitch that unravels fear's caul.
 -- Toni Morrison, The Nobel Lecture In Literature, 1993


Price is what you pay; value is what you get.
 -- Warren Buffett


Giving people what they want is the high road to disaster. What they
want is McDonalds and KFC. What they get is blubber and heart attacks.
 -- Drayton Bird


The older I get the more I admire and crave competence, just simple
competence, in any field from adultery to zoology.
 -- H.L. Mencken


Only amateurs attack machines; professionals target people.
 -- Bruce Schneier


Humans are incapable of securely storing high-quality cryptographic
keys, and they have unacceptable speed and accuracy when performing
cryptographic operations. (They are also large, expensive to maintain,
difﬁcult to manage, and they pollute the environment. It is
astonishing that these devices continue to be manufactured and deployed.
But they are sufﬁciently pervasive that we must design our protocols
around their limitations.)
 -- Kaufmann, Perlman and Speciner


Most business people don't realize it but they are in the
client-and-prospect-generating business. That's the basic goal of all
marketing. Don't ever forget it.
 -- Jay Abraham


In a fight, you don't rise to the level of your expectations, you fall
to the level of your training.


Creative power doesn't come from strong reactions to what happens, it
comes from a steady vision of what's possible.
 -- Danielle LaPorte


There are two basic ways to evolve your life. Either change the way you
use your body: posture, breathing, motion, composition. Or resolve the
conflict in your heart. Success in either is mirrored in the other. In
this arena, the conscious mind is mostly useful to help accomplish one
of these two. And unless these evolve, you have not changed.
 -- Steve Barnes


When we compare our insides to someone else's outsides, we're concocting
an illusion. That illusion inhibits our self-compassion, our creative
power, and our connection with others.
[...]
We all go home to ourselves, to our aches, our shadows - to our most tender
and fierce longings - the same beating hearts in the dark.
 -- Danielle LaPorte


The truth shall upset you free.
 -- Swami Beyondananda


You know what's a major turn on for potential clients and collaborators?
This: "I'll do whatever it takes to makes this awesome." Hellohhh,
beautiful.
 -- Danielle LaPorte


Since everything is none other than exactly as it is, one may well just
break out in laughter.
 -- Long Chen Pa


If you bring forth what is within you, what you bring forth will save
you. If you do not bring forth what is within you, what you do not bring
forth will destroy you.
 -- Gospel of St. Thomas


The top marketers seldom give a moment's thought to what a risky tactic
might do to their "reputation". They don't really care what people think
about them. You can't bank criticism.
 -- John Carlton


Have compassion for everyone you meet, even when they don't want it.
What seems conceit, bad manners, or cynicism is always a sign of things
no ears have heard, no eyes have seen. You do not know what wars are
going on down there where the spirit meets the bone.
 -- Miller Williams


Courage is a self-inflicted quality that gains momentum every time you
try it.
 -- Jeffrey Gitomer


Among other evils which being unarmed brings you, it causes you to be
despised.
 --Niccolo Machiavelli


And in that state of nature, no arts; no letters; no society; and which
is worst of all, continual fear and danger of violent death; and the
life of man, solitary, poor, nasty, brutish, and short.
 --Thomas Hobbes, "Leviathan"


Power consists in one's capacity to link his will with the purpose of
others, to lead by reason and a gift of cooperation.
 --Woodrow Wilson


Military doctrine for millennia had been that a commander's job was to
command, not to fight. Aggressive officers had never accepted that
formulation; and when the dust settled, the victorious side was normally
the one whose officers were aggressive.
 -- David Drake, "Hammer's Slammers"


"Your work is going to fill a large part of your life, and the only way
to be truly satisfied is to do what you believe is great work. And the
only way to do great work is to love what you do. If you haven't found
it yet, keep looking, and don't settle. As with all matters of the
heart, ...you'll know when you find it."
 -- Steve Jobs


Calling this a straw man or a caricature would be lowballing the audacity
of this ridiculous lie almost to the point of being completely inaccurate
in my labeling.
 -- Crommunist


The most beautiful people we have known are those who have known
defeat, known suffering, known struggle, known loss, and have found
their way out of the depths. These persons have an appreciation, a
sensitivity, and an understanding of life that fills them with
compassion, gentleness, and a deep loving concern. Beautiful people do
not just happen.
 -- Elizabeth Kubler Ross


God does not care about our mathematical difficulties. He integrates
empirically.
 -- Einstein


The failure to act is much more often the product of inner, emotional
resistance than external resistance. To move forward you must give up your
story, whether it is excuses about your childhood, lack of education, your
'bad luck', your unsupportive family, where you live, etc.
 -- Dan Kennedy


Life is all about how you handle Plan B.


Enter a partnership slowly, Kill a partnership fast.
(The employee equivalent being: "Hire slow, fire fast").
 -- Craig Ballantyne


Если вы хотите со мной разговаривать, то молчите.


The major difference between a thing that might go wrong and a thing
that cannot possibly go wrong is that when a thing that cannot possibly
go wrong goes wrong, it usually turns out to be impossible to get at and
repair.
 -- Douglas Adams


No greater care is required upon any works than upon such as are to
withstand the action of water; for this reason, all parts of the work
need to be done exactly according to the rules of the art which all
workmen know, but few observe.
 -- Sextus Julius Frontinus, "De aquaeductu"


Engineering is the art of modelling materials we do not wholly
understand into shapes we cannot precisely analyse so as to withstand
forces we cannot properly assess, in such a way that the public has no
reason to suspect the extent of our ignorance.
 -- Dr. A. R. Dykes


Education is the proper way to promote compassion and tolerance in society.
Compassion and peace of mind bring a sense of confidence that reduce stress
and anxiety, whereas anger and hatred come from frustration and undermine
our sense of trust. Because of ignorance, many of our problems are our own
creation. Education, however, is the instrument that increases our ability
to employ our own intelligence.
 -- Dalai Lama 


Knowing what you want (and what you don't want), and having the cojones
to get off your butt and start dealing with the consequences of
movement... these things are NOT default settings inside you.
 -- John Carlton


In the real world, being liked and being successful don't really go
together. The reason why is that real success grows out of who you are and
what you want as an individual. When you live that out, it can create
friction in the lives of others who aren't willing to do the same for
themselves.
 -- Jason Leicester


Because: Going without, and holding out, is better than selling out.
Always.
 -- Danielle Laporte


If life does not turn a Jew into a lackey, it turns him into a
gladiator.
 -- Mikhail Veller


It is forbidden to kill; therefore all murderers are punished unless
they kill in large numbers and to the sound of trumpets.
 -- Voltaire


Everyone is entitled to their own opinions, but they are not entitled to
their own facts.
 -- Patrick Moynihan


You play the hand you're dealt. Some of us are tested to the limit, some
get an easy ride, and none of it seems fair. It just is the way it is.
 -- John Carlton


In everyone's life, at some time, our inner fire goes out. It is then
burst into flame by an encounter with another human being. We should all
be thankful for those people who rekindle the inner spirit.
 -- Albert Schweitzer


People who earn the label "creative" are really just people who come up
with more combinations of ideas, find interesting ones faster, and are
willing to try them out. The problem is that most schools and
organizations train us out of those habits.
 -- Guy Kawasaki, "Reality Check"


Losses aren't cataclysmic if they teach the heart and soul their natural
cycle of breaking and healing. A real tragedy? That's the loss of the
heart and soul themselves. If you've abandoned yourself in the effort to
keep anyone or anything else, unlearn that pattern. Live your truth,
losses be damned. Just like that, your heart and soul will return home.
 -- Martha Beck


Чтоб мудро жизнь прожить, знать надобно немало.
Два важных правила запомни для начала:
Ты лучше голодай, чем что попало есть,
И лучше будь один, чем вместе с кем попало.
 -- Омар Хайам, перевод О. Б. Румера


Do not be shamed that you came out of cootchie and will die and leave a
sack of flesh shell. That's not who you are, and the journey between is
what keeps us entertained on the Everlasting side as we remain outside
of linear time, always have and always will.
 -- Ross Jeffries


One day you will wake up and there won't be any more time to do the
things you've always wanted. Do it now.
 -- Paulo Coelho


Cut off from the land that bore us,
Betrayed by the land we find,
Where the brightest have gone before us
And the dullest remain behind,
But stand to your glasses, steady,
Tis all we have left to prize,
Raise a cup to the dead already,
Hurrah for the next that dies!


Where there are no men, be thou a man.
 -- Rabbi Hillel


Let them call me rebel and welcome, I feel no concern from it; but I
should suffer the misery of devils, were I to make a whore of my soul...
 -- Thomas Paine


You must have chaos in your heart to give birth to stars.
 -- Nietzsche


If man makes it, don't eat it.
 -- Jack LaLanne


When you think of the long and gloomy history of man, you will find more
hideous crimes have been committed in the name of obedience than have
ever been committed in the name of rebellion.
 -- C. P. Snow


Gary Halbert and I developed this attitude we called "being an
optimistic pessimist"... which meant we braced for the worst in any
given project, rooted for the best results possible, and accepted what
happened... knowing the only real measure was whether we did everything
we could to make it successful.
 -- John Carlton, "The Rant"


That's almost the first rule of understanding human behavior: If you're
ashamed of anything you're doing, then STOP fucking doing it.
 -- John Carlton, "The Rant"


I sold my kid to the gypsies and after the bubble burst, bought him back
at half-price. Saved 2 years kid expense, and now he can knife-fight and
breed donkeys.
 -- snotty comment seen on "Reason"


Stop being a wuss. Everyone is scared. The successful ones acknowledge
that fear, put it aside, and just get busy taking care of business.
 -- John Carlton


This I learned from a cereal box: "Actum Ne Agas: Do Not Do A Thing Already
Done." We do not embrace this language system because of what it enables
us to write, but rather, for what it enables us to avoid writing. Pre-hung
doors and prefabricated windows; fully assembled kitchen appliances;
furnished apartments with well-stocked wine cabinets.
 -- sundialsvc4, discussing CPAN in PerlMonks


Your reputation is harmed the most by what you say to defend it.
 -- Nassim Nicholas Taleb


I don't believe in equality. It's not part of my personal philosophy. I
believe in equal opportunity to rise above unequal circumstances in order
to make yourself a person of superior capabilities and earn extraordinary
rewards.
 -- Dan Kennedy


What we accept, we get more of; what we sanction by inaction and
resignation, multiplies.
 -- Dan Kennedy


When a man comes to like a sea life, he is not fit to live on land.
 -- Dr. Samuel Johnson


Criticism is something we can avoid easily by saying nothing, doing
nothing, and being nothing.
 -- Elbert Hubbard


Between stimulus and response there is a space. In that space is our
power to choose our response. In our response lies our growth and our
freedom.
 -- Viktor Frankl, "Man's Search for Meaning"


Everything can be taken from a man or a woman but one thing: the last of
human freedoms to choose one's attitude in any given set of circumstances,
to choose one's own way.
 -- Viktor Frankl, "Man's Search for Meaning"


The failure to act is much more often the product of inner, emotional
resistance than external resistance. To move forward you must give up your
story, whether it is excuses about your childhood, lack of education, your
"bad luck", your unsupportive family, your low metabolism, where you live,
etc.
 -- Dan Kennedy


"If you want MORE of anything in your life, it all starts with LESS of
the other stuff. Stop dreaming and start doing."
 -- John Reese


There's no justice. There's only power.


Most people cultivate their intellect only under the lash. They revel in
emotion at any and all times.
 -- Robert Collier, "Letter Book"


When I meet doubt, doubt never wins.
 -- Brendon Bourchard


The statute of limitations has expired on all childhood traumas. Get your
stuff together and get on with your life.
 -- Quincy Jones


Delaying the decision is worse than making the wrong decision. You can
usually fix bad decisions. You can't fix indecision.
 -- Jason Fladlien


It's not about resources someone has; it's about the resourcefulness.
 -- Tony Robbins


I've always felt that 97% of our life is spent in ordinary times
pursuing the extraordinarily gold moments as represented by 3%. Really,
when you think about it we're all in pursuit mode and we're pursuing
something. We're in ordinary time, and then we get married; remember
when you had your children, Yanik, how extraordinarily golden that was;
when you made your first million; when we sold our first house. There
are not a lot of times, so I just try to recognize and embrace that 97%
as I'm going through it and try to bring a little flair to those
multiple minutes.
 -- Frank McKinney


If you look hard enough you always find a reason not to do something.
 -- Yanik Silver


To live an extraordinary life you must resist the ordinary approach.
 -- Frank McKinney


Yanik: Yeah. Where is that confidence? Where is that kind of gumption,
for lack of a better word, that you said that you can design your own
reality?

Frank: It starts very simply. It starts with celebrating each little,
humble victory in your life as a triumph and achievement. That's a long way
of saying building confidence.

Most ordinary people find solace in habits, usually bad ones, and in vices.
If you look at the extraordinary people that you look up to - I mean,
really look up to - [...] They don't oversleep. They don't overeat. They
don't drink. They don't take drugs. They don't gamble. They don't
womanize.
 -- Frank McKinney


Your time is a finite resource and the clock is ticking. Money you can
make more of but time when it's gone, it's gone and you do not know when
it will run out. Funny how people will squander their greatest and most
precious resource.
 -- Paul Thompson, origamiboats group


If you don't like something, change it. If you can't change it, change
your attitude. Don't complain.
 -- Maya Angelou


My opinion is that we are talking past each other and you are countering
a position I don't hold.
 -- Limbic~Region in PerlMonks


"Not only is this all incomprehensible, but the ink is ugly and the
paper is from the wrong kind of tree."


I like to set my goals high because one thing's for sure: you won't ever
do better than you aim for. Doing worse is fine, you just adjust your
settings and fire again.
 -- Pieter Hintjens, "Social Engineering 101"


We lose 10-15 points of IQ during an "amygdala hijack".
 -- Matt Lieberman


Science is as much an act of persuasion as it is an act of discovery.
 -- Prof. Matt Might


C is a terse and unforgiving abstraction of silicon.
 -- Prof. Matt Might


Make the best use of what is in your power, and take the rest as it
happens.
 -- Epictetus


If you're skimming across your life at high speed, it's impossible to dig
down more deeply.
 -- Ryan Murdoch


When you tell me I should give proprietary software a fair technical
evaluation because its features are so nice, what you are actually doing
is saying "Look at the shine on those manacles!" to someone who
remembers feeling like a slave.
 -- Eric S. Raymond


Humans don't _really_ fight over skin-tone or ideology; those are just
handy cues for kin-selection purposes. Ultimately it always comes down
to bloodlines and limited resources.
 -- Peter Watts, "Blindsight"


You can only do what ONLY YOU can do. Do that. The universe will
configure around your very best efforts. Willingly.
 -- Danielle LaPorte


У меня в последнее время ощущение, что современным детям старшего школьного
возраста катастрофически не хватает пиздюлей...


The Sci-Fi Design Process. Idea: "Visit the moon!" Execution: wooden house
filled with monkeys, sitting on huge pile of explosives.

Part 2: after the inevitable tragedy, try again. But this time, USE MORE
EXPLOSIVES!!!

Part 3: form a committee to study the type of wood to use, and choose
between nails or screws.
 -- Pieter Hintjens 


When you debug a problem, the "but it works on my machine" case isn't
relevant. Only the "I can make it break each time" case.
 -- Pieter Hintjens, via Twitter


Writing a Perl script to ping every box on my LAN cause I'm too lazy to get
up and check the IP addr of the box I want to ssh to
 -- Pieter Hintjen, via Twitter


Пусть они докажут, что я - не верблюд, тогда я перестану их оплевывать...


This is what you shall do; Love the earth and sun and the animals,
despise riches, give alms to every one that asks, stand up for the
stupid and crazy, devote your income and labor to others, hate tyrants,
argue not concerning God, have patience and indulgence toward the
people, take off your hat to nothing known or unknown or to any man or
number of men, go freely with powerful uneducated persons and with the
young and with the mothers of families, read these leaves in the open
air every season of every year of your life, re-examine all you have
been told at school or church or in any book, dismiss whatever insults
your own soul, and your very flesh shall be a great poem and have the
richest fluency not only in its words but in the silent lines of its
lips and face and between the lashes of your eyes and in every motion
and joint of your body.
 -- Walt Whitman


[...] expressing unintelligibly for others what they had not understood
themselves.
 -- Thomas Jefferson, letter to John Adams


Imagine that there is a button in the center of your left palm; imagine
that this button, when pressed, will send a signal to your brain to stop
the fearful thinking.

Press the button with your right hand as you become aware of your breath.

Take three easy breaths counting them out.

Imagine a different color for each number.

As you exhale, relax in the present moment.

 -- Don Joseph Goewey, "The Clear Button" in "Mystic Cool"



...the government is responding by playing up threats of terrorism. It's
an easy distraction, and it keeps people in line.
 -- Simon Black


Переговоры имеет смысл вести только с сокрушенным агрессором.
 -- Роберт Джон Ауман, лауреат Нобелевской премии по экономике


Nothing is what we thought. I can say that with great confidence. Emptiness
is not what we thought. Neither is mindfulness or fear. Compassion - not
what we thought. Love. Buddha nature. Courage. These are code words for
things we don't know in our minds, but any of us could experience them.
 -- Pema Chödrön


The most heartbreaking thing of all is how we cheat ourselves of the
present moment.
 -- Pema Chödrön


Только покойник не ссыт в рукомойник.


Одна женщина дает тебе жизнь, вторая портит, а третья отнимает.


...risk lives for the sake of principles anytime. As soon as you
lose principles, your lives are first worthless and next lost.
 -- Christopher Anvil, "Pandora's Legions"


When we allow regret to grip us, we will value money more than we value
freedom, we will choose ego over growth, and we will settle for less
than amazing in order to save face.
 -- Danielle LaPorte


The time for taking all measures for a ship's safety is while still able
to do so. Nothing is more dangerous than for a seaman to be grudging in
taking precautions lest they turn out to have been unnecessary. Safety
at sea for a thousand years has depended on exactly the opposite
philosophy.
 -- Admiral Chester Nimitz


Россияне живут и ждут, 
уловляя малейший знак, 
понимая, что наебут, 
но не зная, когда и как!


Когда Бог выдавал женщинам мозги и сиськи, они стояли в очереди за жопой и
приключениями! 


В России слёзы светятся сквозь смех, 
Россию Бог безумием карал, 
России послужили больше всех 
те, кто её сильнее презирал. 


Какое нелепое счастье - родиться 
в безумной, позорной, любимой стране, 
где ты обретаешь привычку гордиться, 
что можно с достоинством выжить в гавне! 


Маленькая девочка спрашивает у мамы, французской бендерши:
 - А что такое любовь?
 - Не забивай голову глупостями, дочка! Это русские придумали, чтобы денег
   не платить!


У счастливых девушек сломанные ногти, стёртые коленки, и светящиеся глаза.


Ситуация "собака на сене": сам не ам, но другим не дам!


Не могут быть красивыми глаза, которые не плакали ни разу.
 -- from nirvana.fm


Ignoring house loads, the ratio of drive distance (at 4kts) to regen
distance (at 5kts) is about 1 to 40. Motor one mile at 4kts (15 minutes)
and you need to sail 40 miles at 5kts (8 hours) to get the charge back.
If you use a radio, autopilot or lights, the ratio gets worse.
 -- Eric <ewdysar@yahoo.com> in the 'electricboats' Yahoo group


An easy question is "how much gas do you usually use in a single day on the
water?" Just thinking about the batteries, if you use golf cart style
batteries, the usable equivalent of a 1 gallon gas tank will weigh about
800 pounds and cost about $2000. Upgrading to AGM will drop the weight to
about 750 pounds and cost about $4000. Going high tech, you could buy
Lithium cells that only weigh 350 pounds and cost about $6200. All of that
for a "gas tank" that will drive your boat as far as 1 gallon of gas today.
 -- Eric <ewdysar@yahoo.com> in the 'electricboats' Yahoo group


People go insane in herds, led by the herd mentality, and only return to
sanity individually.
 -- Brent Swain


Интеллект человека определяется не объёмом того, что он знает, а качеством
того, что он делает.


I hate storms, but calms undermine my spirits.
 -- Bernard Moitessier, "The Long Way"


The more different systems you experience, the more you can abstract the
particular things you have to be working on and actually transcend the
implementation language and platform.
 -- Nikolai Bezroukov


I sometimes really enjoy the way [Larry Wall] manages to make analogies
between completely disparate things, not only because that makes the
subject matter more interesting, but also because in "programming in large"
you really should be able to map between different levels of viewing the
systems.
 -- Nikolai Bezroukov


Народа российского горе
С уже незапамятных пор,
Что пишет он 'хуй' на заборе,
Еще не построив забор.
 -- Игорь Губерман


Whoever fights monsters should see to it that in the process he does not
become a monster. And when you look into the abyss, the abyss also looks
into you.
 -- Friedrich Nietzsche


Become glued to your goals and life purpose like wet is to water.
 -- Matt Furey


mount /dev/brain && tail -f /var/log/thoughts >> /pub/www


Правосудие - это когда сытые людоеды судят голодных людоедов за людоедство.
 -- anekdot.ru


In the South Seas there is a cargo cult of people. During the war they
saw airplanes land with lots of good materials, and they want the same
thing to happen now. So they've arranged to imitate things like runways,
to put fires along the sides of the runways, to make a wooden hut for a
man to sit in, with two wooden pieces on his head like headphones and
bars of bamboo sticking out like antennas--he's the controller--and they
wait for the airplanes to land. They're doing everything right. The form
is perfect. It looks exactly the way it looked before. But it doesn't
work. No airplanes land. So I call these things cargo cult science,
because they follow all the apparent precepts and forms of scientific
investigation, but they're missing something essential, because the
planes don't land.
 -- Richard Feynman, from the Caltech commencement address, 1974


We make it ourselves, out of ourselves. Nerve can't be taken away from
you like a purse or something.
 -- Miles Vorkosigan, "Mirror Dance"


Poverty isn't caused by a lack of money. It's caused by the lack of
ability or opportunity to create value.
 -- Simon Black


Ars longa, vita brevis, occasio praeceps, experimentum periculosum,
iudicium difficile.
"Life is short, [the] craft long, opportunity fleeting, experiment
treacherous, judgment difficult."
 -- Hippocrates


"The pleasure is momentary, the position ridiculous, and the expense damnable."
 -- Lord Chesterfield


A Lisp or Scheme programmer would say that loops and recursion do the
exact same thing. That's why there aren't any native looping statements
in the Scheme language: Scheme programmers do everything with recursion.
 -- Danny Yoo (dyoo@hkn.eecs.berkeley.edu)


Perl isn't a toolbox, but a small machine shop where you can
special-order certain sorts of tools at low cost and in short order.
 -- Larry Wall


"You know, the most amazing thing happened to me tonight. I was coming
here, on the way to the lecture, and I came in through the parking lot.
And you won't believe what happened. I saw a car with the license plate
ARW 357. Can you imagine? Of all the millions of license plates in the
state, what was the chance that I would see that particular one tonight?
Amazing!"
 -- Richard Feynman, "The Feynman Lectures on Physics Volume I"


"git gets easier once you get the basic idea that branches are
homeomorphic endofunctors mapping submanifolds of a Hilbert space."
 -- tabqwerty @ Twitter


"The basic goal-getting principle is to understand that you go as far as
you can see, and when you get there you will always be able to see
farther."
 -- Zig Ziglar


Трудно сказать, что в зрелости больше мешает влюбляться: успокоившиеся
гормоны, или лучшее знание людей.
 -- Абу Шломо, anekdot.ru


Some people, when confronted with a problem, think "I know, I'll use
regular expressions." Now they have two problems.
 -- Jamie Zawinski, '<alt.religion.emacs>' (08/12/1997)


It seemed to be a chronic disease. It was as if even the most
intelligent person had this little Royalty blank spot in their heads
where someone had written: Kings. What a good idea. Whoever had created
humanity had left in a major design flaw. It was its tendency to bend at
the knees.
 -- Terry Pratchett


Do not see danger everywhere and in everything, do not overestimate the
enemy, do not always seek to place yourself in his position, do not assume
that everything that is going on in the theater of war applies to
yourself - these internal reservations and scruples are a sign of
uncertainty, and of a negative attitude, which impairs your ability to
reach a decision, and endangers the success of the operations. Audacity and
a readiness to take responsibility, coupled with cool, clear thinking, are
the pre-conditions and the basis of success.
 -- The Kriegsmarine "Submarine Commander's Handbook", 1943


If I had eight hours to chop down a tree, I'd spend six hours sharpening
my axe.
 -- Abraham Lincoln


...and now, nothing more,
I want to be alone with my essential sea...
I don't want to speak for a long time,
Silence! I want to learn,
I want to know if I exist.
 -- Pablo Neruda


More and more I am convinced that my job as a master teacher is NOT to
answer the question the student asks. 70% of the time it is redirecting
the student to ask the much more useful question or questions that they
aren't even thinking to ask.
 -- Ross Jeffries


Основная проблема демократии в том, что быдло и электорат - одно и то же.
 -- anekdot.ru, 2/4/2011


Don't bear your burden in saintly silence. You have a problem? Great.
Rejoice, dive in, and investigate.
 -- Ven. Henepola Gunaratana


The meaning you give to what happens to you totally determines your
reaction to what happens to you.
 -- Morty Lefkoe


Many qualities are required of you, and some of them may seem
contradictory. Bear in mind that such qualities as personal initiative
and the capacity for strict obedience, while certainly capable of total
opposition, are not necessarily contradictory. The human body is
supplied with muscles so arranged that one set can oppose and frustrate
the action of another set. Nevertheless, although there is a wrong way
to use them, the body still has to have both sets to function properly.
Bear this in mind. A quality may be indispensable, but insufficient by
itself. And the necessary additional quality may be its apparent
opposite.
 -- Christopher Anvil, "Basic"


I read in a book that you can get your girlfriend excited using foreplay
and digital manipulation of her vagina. I don't have Foreplay, so I used
PhotoShop. It worked - she totally freaked.
 -- Calvin Winslow


"Are there minimum prerequisites for participating [in PerlMonks]?"
I think that a familiar answer lies at the basis: an ability to think, and
a willingness to think about thinking (and how our thinking might be in a
derailed state, and needing to be re-initialized).
 -- Intrepid, in PerlMonks


Do what you believe you must and leave the interpreting of it to others.
 -- André Malraux


If you give a gift, you don't persuade. If you're persuading, you're
selling, not giving a gift.
 -- Ross Jeffries


You must spend some time in study, whether you're meditating, going out
for a walk, hiking or taking a shower. You must spend some time
beginning to discover the energy and vibe of the women you would like to
be with so that you know, instinctively and intuitively, how to pick the
right subjects.
 -- Ross Jeffries


You don't need superiority. You just need to be effective.
 -- Ross Jeffries


I know as a teacher, often times, what people come in and ask for is not
what they really need. What they're asking for is being conditioned by
the stuck way they're seeing the problem in the first place. They want
to keep the blinders on. They just want to be able to look over here
instead of over here. My job as a teacher is to say, "No. That's not
what you really need to change. You need to change here." That's why I
get paid the big bucks.
 -- Ross Jeffries


When the first white missionaries came to BC, they told the natives of
how it once rained for 40 days and 40 nites and the whole world flooded.
The natives laughed like hell, and said "Here it rains for 6 months of
every year and the world doesn't flood. What's this 40 days and 40 nites
bullshit?"
 -- Brent Swain, in origamiboats


Aaron Hillegass shared a story about one of his managers who had a
doctorate in astrophysics from Caltech: when he hit something that was
hard and made him feel as if maybe he wasn't smart, he said to himself,
"Wait, I have a doctorate in astrophysics from Caltech. I'm not stupid -
this _is_ hard." Everyone hits stuff that is hard in the process of
learning something new. You are clever enough; it just takes time to
learn.
 -- pemungkah, in PerlMonks


Religion is based ... mainly on fear ... fear of the mysterious,
fear of defeat, fear of death. Fear is the parent of cruelty, and
therefore it is no wonder if cruelty and religion have gone hand in
hand. ... My own view on religion is that of Lucretius. I regard it as
a disease born of fear and as a source of untold misery to the human
race.
 -- Bertrand Russell


Say what you will about the sweet miracle of unquestioning faith, I
consider a capacity for it terrifying and absolutely vile.
 -- Kurt Vonnegut


Physics is like sex: sure it can give some practical results, but that's
not why we do it.
 -- Richard P. Feynman


If ye love wealth better than liberty, the tranquility of servitude better
than the animating contest of freedom - go home from us in peace. We ask
not your counsels or arms. Crouch down and lick the hands which feed you.
May your chains sit lightly upon you, and may posterity forget that you
were our countrymen!
 -- Samuel Adams


If Virtue & Knowledge are diffus'd among the People, they will never be
enslav'd. This will be their great Security.
 -- Samuel Adams


Ya, de odder day, I paint my bilge. [shrug+grin] It's fewn.
 -- Martijn, S/V "Rotop"


As much as one can withstand, we withstood.
 -- Six-Day War epitaph at Kibbutz Yad Mordechai


There is also often the posturing of those gratuitously overreaching to
find offence for reasons of political theatre. I.e., if you can force the
broader society to acknowledge that its name for you is 'offensive'
regardless of reality, then you've grabbed public attention, created a
miniature morality play in which you're the victim, and increased your
apparent significance at least for a moment.
 -- Rick Moen


I think resilience is something you have to learn. For the first 10
years of my career, I never failed, so I didn't need resilience. Once I
did fail, that first fall was really, really hard. But after you come
back once, you're able to bounce.
 -- Barry Moltz


We always have the strength and wisdom to deal with the adversity we
face, and often it's a delusional adversity. We label it as an obstacle
and then experience it as such.
 -- Dr. Srikumar Rao


                    WARNING
The prudent mariner will not rely solely on any single
aid to navigation, particularly floating aids.


GTD summary:

1: Identify all the stuff in your life that isn't in the right place (close all open loops)
2: Get rid of the stuff that isn't yours or you don't need right now
3: Create a right place that you trust and that supports your working style and values
4: Put your stuff in the right place, consistently
5: Do your stuff in a way that honors your time, your energy, and the context of any given moment
6: Iterate and refactor mercilessly


Sometimes being lonely makes us compromise the very things we normally
would associate with red flags.
 -- Carol Brown


Resistance is a sign that your system is reconfiguring itself toward
success. Embrace it and you'll move through it more quickly.
 -- Todd Herman, Athletic Performance Coach


Your breath will bring you to the present. So just breathe. See what's
in front of you. Feel the sensations in your body, and you'll be back -
instantly. When you can act from the present - even if it means
revealing how scared or nervous you are, you drop into your power and
become infinitely more credible and accessible.
 -- Josh Pais, Committed Impulse Founder, Actor


I don't know if you've ever accidentally come across angry wild howler
monkeys in the middle of the jungle but it sounds exactly like if
Predator and the cloverfield monster were raping a bunch of
velociraptors.
 -- The Bloggess


My adolescence was... poor. Poor is a word, so let's use it. I don't care
to discuss it much now, because through forces both positive and
negative, that is not my life any more and I am grateful. And I feel
that dwelling on it diminishes the sincerity of my gratitude.
 -- Lori at http://inpursuitofmarthapoints.com


As soon as I had gone a few more days without drink, I started running.
[...] I ran because I had to have something I could get weird and
obsessive about to distract me from the drink, something that couldn't
coexist with my former lifestyle and so would prevent me from returning
to it.
 -- Frank Skinner, "Frank Skinner"


If you don't believe you have the right to be here, there will never be
enough space for your true self to show up. If you think you need to earn
your actual desires, you're putting miles, years, between you and
fulfillment. So many of us don't even give ourselves permission to want
what we want. This is the great tragedy of a malnourished spirit.
 -- Danielle LaPorte


You are worthy of your desires. Really wanting what you want gives you the
power to get it. You were born free. (The more you try to earn your freedom,
the more trapped you become.) You are worthy of love and respect. Lovable.

You deserve
: eye contact
: smiles in the morning
: food made with pure intention
: clean drinking water, fresh air
: Hello, Please, Thank you.
: time to think about it
: a chance to show them what you're made of
: a second chance
: an education
: health care, including dental
: multiple orgasms
: weekends and the summer off
: 8 hours of sleep
: play before work
: to change your mind
: to say no
: to say yes
: to have your deepest needs met
: to be seen
: to be loved for what is seen.

You deserve all this just because you showed up.
Yep, you're that monumental.
 -- Danielle LaPorte


In the real world, progress does not occur in a straight line, linear
fashion.
 -- Ross Jeffries


Mechanically challenged people must become capable of dealing with
engineering problems on their boat if they are to be "out there". You
cannot achieve the livaboard lifestyle [while remaining] dependent on
outside help to deal with the myriad of technical issues that constantly
appear on a active vessel.
 -- Captain Norman Johnson


Воля мыла на боках стоит
 -- Александр Розенбаум, "Песня Коня Цыганских Кровей"


Trying to get everyone to like you is a sign of mediocrity.
 -- Colin Powell


The next time someone in your life starts to criticize you, hang up on
them instantly. Put them in your spam filter. Walk away. Close the door.
Unfriend them. Banish them to the netherworld. You may miss out on some
constructive items, but it will likely be a tiny fraction of the total.
You won't miss it.

What if the criticism is coming from family? Give them at least a 24-hour
banishment for each infraction -- a week or longer if they're willful or
stubborn about it. They'll catch a clue soon enough. Teach your family to
treat you with respect. If they walk all over you, you're the one giving
them permission to do that; hopefully you can see that this is dumb. Don't
expect them to change unless you enforce good boundaries.
 -- Steve Pavlina


There comes a time to fight your way out of purgatory. Assess what you
learned, bow to your healing process, and tear off the band-aids. Burn
things. This is the time to make announcements and head out into the
world even if your skin is a bit tender, even if you are limping now.

You bust out of the in-between when you declare that
you.have.decided.to.live. No matter what. Such as you are, you are here,
and you are ready for more.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, whitehottruth.com


It is the soldier, not the reporter who has given us the freedom of the
press. It is the soldier, not the poet, who has given us the freedom of
speech. It is the soldier, not the campus organizer, who gives us the
freedom to demonstrate. It is the soldier who salutes the flag, who
serves beneath the flag, and whose coffin is draped by the flag, who
allows the protester to burn the flag.
 -- Father Dennis Edward O'Brien, Sergeant, USMC


SOCATOA:
SO:  Sin(a) = Opposite/hypotenuse
CA:  Cos(a) = Adjacent/hypotenuse
TOA: Tan(a) = Opposite/Adjacent = Sin a / Cos a


Your world changes for the better and you become massively more capable,
inter-personally (with others) and intra-personally (relating to the
different aspects of your "self") when you can look at your filters
instead of looking through them.
 -- Ross Jeffries


It does not seem useful, nor pleasant, nor profitable to endlessly
discuss the numerous failings of the US government with people who have
no authority to remedy them.
 -- Kollapsnik


The counsels of impatience and hatred can always be supported by
the crudest and cheapest symbols; for the counsels of moderation,
the reasons are often intricate, rather than emotional, and
difficult to explain. And so the chauvinists of all times and
places go their appointed way: plucking the easy fruits, reaping
the little triumphs of the day at the expense of someone else
tomorrow, deluging in noise and filth anyone who gets in their
way, dancing their reckless dance on the prospects for human
progress, drawing the shadow of a great doubt over the validity
of democratic institutions. And until peoples learn to spot the
fanning of mass emotions and the sowing of bitterness, suspicion,
and intolerance as crimes in themselves - as perhaps the greatest
disservice that can be done to the cause of popular government -
this sort of thing will continue to occur.
 -- George Kennan


Speaking truth to liars is a dangerous sport, because if you do, their
lying turns vicious.
 -- Kollapsnik


Твёрдый человек способен на мягкое решение, но мягкий на твёрдое
 - НИКОГДА!


....acknowledging fear is not cause for depression or discouragement.
Because we possess such fear we are also entitled to experience
fearlessness. True fearlessness is not the reduction of fear, but going
beyond fear... If we look into our fear, we look beneath its veneer, the
first thing we find is sadness, underneath the anxiousness... When we
slow down, when we relax with our fear, we find sadness, which is calm
and gentle.
 -- Chogyam Trungpa, "Shambhala: Sacred Path of the Warrior"


I'm not interested in surface changes that aren't accompanied by an
inner shift.
 -- Lianne Raymond


BM: Do you ever have this sense when you are following your bliss, as I
have at moments, of being helped by hidden hands?
JC: All the time. It's miraculous. I even have a superstition that has
grown on me as the result of invisible hands coming all the time - namely,
that if you do follow your bliss, you put yourself on a kind of track that
has been there all the while, waiting for you, and the life that you ought
to be living is the one you are living. When you can see that, you begin to
meet people who are in the field of your bliss, and they open the doors to
you. I say, follow your bliss and don't be afraid, and doors will open
where you didn't know they were going to be.
 -- Bill Moyers interviewing Joseph Campbell


Adversity is inevitable. Suffering is optional.
Be unwavering on behalf of your best self.
Be gentle with yourself relentlessly until you achieve your dream.
As long as I can, I will. As long as I will, I can.
Surrender does not mean giving up.


Let your heart be broken. Life will devastate you if you get close
enough to it. Get closer.
 -- Danielle LaPorte


And all those exclamation marks, you notice? Five? A sure sign of
someone who wears his underpants on his head.
 -- Terry Pratchett, "Maskerade"


Choose the facts that keep you moving in a better direction.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, whitehottruth.com


The bad news is that you're falling through space, nothing to hold on
to, no parachute. The good news is that there is no ground.
 -- Chogyam Trungpa Rinpoche


Both of these statements are true:
You are the center of the universe.
You're not that important.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, whitehottruth.com


I must crave your indulgence if in what follows I speak of well-known,
admitted facts as though they were new data; the context necessitates
this method.
 -- Sigmund Freud, in a letter to Albert Einstein


The truth is like a god: it either exists, or it doesn't. A lie is like
religion: you either believe it, disbelieve it, or pretend that you
believe it.


What we observe is not nature itself, but nature exposed to our method
of questioning.
 --Werner Heisenberg


You of the crassitude low brain believe in God, but God does not exist.
The imaginary voice is the voice of the satellite discharge electric
wave.
 -- The Korean (?) hypernationalist of the "Japanese Sirasu" spam


I rarely turn on my TV anymore, and when I do I'm always equally stunned
and impressed by the new and flagrantly repellant slew of reality shows
on the air. They seem to emerge like bipolar trolls, like bewildered
phantasms, little whack-a-mole cancers that pop up only to be beaten
down again by their own insidious self-flagellating idiocy. Delightful!
 -- Mark Morford


Any serious attempt at creating universal equality, in colliding with
the inescapable fact of inequality in Nature, inevitably becomes a most
efficient method of transporting a large number of people to the place
where they are indeed equal: the cemetery.


A woman may not have any idea of what she wants, but she knows exactly
how to get it from a man.


You have your way. I have my way. As for the right way, the correct way,
and the only way, it does not exist.
 --Nietzsche


Some say the world will end in fire,
Some say in ice.
From what I've tasted of desire
I hold with those who favor fire.
But if it had to perish twice,
I think I know enough of hate
To say that for destruction ice
Is also great
And would suffice.
 -- Robert Frost


Ask me about the nature of the universe. I can give you three possible
responses: that the universe is basically good, or basically evil, or
basically random. Whatever response I select would literally dictate
what my life would be like.
 -- Albert Einstein, responding to an interviewer's question of "What
    is the most significant question I could ask you?"


Americans have a choice between two elites, the leftwing intellectuals,
or their remnants, and the right wing oligarchy. Guess which one will
win? Here's a hint: one side has the money, the industry, the lobbyists,
the police, bean-bag guns, APC-mounted water cannons, stun guns, pepper
spray, rubber bullets, a near-monopoly on mainstream media contacts, and
lots of psychologically-impressive expensive dark suits with stern ties.
The other side has mountain bikes and the ability to create 10-foot tall
papier-mache puppets. Oh no, don't use the fucking puppets on us!
 -- Mark Ames at exile.ru


A fiat currency (such as the US Dollar) is composed of debt [which is]
credit advanced based on a promise of future growth.
 -- Dmitry Orlov (the Kollapsnik)


However, this caveat is not spelled out as clearly as it should be. The
result is that we might as well be working with a theory which predicts
that, once global Peak Oil is reached, delicious chocolate petits fours
will spontaneously bake themselves into existence and fly into our
mouths on dainty gossamer wings of marzipan.
 -- Dmitry Orlov (the Kollapsnik)


The U.S. is very much segregated, usually by race, often by ethnicity,
and always by income level. During prosperous times, it is kept
relatively calm by keeping a percentage of people in jail that has set
an all-time world record. During less prosperous times, it is at a big
risk of political explosion. Multi-ethnic societies are fragile and
unstable; when they fall apart, or explode, everyone loses.
 -- Dmitry Orlov (the Kollapsnik)


The safest group of people to be with in a crisis is one that does not
share strong ideological convictions, is not easily swayed by argument,
and does not possess an overdeveloped, exclusive sense of identity.
 -- Dmitry Orlov (Kollapsnik)


Some cause happiness wherever they go; others, whenever they go.
 -- Oscar Wilde


I feel so miserable without you; it's almost like having you here.
 -- Stephen Bishop


I am enclosing two tickets to the first night of my new play; bring a
friend... if you have one.
 -- George Bernard Shaw to Winston Churchill

Cannot possibly attend first night, will attend second... if there is
one.
 -- Winston Churchill, in response


If you get a message from the divine and ignore it, it is worthless.
Listen for those messages and allow them to move you to action...
without delay. Stopping too long to judge your inspirations will kill
them.
 -- Joe Vitale


Go Big. Or go home.


Enduringly successful people [...] don't use a weakness or a setback to
distrust themselves.
 -- Porras, Emery, and Thompson, "Success Built to Last"


The State is nothing more nor less than a bandit gang writ large.
 -- Murray Rothbard, economist


When people won't let you alone, it's because you haven't learned how to
make them do it.
 -- David Seabury


One of the roles that comes up for me a lot is that of being a teacher.
I enjoy this pattern overall, but in an intimate relationship, it needs
to be balanced, with both people serving as teachers and students for
each other. Otherwise it can too easily degrade into an unbalanced
rescuer-victim pattern.
 -- Steve Pavlina


Man is the out-breath of source energy. It is his job - his duty - to share
his love with the world. He must wean himself from suckling the energy of
others and become a vibrant transmitter of energy himself. He must allow
that energy to flow from source, through him, and into the world. When he
assumes this role, he has no doubt he is living as his true self.
 -- Steve Pavlina


A man's greatest reward is to live with integrity, and his greatest
punishment is what he inflicts upon himself for placing anything above
his integrity. Whenever the man sacrifices his integrity, he loses his
freedom... and himself as well.
 -- Steve Pavlina


The surest way for a man to lose the respect of others (as well as his
self-respect) is to violate his own values.
 -- Steve Pavlina


A man who claims his #1 commitment in life is his relationship partner
(or his family) is either too dishonest or too weak to be trusted. His
loyalties are misplaced. A man who values individuals above his own
integrity is a wretch, not a free thinker.
 -- Steve Pavlina


If you do work you love, but it doesn't generate income, your business
will fail. If you do work you hate, but it generates income, your health
will fail... and your business along with it. If you can't do what you
love and make it profitable, you've either got a hobby or a headache,
not a sustainable business. Don't settle for anything less than passion
and profit.
 -- Steve Pavlina


Show loyalty to your potential, not to your pity posse.
 -- Steve Pavlina


I don't worry too much about hurting people's feelings. Hurt feelings
are a step in the right direction for many people. If I'm able to offend
you so easily, to me that means you already recognize some truth in what
I've written, but you aren't ready to face it consciously yet. If you
read something from me that provokes an emotional reaction, then a seed
has already been planted. In other words, it's already too late for you.
:)
 -- Steve Pavlina


I'm fully aware that some of my opinions are unpopular, and I'm
absolutely fine with that. What I'm not fine with is putting truth to
a vote.
 -- Steve Pavlina


Whenever you don't comprehend the rules of the game, supplement them
with a part of yourself.
 -- Steve Pavlina


If you want to live in the light you have to call things out of the
darkness by their real name. Accountability is a mega-watt light that
burns away sickness, heals, and helps new things to grow.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, "WhiteHot Truth"


We are much beholden to Machiavel and others, that write what men do,
and not what they ought to do.
 -- Francis Bacon


Little souls wish you to be unhappy. It aggravates them to have you
joyous, efficient and free. They like to feel that fate is disciplining
you. It gives their egos wings if yours are clipped. You can ruin your
life in an hour by listening to their puerile opinions.
 -- David Seabury


Down to Gehenna or up to the Throne,
He travels the fastest who travels alone.
 -- Rudyard Kipling


I've found that it's a good rule to never make an important decision
when your emotions are in control. I try to program myself in advance to
remember this rule when I need it. When I'm in an emotional state
(either positive or negative), I try to keep just enough intellect
working to tell me one thing: don't decide now.
 -- Harry Browne


You're in the Intellectual Trap any time you try to censor your
emotions so they'll conform to an intellectually determined standard,
no matter how plausible the standard.
 -- Harry Browne, "How I Found Freedom in an Unfree World"


Certain things that please you may be frowned upon by your friends or
associates. But so what? Your happiness is the object of your actions;
what difference does it make that others happen to have some ideas of
what is "correct"?
 -- Harry Browne, "How I Found Freedom in an Unfree World"


Каждый кузнец своего несчастья.


A slave is one who waits for someone to come and free him.
 -- Ezra Pound


Quit responsibly. Say Fuck off with compassion in your heart, liberate with
love, and cut clean when you need to use your sword. And when you can, do
what you say you're going to do, or announce when you can't with deftness
and care.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, whitehottruth.com


Devoid of all facts, skeptics come up with insipid excuses that keep them
out of the best opportunities. You know the sorts of people I'm talking
about - the ones who always find a reason to NOT do something...

Do yourself a favor... ignore the naysayers. In this, the age of turmoil,
focusing on self-reliance is critical.
 -- Simon Black


Buying property outside of your home country is a really effective way
to move money. It is not reportable to any government authority in most
cases, and it cannot be forcibly repatriated. Second, it's a great hedge
against inflation. Third, it gives you a place to go at some point in the
future should you decide that, finally, it's time to hit the escape button
and get the hell out of dodge.
 -- Simon Black


Women, when they have made a sheep of a man, always tell him that he is
a lion with a will of iron.
 -- Balzac


A woman employs sincerity only when every other form of deception has
failed.
 -- Scott


Democracy is also a form of worship. It is the worship of jackals by
jackasses.
 -- H.L. Mencken


We should be careful to get out of an experience only the wisdom that is
in it - and stay there, lest we be like the cat that sits down on a hot
stove-lid. She will never sit down on a hot stove-lid again - and that
is well; but also she will never sit down on a cold one any more.
 -- Mark Twain


Tolerance becomes a crime when applied to evil.
 -- Thomas Mann


If they want to fuck you, then they are going to do that REGARDLESS of
whether you buy them a meal. And if they hold their hand out AFTER you
fuck them, I tell them like a player who schooled me years ago tells
'em: "Hold up. Waitaminute. I DON'T pay for pussy. Whatever way you were
paying your bills BEFORE I came along, you need to keep doing THAT.
Holla."
 -- oracle_of_blacklove, DS group


When the old enchanter came to my door, laden with dreams, I reached out
with both hands. For I know that he would not be lured with the gold
that I might offer later, when age had come upon me.
 -- "Viking's Wake", Richard J. MacCullaugh


This new ship here is fitted according to the reported increase of
knowledge among mankind. Namely, she is cumbered end to end, with bells and
trumpets and clock and wires... she can call voices out of the air of the
waters to con the ship while her crew sleep. But sleep Thou lightly. It has
not yet been told to me that the Sea has ceased to be the Sea.
 -- Rudyard Kipling


There is always an easy solution to every problem - neat, plausible,
and wrong.
 -- H.L. Mencken


In all systems, as complexity approaches infinity, mean time between
failures drops to zero.
 -- Stephen Streib


Be careful who you talk to about your sailing plans. Those who have
abandoned their dreams will try to destroy yours.


In my life, I have lived on three different shores, swum in every ocean,
trod every continent. It still astounds me that the only time I feel as
though I have arrived, is when the final dock line is cast off.
 -- Bill Fortner, Merchant Mariner


Life at sea can be hell, but it sure beats the shit out of the
alternative.


Get what you can afford, sail what you can handle, and love what you're
doing.
 -- Tristan Jones


Without passion, it's just wind and water.


Some years ago - never mind how long precisely - having little or no
money in my purse, and nothing particular to interest me on shore, I
thought I would sail about a little and see the watery part of the
world. It is a way I have of driving off the spleen, and regulating the
circulation. Whenever I find myself growing grim about the mouth;
whenever it is a damp, drizzly November in my soul; whenever I find
myself involuntarily pausing before coffin warehouses and bringing up
the rear of every funeral I meet; and especially whenever my hypos get
such an upper hand of me, that it requires a strong moral principle to
prevent me from deliberately stepping into the street, and methodically
knocking people's hats off - then, I account it high time to get to the
sea as soon as I can. This is my substitute for pistol and ball. With a
philosophical flourish Cato throws himself upon his sword; I quietly
take to the ship.
 -- H. Melville (Moby Dick, 1851)


I know very well that because I am unlettered some presumptuous people
will think they have the right to criticize me, saying that I am an
uncultured man. What stupid fools! Do they not know that I could reply
to them as Marius did to the Roman patricians: 'Do those who pride
themselves on the works of other men claim to challenge mine?'
 -- Leonardo da Vinci


Politicians are always interested in people. Not that this is always a
virtue. Fleas are interested in dogs.
 -- P.J. O'Rourke


The gentle government that promises to hold your hand as you cross the
street refuses to let go on the other side.
 -- Theodore J. Forstmann


The mice which helplessly find themselves between the cat's teeth
acquire no merit from their enforced sacrifice.
 -- Mahatma Gandhi


Here are the top eight mental strengths, as noted by psychologists, that
people with healthy bodies and clinically normal body weight exhibit:

* A decreased reaction to social and environmental changes;
* More excitement and less fear;
* A sense of adventure and possibility for their lives;
* A feeling of being sexually desirable and capable;
* More apt to take acceptable risks;
* Socially comfortable;
* Less likely to demonstrate self-destructive behavior;
* A feeling of acceptance around younger people;
* A tendency to bond within healthy and animated networks


Receptionist (Julie Benz): How do you write women so well?
Melvin Udall (Jack Nicholson): I think of a man, and I take away reason and
accountability.


"That's not right. It's not even wrong!"
 -- Hans Bethe, famous physicist


Between the either/or sides of the brain, some have a rheostat, which
can be adjusted to varying shades of gray, and some have a toggle
switch, which can only define things as "either/or, like/don't like,
good/bad, black/white." The rheostat lets one keep in touch, and
understand the varying shades of gray that more closely reflect reality.
The toggle switch is a lifetime handicap.
 -- Brent Swain, on the Origamiboats list


I want and expect my woman to be a deliverer of grace and beauty into my
life. When we go out, when we stay in, when we make love. I want her to
deliver what I can't, which is a kind of liquid sensual environment, a
shimmering and delicious bed of being for me to take and taste and shape
and raise...
 -- Adam Gilad


Many of our values have no contemporary inherent morality; they have been
passed from one generation to another largely without anyone questioning
them.
 -- "Magic"


Justifying your feelings:

* Automatically puts you on the defense. When you're on the defense, you
  burn more energy. Rationalization can be incredibly inefficient.
* Over-complicates things.
* Perpetuates cleverness. Clever is not a good word in my personal
  dictionary. It rhymes with slick, manipulative, covert. When you're
  trying to rationalize something that is very often amorphous and insular
  you'll reach for smooth answers that you think people - or your
  subconscious - want to hear. And that makes you a salesman.
* Depresses your essential self. The more you load rationale onto your
  feelings, the more padding you create between you and your most powerful,
  unlimited resource. If you make a habit of keeping your instincts at bay,
  that tend to stay at bay.
* Makes you look and feel like a victim. In an effort to prove and protect,
  you make up reasons that appear to be more important than your refutable
  instinct. You whine. You nitpick the situation. You start sounding like
  the wimp you don't want to be - instead of the hero that you essentially
  are. When the passion is there, so is the solution. No problem looks
  insurmountable when you're turned on.
 -- Danielle LaPorte, whitehottruth.com


Only do it if it's fun. If it's not fun, make it fun. If you can't make
it fun, don't do it.
 -- Peter Russell, physicist/philosopher


Authentic living includes 360 degrees of passion and interest - smart
business, Buddhism, good design, heart-ache, money, bliss, feeling
sexy...
 -- Danielle LaPorte, whitehottruth.com


We dishonor ourselves just to please other people.
 -- Don Miguel Ruiz, "The Four Agreements"


I love my NY brothaz, and Rican men! Their drive for life and swaGG is
like NON OTHER!!
 -- poster in 'w4m' on craigslist


The Consultant's Curse: When the customer has beaten upon you long
enough, give him what he asks for, instead of what he needs. This is
very strong medicine, and is normally only required once.


Do you want to know who you are? Don't ask. Act. Action will delineate
and define you.
 -- Witold Gombrowicz, Polish writer


Speaking truth to [group/collective] shibboleth is a good way to
become real unpopular, at warp speed today on the Internet. This
explains the childish regression to adolescent bullying: if you're
filled with anger and afraid for your job, it's much safer to attack an
individual, whereas if you talk about ideas, you may offend some
corporation who's invested in its negation.
 -- Edward G. Nilges, in RISKS Digest


You have the right to be angry, but you don't have the right not to
practice in order to transform your anger. You have the right to make
mistakes, but you don't have the right to continue making mistakes; you
have to learn from the mistakes.
 -- Tich Nhat Han


Strive for excellence by...
caring more than others think is wise;
risk more than others think is safe;
dream more than others think is practical;
expect more than others think is possible.


Below 50 degrees south there is no law. Below 60 degrees south there
is no God.
 -- Old sailors' adage


In an open system, a competitive advantage doesn't derive from locking
in customers, but rather from understanding the fast-moving system
better than anyone else and using that knowledge to generate better,
more innovative products. The successful company in an open system is
both a fast innovator and a thought leader; the brand value of thought
leadership attracts customers and then fast innovation keeps them. This
isn't easy - far from it - but fast companies have nothing to fear,
and when they are successful they can generate great shareholder value.
 -- Jonathan Rosenberg, Senior VP, Google


"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't
matter and those who matter don't mind."
 - Dr. Seuss


The importance of the Free Software Foundation was not only in the code
they wrote, but in their political rhetoric. By talking about free
software as a cause instead of a convenience, they made it difficult for
programmers not to have a political consciousness about it. Even those
who disagreed with the FSF had to engage the issue, if only to stake out
a different position. The FSF's effectiveness as propagandists lay in
tying their code to a message, by means of the GPL and other texts. As
their code spread widely, that message spread as well.
 -- Karl Fogel, "Producing Open Source Software"


Well, I work all the time. So never, never again interrupt me. Okay? I
mean, never. Not 30 years from now... not if there's fire. Not even if you
hear a thud from inside my home and a week later there's a smell from in
there that can only come from a decaying body and you have to hold a hanky
against your face because the stench is so thick you think you're going to
faint even then don't come knocking or, if it's election night and you're
excited and want to celebrate because some fudge-packer you dated has been
elected the first queer President of the United States... and he's going to
put you up in Camp David and you just want to share the moment with
someone... don't knock... not on this door. Not for anything. Got me?
Sweetheart?
 -- Jack Nicholson as Melvin, in "As Good As It Gets"


Those who have nothing to talk about, talk about the weather; those who
have nothing to be proud of, are proud of their age; those who have no
one to love, love solitude.
 -- piligrim65, anekdot.ru (my translation)


Windows has been in dire need of an OS/X-style architecture reboot for
many years, but I don't expect MS to do anything more than repaint the
gargoyles anytime soon.
 -- Craig, in Bruce Schneier's blog


A lot of people wonder how you know you're in love. Just ask yourself
this one question: "Would I mind being financially destroyed by this
person?"
 -- Ronnie Shakes


The cheek of every American must tingle with shame as he reads the
silly, flat, and dishwatery utterances of the man who has to be pointed
out to intelligent foreigners as the President of the United States.
 -- The Chicago Times review of Lincoln's Gettysburg Address


My desires are many and my cry is pitiful, but ever didst thou save me
by hard refusals; and this strong mercy has been wrought into my life
through and through.
 -- Rabindranath Tagore, "Gitanjali"


If you don't stand for something, you will fall for anything.
 -- Alexander Hamilton (and Malcolm X, 220 years later)


It takes about 25 kilobits - 3.2 Kbytes - of data to code for a virus that
has a non-trivial chance of killing a human. This is more efficient than a
computer virus, such as MyDoom, which rings in at around 22 Kbytes. It's
humbling that I could be killed by 3.2 Kbytes of genetic data. Then again,
with 850 Mbytes of data in my genome, there's bound to be an exploit or
two.
 -- http://www.bunniestudios.com/blog/?p=353


I should have loved freedom, I believe, at all times, but in the time in
which we live I am ready to worship it.


Shallow men believe in luck... strong men believe in cause and effect.
 -- Ralph Waldo Emerson


There is a creative spark in each of us, and if it finds no outlet, we
feel half dead.
 -- Richard Layard, British economist


It's not information overload. It's filter failure.
 -- Clay Shirky


A nation of sheep will beget a government of wolves.
 -- Edward R. Murrow


You can't reason someone out of a position they haven't been reasoned
into.


Move quickly and crisply - fail fast; fail often; adjust and learn.
 -- Lynne Ellyn


All the world's a very narrow bridge:
The essential thing is not to be afraid.
 -- Rabbi Nachman of Bratslav (18th century)


No prisoner's dilemma here. Over the long term, symbiosis is more useful
than parasitism. More fun, too. Ask any mitochondria.
 -- Larry Wall


It is difficult to get a man to understand something when his salary
depends on his not understanding it.
 -- Upton Sinclair


Nature must needs make men narrow in order to give them force.
 -- W.E.B. Du Bois, "The Souls Of Black Folk"


If you think you are so enlightened, go and spend a week with your
parents.
 -- Ram Dass


The juvenile sea squirt wanders through the sea searching for a
suitable rock or hunk of coral to cling to and make its home for life.
For this task it has a rudimentary nervous system. When it finds its
spot and takes root it doesn't need its brain anymore, so it eats it.
It's rather like getting tenure.
 --Neuroscientist Rodolfo Llinás


The Society for the Preservation of Tithesis commends your ebriated and
scrutable use of delible and defatigable, which are gainly, sipid and
couth. We are gruntled and consolate that you have the ertia and
eptitude to choose such putably pensible tithesis, which we parage.


Privacy isn't just about having something to hide; it has enormous value
to democracy, liberty, and our basic humanity.
 -- Bruce Schneier


Thus equipped, the navigator may boldly venture forth either by himself
or with a congenial companion. If he does not enjoy every moment of his
cruise, and gain health and strength from the tonic sea breezes, he can
safely conclude that Nature never intended him for a sailor. In that
case, he should dispose of his craft at once and seek such consolation
as agricultural pursuits afford.
 -- Capt. A.J. Kenealy, "Boat Sailing"


Life should NOT be a journey to the grave with the intention of arriving
safely in an attractive and well-preserved body, but rather to skid in
sideways, covered in scars, body thoroughly used up, totally worn out and
screaming 'YAHOO, what a ride!'
 -- Bear Grylls


The palest ink is better than the sharpest memory.
 -- Chinese proverb


A conflict of knowledge results in new knowledge. A conflict of faith
results in a war.


Luck is the residue of design.
 -- Dan Kaminsky


Programming is a Dark Art, and it will always be. The programmer is
fighting against the two most destructive forces in the universe:
entropy and human stupidity. They're not things you can always overcome
with a "methodology" or on a schedule.
 -- Damien Conway


"Correcting problematic relationships in a physical, external world
sense is fairly straightforward. You must clearly define the boundaries
you're comfortable with, let the other person know what those
boundaries are, and then enforce them. There isn't much more to it
than that. If your boundaries are reasonable, and the person is either
unwilling or incapable of complying with them, you're done - in most
situations it would be foolish to continue such a relationship. It will
only erode your self-respect."
 -- http://www.stevepavlina.com/blog/2005/08/dealing-with-difficult-relatives/


To speak from the heart is to become who we truly are, and that's always
risky, or at least surprising. If I strategize my speech, anticipate
what I think you want me to say, things may go more smoothly on the
surface. Certainly, there will be less confusion. Things will be simpler
and more predictable. Fearful of exposure, we read from the expected
social script. But we haven't really met. We haven't yet entered into
that terra incognita where genuine communication becomes possible. Voice
is far more than the sounds we make.
 -- Christopher Locke, "Gonzo Marketing" (author of "The Cluetrain Manifesto")


"Behold here one of the artifices of lawyers. They refuse to administer
justice to you unless you join with them in their fictions; and then
their cry is, see how necessary fiction is to justice! Necessary indeed;
but too necessary; but how came it so, and who made it so? As well might
the father of a family make it a rule never to let his children have
their breakfast till they had uttered, each of them, a certain number of
lies, curses, and profane oaths; and then exclaim, "You see, my dear
children, how necessary lying, cursing, and swearing are to human
sustenance!"
 -- Jeremy Bentham, "Bentham's Theory of Fictions"


Ye cannot be justified by the works of the law; for by the works of the
law no man living can be rid of his burden; therefore, Mr. Worldly
Wiseman is an alien, and Mr. Legality is a cheat; and for his son
Civility, notwithstanding his simpering looks, he is but a hypocrite,
and cannot help thee.
 -- John Bunyan, "The Pilgrim's Progress"


People who believe absurdities, will commit atrocities.
 -- Voltaire


1. Actions have consequences.
2. Humans have minds they can use to calculate and predict -- at least to
	some extent -- the consequences of actions.
3. Obedience can be dangerous because it tends to become a substitute for
	thought (calculation and prediction).
4. The more you think for yourself, rather than obey others, the more you
	learn and the more effective you become.
5. Knowledge advances. Today's wisdom becomes tomorrow's superstition.
	Therefore question everything.


He who thus domineers over you has only two eyes, only two hands, only
one body, no more than is possessed by the least man among the infinite
numbers dwelling in your cities; he has indeed nothing more than the
power that you confer upon him to destroy you. Where has he acquired
enough eyes to spy upon you, if you do not provide them yourselves? How
can he have so many arms to beat you with, if he does not borrow them
from you? The feet that trample down your cities, where does he get them
if they are not your own? How does he have any power over you except
through you? How would he dare assail you if he had no cooperation from
you? What could he do if you yourself did not connive with the thief who
plunders you, if you were not accomplices of the murderer who kills you,
if you were not traitors to yourselves? ...[F]rom all these indignities,
such as the very beasts of the field would not endure, you can deliver
yourselves if you try, not by taking action, but merely by willing to be
free. Resolve to serve no more, and you are at once freed. I do not ask
that you place hands upon the tyrant to topple him over, but simply that
you support him no longer; then you will behold him, like a great
colossus whose pedestal has been pulled away, fall of his own weight and
break into pieces.
 -- Étienne de la Boétie, "Discourse of Voluntary Servitude"


Vilfredo Pareto (1848-1923) was an Italian economist who, in 1906,
observed that twenty percent of the Italian people owned eighty percent
of their country's accumulated wealth. Over time and through application
in a variety of environments, this analytic has come to be called
Pareto's Principle, the 80-20 Rule, and the "Vital Few and Trivial Many
Rule." Called by whatever name, this mix of 80%-20% reminds us that the
relationship between input and output is not balanced. In a management
context, this rule of thumb is a useful heuristic that applies when
there is a question of effectiveness versus diminishing returns on
effort, expense, or time.


The law that entropy always increases, holds, I think, the supreme
position among the laws of Nature. If someone points out to you that
your pet theory of the universe is in disagreement with Maxwell's
equations - then so much the worse for Maxwell's equations. If it is
found to be contradicted by observation - well, these experimentalists
do bungle things sometimes. But if your theory is found to be against
the second law of thermodynamics I can give you no hope; there is
nothing for it but to collapse in deepest humiliation.
 -- Sir Arthur Stanley Eddington, The Nature of the Physical World (1927)


"I tried to find him on the Christian cross, but He was not there; I
went to the Temple of the Hindus and to the old pagodas, but I could not
find a trace of Him anywhere. I searched on the mountains and in the
valleys but neither in the heights nor in the depths was I able to find
him. I went to the caaba in Mecca, but He was not there either. I
questioned the scholars and philosophers but he was beyond their
understanding. I then looked into my heart and it was there where He
dwelled that I saw Him; He was nowhere else to be found."
 -- Rumi


I tell [my kids that] if they disagree, [they should] find what they can in
the message that fits for them and use it, or use the message to identify
what they DON'T believe to be good for them and who they are.
 -- Mike Kemski


All any good role model does is just let you borrow a little confidence
and belief that you can move forward on your own.
 -- Mike Kemski


The intelligent reader will judge for himself. Without examining the
facts fully and fairly, there is no way of knowing whether vox populi is
really vox dei, or merely vox asinorum.
 -- Cyrus H. Gordon


To avoide the tediouse repetition of these woordes: is equalle to: I
will settle as I doe often in woorke use, a paire of paralleles, or
gemowe [twin] lines of one lengthe: =, bicause noe 2 thynges, can be
moare equalle.
 -- Robert Recorde, 1557


Einstein argued that there must be simplified laws of nature, because God
is not capricious or arbitrary. No such faith comforts the software
engineer. Much of the complexity that he must master is arbitrary
complexity, forced without rhyme or reason by the many human institutions
and systems to which his interfaces must conform. These differ from
interface to interface, and from time to time, not because of necessity but
only because they were designed by different people, rather than by God.
 -- Fred Brooks, "No Silver Bullet - Essence and Accidents of Software Engineering"


No other technology since civilization began has seen six orders of
magnitude in performance-price gain in 30 years. In no other technology
can one choose to take the gain in either improved performance or in
reduced costs.
 -- Fred Brooks, "No Silver Bullet - Essence and Accidents of Software Engineering"


Kia Kaha, Kia Toa, Kia Manawanui!
Be Strong, Be Brave, Be perservering!


Not on top of the highest mountains,
Not in the depths of the vast oceans,
Not in the deepest of caves
Is there a place 
Where your karma 
Will not find you.
 -- Buddhist saying


When small people start casting long shadows, it is time to go to bed.
 -- seen at perlmonks.org


Most of the crazy people have NOT been locked up.
 -- Edvin Garshol


You might be able to write faster programs in C, but you can always
write programs faster in Perl.
 -- Simon Cozens


We will not be driven by fear into an age of unreason, if we dig deep
into our own history and our doctrine and remember that we are not
descended from fearful men, not men who feared to write, to speak, to
associate, and to defend causes which were for the moment unpopular.
 -- Edward R. Murrow, March 9 1954, on his "See It Now" program,
    during the McCarthy hearings. The next morning, the New York Times
    said that "broadcasting recaptured its soul".


The dread of evil is a much more forcible principle of human actions
than the prospect of good.
 -- John Locke


My recommendation is always to engineer every system anticipating that
every thing that could possibly go wrong will, and if not, that it will
soon become inhabited by gremlins who hate you and want to kill you.
 -- Robb, on the LiveAboard list


People who enjoy ruffling feathers generally have a bad time with
porcupines. :)
 -- BAO


Adversity is a strainer which refuses to pass the ill-equipped.
 -- Robert Heinlein, "Beyond This Horizon"


About twenty years ago, a female acquaintance asked me to name the one
non-physical and non-sexual attribute I would most want in a woman. I
thought about this question for a long time. Competence combined with an
absolute unwillingness to give up, I finally answered. I want a woman
that if I ever got thrown in a Third World prison, she would get me out.
 -- John Ross


Because people cannot see the color of words, the tints of words, the
secret ghostly motion of words; because they cannot hear the whispering
of words, the rustling of the procession of letters, the dream-flutes
and dream-drums, which are thinly and weirdly played by words; because
they cannot perceive the pouting of words, the frowning and fuming of
words, the weeping, the raging and racketing and rioting of words;
because they are insensible to the phosphorescing of words, the
fragrance of words, the noisomeness of words, the tenderness or
hardness, the dryness or juiciness of words - the interchange of values
in the gold, the silver, the brass and the copper of words - Is that
any reason why we should not try to make them hear, to make them see, to
make them feel?
 -- Lafcadio Hearn, to his editor when the latter complained about him
    using unfamiliar words.


Success can be defined as the progressive realization of a worthy ideal.
 -- Earl Nightingale


People of integrity and honesty not only practice what they preach,
they are what they preach.
 -- David A. Bednar


I contend that we are both atheists. I just believe in one fewer god
than you do. When you understand why you dismiss all the other possible
gods, you will understand why I dismiss yours.
 -- Stephen F. Roberts


Remember, every time you open your mouth to talk, your mind walks out
and parades up and down on the words.
 -- Edwin H. Stuart


On the plains of hesitation lie the blackened bones of countless
millions who at the dawn of victory lay down to rest, and in resting
died.
 -- Adlai E. Stevenson


Human history becomes more and more a race between education and
catastrophe.
 -- HG Wells


As nightfall does not come at once, neither does oppression. In both
instances, there is a twilight when everything remains seemingly
unchanged. And it is in such twilight that we all must be most aware of
change in the air however slight lest we become unwitting victims of the
darkness.
 -- William O. Douglas


It is impossible to sharpen a pencil with a blunt axe. It is equally
vain to try to do it with ten blunt axes instead.
 -- Edsger Dijkstra


The next thing I've learned from my failures is something familiar to
the test-driven development crowd. It's mandatory to fail early. You
need to know you're in trouble right away. That's essential when taking
over an existing project or starting something new. You have to find out
how you're doing within weeks. Not quarters, not months. The longer you
wait, the more inertia the failure will have.
 -- Reginald Braithwaite


If you decide to run with the ball, just count on fumbling and getting
the shit knocked out of you, but never forget how much fun it is just to
be able to run with the ball.
 -- Jimmy Buffett


We tend to seek easy, single-factor explanations of success. For most
important things, though, success actually requires avoiding many
separate causes of failure.
 -- Jared Diamond


Programming something even half decent requires considerable
intellectual ability. That's not all there is to it, but if you're
not smart, it will be much harder for you to be a decent programmer.
We're mostly in denial about this and would like to believe that
programming can be done by anyone or can be made somehow unnecessary.
It's the opposite view we take to managerial or executive ability,
where we pay through the node for talent. Yet it's been known since we
started building software that some programmers are much better than
others. Maybe all disciplines are like this, but it is very obvious in
programming. Naturally this intelligence makes people who don't have it
uncomfortable, particularly if that person is supposed to lead or
organize very smart people to do something that they don't fully
understand, even though that person is probably better paid, more
socially equipped and has nothing to worry about.
 -- Bill de hÓra


Don't blame me for the fact that competent programming, as I view it
as an intellectual possibility, will be too difficult for 'the average
programmer'. You must not fall into the trap of rejecting a surgical
technique because it is beyond the capabilities of the barber in his
shop around the corner.
 -- Edsger Dijkstra


You have sat too long for any good you have been doing. Depart, I say,
and let us have done with you. In the name of God, go!
 -- Oliver Cromwell to the Long Parliament, and Leopold Amery, MP, to
    Neville Chamberlain in ousting him after the Norway fiasco


An undefined problem has an infinite number of solutions.
 -- Robert A. Humphrey


It's difficult to hold a conversation with someone whose livelihood
requires that he not understand you.
 -- an Army officer, via Karsten Self


Of course, when Picasso made the comment about computers being
uninteresting, we know that he was really seeking to advance a discourse
in which it was the role of artists to challenge the establishment, ask
questions, or at least see that the correct serving of fries accompanied
each order.
 -- Peter van der Linden, "Expert C Programming: Deep C Secrets"


Try speaking broken English with a hint of retard, he doesn't understand
logic.
 -- Anonymous


According to a news item from the U.K. Institution of Engineering and
Technology, a team organised by the SANS Institute analysed 7000 detected
security vulnerabilities from 1996 (the item says "the 7000" but doesn't
say further how they were identified), and found that 85% of them were
caused by three phenomena:

  * Failure to check user input
  * Allowing buffer overflows (that is, failing to hinder them)
  * Handling integer type checks or overflows incorrectly

  -- RISKS Digest


"Advice is free. If I have to get out my tools, I charge."
 -- Larry Pardey


I think religion is a form of mental disorder, but you have the right to
believe whatever you want regardless of how stupid I think it is.
 -- Marc Perkel, ctyme.com


We are the descendants of three billion years of fucking. Our parents
fucked to create us. Their parents fucked to create them. Every
generation is the result of the fucking of the previous generation.
Everything all the way down to bacteria wants to fuck something. Even
plants want to fuck. That's what flowers are. Flowers are the organs
that plants use to fuck with. Fucking is the way advanced life
reproduces on this planet. Where there is no fucking, life ceases to
exist. Life depends on fucking. That's the way it is.
 -- Marc Perkel, ctyme.com


The natural state of all equipment is broken. Maintenance is an artificial
intervention into that natural state.
 -- Marc Perkel, ctyme.com


You gotta be a little bit fearless. You gotta a be a little bit crazy, a
little bit uncertain, a little bit Britney with how you dance with the
energy. And you gotta notice it when you do it. Here's the trick: Those
things that you feel most terrified about releasing, that seem to
contain your entire identity and without which you wouldn't fully
recognize yourself, well, maybe they should be the first things to feel
the razor: jobs, cars, hair, photographs, bedsheets, houses, ideologies,
religions. To what do you cling? What holds all your fear of change?

Trim it. Paint it. Rearrange it. Burn it honor it love it remember it
and then, maybe, shave it. Shave it all. See the bare, lumpy, gorgeous
scalp underneath. Then regrow at will. What, you have something more
important to do?
 -- Mark Morford, SFGate


In the circumstances where there is no paper evidence, you couch your
acts in such a way that creates reasonable doubt. In circumstances where
there is paper evidence, where you cannot dispute the facts, you use the
common defense of 'everybody does it' and that others colluded with
you to create your problem to try and mitigate your guilt.
 -- Bill Bond, at iamfacingforeclosure.com


"Whenever young people are allowed to indulge in something old people
are not allowed to, it makes us bitter. What did we have? The mall and
the parking lot of the 7-Eleven? It sucked to grow up when we did! And
we're mad about it now. [...] You didn't behave like that because
nobody gave you the option."
 -- Clay Shirky, Professor of New Media, NYU


What seems freakish and dangerous to the older generation is often simply
yawning, obvious second nature to the young. Is it not always the way?
 -- Mark Morford, "The Morning Fix", SFGate


This is the message [of modern advertising]: The world is a shockingly
toxic place, you are not the slightest bit safe, you could get sick and die
at any second from merely touching the wrong surface and then sucking your
fingertips and this goes doubly true if that surface happens to be Lindsay
Lohan or Bill O'Reilly or American foreign policy.
 -- Mark Morford, SFGate


"The act of worship, as carried on by Christians, seems to me to be
debasing rather than ennobling. It involves grovelling before a Being,
who, if he really exists, deserves to be denounced rather than
respected."
 -- H. L. Mencken


"Interestingly, most Unix utilities have a command line option which
will cause the system to rip the user's legs off and beat them to death
with the soggy ends. This is often the default behaviour."
 -- Bruce Murphy


"I see little evidence in this world of the so-called goodness of God.
On the contrary, it seems to me that, on the strength of His daily acts,
He must be set down a most stupid, cruel, and villainous fellow."
 -- H. L. Mencken


"Christian theology is not only opposed to the scientific spirit; it is
opposed to every other form of rational thinking."
 -- H. L. Mencken


You have to expect things of yourself before you can do them.
 -- Michael Jordan


Paradise is surrounded by what we dislike; the fires of hell are
surrounded by what we desire.
 -- Rumi


Because everything else is irrelevant at 150mph.
 -- PGK, in the http://www.sportbikes.ws forum


Losers always complain about doing their best. Winners go home and fuck the
prom Queen.
 -- CarterUMR, in the http://www.sportbikes.ws forum


To Be Old and Wise
You Must First Be
Young and Stupid
But Stupid hurts

You learn more by falling
Than by the fear of falling
But falling sure hurts like hell

 -- SilverF4, in the http://www.sportbikes.ws forum


"It was a Zen moment and I was one with the bike, etc, etc, etc. Or, I
simply had my head up my ass. It was one of those things, it's just hard
to differentiate sometimes."
 -- quote from the MaximumSuzuki board


Don't live down to expectations. Go out there and do something
remarkable.
 -- Wendy Wasserstein


The lessons of history teach us - if they teach us anything
 - that nobody learns the lessons that history teaches us.


"My aim is to agitate and disturb people.
I'm not selling bread, I'm selling yeast."
 -- Miguel de Unamuno


Those who restrain desire, do so because theirs is weak enough to be
restrained.
 -- William Blake


Patriotism is of its nature defensive, both militarily and culturally.
Nationalism, on the other hand, is inseparable from the desire for power.
The abiding purpose of every nationalist is to secure more power and more
prestige, NOT for himself but for the nation or other unit in which he has
chosen to sink his own individuality. [...] Political or military
commentators, like astrologers, can survive almost any mistake, because
their more devoted followers do not look to them for an appraisal of the
facts but for the stimulation of nationalistic loyalties.
 -- George Orwell, "Notes on Nationalism"


I honestly don't care if you or anyone else gets "converted" to Linux. I
don't have to. I'm no better off if you do; I'm no worse off if you don't.

What I do care about is making useful information and help available
to people using Linux or interested in it. Why? Partly to redeem the trust
shown by others when they helped me. Partly because it's interesting.
Partly because researching and then teaching things I usually start knowing
little about is the best way I know to learn. And partly out of pure,
unadulterated self-interest: people knowing your name is at least a foot in
the door, in the IT business.
 -- Rick Moen


The great enemy of clear language is insincerity.
 -- George Orwell, "Politics and the English Language"


Discipline is the bridge between goals and accomplishments.
 -- Jim Rohn


Life Will Not Go According to Plan, If You Do Not Have a Plan.
 -- Kevin Wilke, NitroMarketing.com


So, hey Patrick, you cowardly bullying fetid bag of festering anal chancre
pus, when is that ugly cross-eyed skanky syphilitic whore of a daughter of
yours going to pop the deformed genetically defective bastard offspring out
of her bloated stretch-marked belly?
 -- a.r.c. archives


There is wisdom in turning as often as possible from the familiar to the
unfamiliar: it keeps the mind nimble, it kills prejudice, and it fosters
humour.
 -- George Santayana, The Birth of Reason and Other Essays


I have no axe to grind; only my thoughts to burnish.
 -- George Santayana, Character and Opinion in the United States


What establishes superstitions is haste to understand, rash confidence
in the moral intelligibility of things.
 -- George Santayana


It is war that wastes a nation's wealth, chokes its industries, kills
its flower, narrows its sympathies, condemns it to be governed by
adventurers, and leaves the puny, deformed, and unmanly to breed the
next generation.
 -- George Santayana


... in love the heart surrenders itself entirely to the one being that
has known how to touch it. That being is not selected; it is recognised
and obeyed.
  -- George Santayana, The Life of Reason, 1905


Those who cannot remember the past are condemned to repeat it. [ ... ]
This is the condition of children and barbarians, in which instinct has
learned nothing from experience.
 -- George Santayana, The Life of Reason, 1905


The young man who has not wept is a savage,
and the old man who will not laugh is a fool.
 -- George Santayana, Dialogues in Limbo (1925)


Happiness is the only sanction of life; where happiness fails,
existence remains a mad and lamentable experiment.
 -- George Santayana, Life of Reason (1905)


Fanaticism consists in redoubling your effort when you have forgotten
your aim.
 -- George Santayana, Life of Reason (1905)


Science is nothing but developed perception, interpreted intent, common
sense rounded out and minutely articulated.
 -- George Santayana


When a resolute young fellow steps up to the great bully, the world, and
takes him boldly by the beard, he is often surprised to find it comes
off in his hand, and that it was only tied on to scare away the timid
adventurers.
 -- Ralph Waldo Emerson


"He thinks he's got some kind of immunity to her headgames? That kind of
arrogance is just laughable. I don't care if you are coated in teflon -
if shit is being flung and you are anywhere in the vicinity, some of it
is going to land on YOU."
 -- Tavia


"PEACE comes not from an ABSENCE of Strife and Conflict, but in our
ability to COPE with it."
 -- unknown


Acknowledgement is a no-kidding, unvarnished, bottom-line, truthful
confrontation with yourself about what you are doing or not doing, or
what you are putting up with in your life that is destructive. It's not
some pious, phoney-baloney, half-hearted rendition of what you think
they want to hear. Nor is it a watered-down, politically correct
'confession' that you think will buy you closure at the expense of
truth. I mean brutal reality: slapping yourself in the face and
admitting what you are doing to screw up your life. This also means
admitting that you are getting payoffs for what you're doing, however
sick or subtle those payoffs are.
 -- Philip C. McGraw (from "Life Strategies")


`Here, sanity ... niiiiiice sanity, come to daddy ... okay, that's a
good sanity ... {*THWONK!*} _Got_ the bastard.'
 -- AdB


A ship in the harbor is safe... but that's not what ships were made for.


"The more you seek security, the less of it you have. But the more you
seek opportunity, the more likely it is that you will achieve the
security that you desire."
 -- Brian Tracy


Look at your entire business, front-to-back, look for every single place in
it that is dependent on you, and figure out how to automate that function
to remove yourself from the process.
 -- Alain Diza


"This is Unix. Stop acting so helpless."
 -- D.J. Bernstein


The very essence of leadership is that you have to have vision. You
can't blow an uncertain trumpet.
 - Theodore M. Hesburgh


A mosquito cried out in pain:
"A chemist has poisoned my brain!"
The cause of his sorrow
Was para-dichloro-
Diphenyltrichloroethane.


"I didn't want to write for pay. I wanted to be paid for what I write."
 -- Leonard Cohen


You cannot dream yourself into a character; you must hammer and forge
yourself one.
 -- James A. Froude


"Nowadays every girl with a henna tattoo and a spice rack thinks she's a
sister of the Dark Ones."
 - Willow Rosenberg (Buffy the Vampire Slayer)


Hate is no joke - and it should never be a punchline.
 -- Sean Hayes, CBS


We generally think of computer security as a problem of technology, but
often systems fail because of misplaced economic incentives: the people
who could protect a system are not the ones who suffer the costs of
failure.
 -- Bruce Schneier, "Cryptogram"


As every man goes through life he fills in a number of forms for the
record, each containing a number of questions... There are thus hundreds
of little threads radiating from every man, millions of threads in all.
If these threads were suddenly to become visible, the whole sky would
look like a spider's web, and if they materialized as rubber bands,
buses, trams and even people would all lose the ability to move, and the
wind would be unable to carry torn-up newspapers or autumn leaves along
the streets of the city. They are not visible, they are not material,
but every man is constantly aware of their existence... Each man,
permanently aware of his own invisible threads, naturally develops a
respect for the people who manipulate the threads.
 -- Alexander Solzhenitsyn (1968)


The poor, the unsuccessful, the unhappy, the unhealthy are the ones who
use the word 'tomorrow' the most.
 - Robert Kiyosaki


Computer games don't affect kids. I mean, if Pac-Man affected us as
kids, we'd all be running around in darkened rooms, munching magic pills
and listening to repetitive electronic music.
 -- Kristian Wilson, Nintendo Inc., 1989


Successful people ask better questions, and as a result, they get
better answers.
 - Anthony Robbins


People often say that motivation doesn't last. Well, neither does
bathing - that's why we recommend it daily.


Ayurveda observes that after any given meal, the stomach should contain
approximately 50 percent solid food - the amount that would fit comfortably
into your outstretched, cupped hands - 25 percent liquids, and 25 percent
air - a necessary ingredient for any process of combustion, which is
essentially what digestion is.
 -- Scott Gerson, M.D., director of the National Institute of Ayurvedic
    Medicine


We are not held back by the love we didn't receive in the past, but by
the love we're not extending in the present.
 -- Marianne Williamson


Too many of us are not living our dreams because we are living our
fears.
 -- Les Brown


Beliefs are just thoughts with _credentials._
 -- Lama Tsultrim Yeshe (John Samuelson)


Thoughts are just what is. They appear. They're innocent. They're not
personal. They're like the breeze or the leaves on the trees or the
raindrops falling. Thoughts arise like that, and we can make friends
with them. Would you argue with a raindrop?
 -- Byron Katie, author of "The Work"


The strongest oak of the forest is not the one that is protected from
the storm and hidden from the sun. It's the one that stands in the open
where it is compelled to struggle for its existence against the winds
and rains and the scorching sun.
 -- Napoleon Hill


Most misfortunes are the results of misused time.
 -- Napoleon Hill


"...what qualities I considered absolutely essential and basic in a
lovable woman... A good mind, of course; high cheekbones, clear eyes, a
long neck, slender wrists, beautiful hands, impeccable ankles, and, deep
down somewhere, only known to me, an unmistakeable streak of
whorishness. May heaven preserve me from ever going to bed with a
righteous female. Take my word for it, when a doll thinks she's got
the holy grail under her skirts, she'll finish you off faster than
heart failure in a typhoon."
 -- Alexander King, "May This House Be Safe From Tigers"


There is, has been, and will always be a certain group of people whom
inspiration visits. It's made up of all those who've consciously chosen
their calling and do their job with love and imagination. [ ... ]
Whatever inspiration is, it's born from a continuous "I don't know."
 -- Wislawa Szymborska, Nobel Prize acceptance speech


"All the king's horses and all the king's men can't put the past
together again. So let's remember: Don't try to saw sawdust."
 - Dale Carnegie


"Remember, a real decision is measured by the fact that you've taken new
action. If there's no action, you haven't truly decided."
 -- Anthony Robbins


The meeting of preparation with opportunity generates the offspring we
call luck.
 -- Anthony Robbins


Some days, violence is just a nice quick solution to a problem that would
need thought, planning and actual work to do justice to.
 -- Wayne Pascoe


He that would make his own liberty secure, must guard even his enemy from
opposition; for if he violates this duty he establishes a precedent that
will reach himself.
 -- Thomas Paine


There are two rules on the spiritual path: Begin and Continue.
 -- Sufi saying


Men never do evil so completely and cheerfully as when they do it from
religious conviction.
 -- Pascal


As you press on for justice, be sure to move with dignity and
discipline, using only the weapon of love. Let no man pull you so low as
to hate him. Always avoid violence. If you succumb to the temptation of
using violence in your struggle, unborn generations will be the
recipients of a long and desolate night of bitterness, and your chief
legacy to the future will be an endless reign of meaningless chaos.
 -- Martin Luther King, Jr.


Do not believe in telling people of one's faith, especially with a view
to conversion. Faith must be lived, and when it is, it becomes
self-propagating.
 -- Mahatma Gandhi


The only tyrant I accept in this world is the still voice within.
 -- Mahatma Gandhi


I see only with deep regret that God punishes so many of His children
for their numerous stupidities, for which only He Himself can be held
responsible; in my opinion, only His nonexistence could excuse Him.
 -- Albert Einstein


Use what talent you possess: the woods would be very silent if no birds
sang except those that sang best.
 -- Henry Van Dyke


The scars you acquire by exercising courage will never make you feel
inferior.
 -- D. A. Battista


Children are naive - they trust everyone. School is bad enough, but
if you put a child anywhere in the vicinity of a church, you're asking
for trouble.
 - Frank Zappa


One's dignity may be assaulted, vandalized and cruelly mocked, but
cannot be taken away unless it is surrendered.
 -- Michael J. Fox


Humans with small brains... believe in small human-like gods with small
human-like brains.


Consideration of the method used in diverse orders of knowledge allows
for the concordance of two points of view which seem irreconcilable. The
science of observation describes with ever greater precision the
multiple manifestations of life... while theology extracts the final
meaning according to the Creator's designs.
 -- Pope John Paul II


When attractive profits disappear at one stage in the value chain
because a product becomes modular and commoditized, the opportunity to
earn attractive profits with proprietary products will usually emerge at
an adjacent stage.
 -- Clayton Christensen


The whole art of teaching is only the art of awakening the natural
curiosity of young minds for the purpose of satisfying it afterwards.
 -- Anatole France


The lecturer should give the audience full reason to believe that all
his powers have been exerted for their pleasure and instruction.
 -- Michael Faraday


How can we hope to remain economically competitive in a world in
which...90% of Dutch high-school students take advanced math courses and
100% of teachers in Germany have double majors, while the best we can
say about our "pocket of excellence" is that 75% of [American] students
have learned to "critique tactfully?"
 -- Barbara J. Alexander


A teacher affects eternity; he can never tell where his influence
stops.
 -- Henry B. Adams


Education, then, beyond all other devices of human origin, is the great
equalizer of the conditions of man - the balance-wheel of the social
machinery.
 -- Horace Mann


Education is not the filling of a pail, but the lighting of a fire.
 -- W. B. Yeats


The essence of intelligence is skill in extracting meaning from everyday
experience.


Education is a companion which no future can depress, no crime can
destroy, no enemy can alienate it and no nepotism can enslave.
 -- Ropo Oguntimehin


"The best thing for being sad," replied Merlin, beginning to puff and
blow, "is to learn something. That's the only thing that never fails.
You may grow old and trembling in your anatomies, you may lie awake at
night listening to the disorder of your veins, you may miss your only
love, you may see the world about you devastated by evil lunatics, or
know your honour trampled in the sewers of baser minds. There is only
one thing for it then to learn. Learn why the world wags and what wags
it. That is the only thing which the mind can never exhaust, never
alienate, never be tortured by, never fear or distrust, and never dream
of regretting. Learning is the only thing for you. Look what a lot of
things there are to learn."
 -- T.H. White, "The Once and Future King"


With just a little education and practice on how to manage your emotions,
you can move into a new experience of life so rewarding that you will be
motivated to keep on managing your emotional nature in order to sustain it.
The payoff is delicious in terms of improved quality of life.
 -- Doc Childre


Education's purpose is to replace an empty mind with an open one.
 -- Malcolm Forbes


Education makes people easy to lead, but difficult to drive; easy to
govern, but impossible to enslave.
 -- Henry Peter Broughan


Are you bored with life? Then throw yourself into some work you believe
in with all your heart, live for it, die for it, and you will find
happiness that you had thought could never be yours.
 - Dale Carnegie


Aut inveniam viam aut faciam.
(I'll either find a way or make one.)
 -- Hannibal


...modern cyberspace is not the friendly, open, trusting, safe place it
was back in February. Modern cyberspace is a deadly, festering swamp,
teeming with dangerous programs such as "viruses", "worms", "Trojan
Horses" and "licensed Microsoft software" that can take over your
computer and render it useless.
 -- Dave Barry


Change what you're saying,
Don't change what you said
 -- The Eels


THE VERY BIG STUPID is a thing which breeds by eating The Future. Have
you seen it? It sometimes disguises itself as a good-looking quarterly
bottom line, derived by closing the R&D department.
 -- Frank Zappa


My grandparents went to a planet with no bilateral symmetry, and all I
got was this lousy F-shirt.


In the unlikely event of losing Pascal's Wager, I intend to saunter into
Judgement Day with a bookshelf full of grievances, a flaming sword of my
own devising, and a serious attitude problem.
 -- Rick Moen


Usenet is not a right.
 -- Mark Moraes
 
Usenet is a right, a left, a jab, and a sharp uppercut to the jaw. The
postman hits! You have new mail.
 -- Edward Vielmetti


"Impossible" is just a big word thrown around by small men who find it
  easier to live in the world they've been given than to explore the power
  they have to change it.
"Impossible" is not a fact - it's an opinion.
"Impossible" is not a declaration - it's a dare.
"Impossible" is potential.
"Imposible" is temporary.
"IMPOSSIBLE" IS NOTHING.


"Have you no sense of decency, sir? At long last, have you left no sense
of decency?"
 -- Boston Attorney Joe Welch, taking down Sen. Joe McCarthy


Just because a person has faith doesn't mean that he isn't full of
crap.
 -- PastorDan


Every job is a self portrait of the person who did it. Autograph your
work with excellence.
 -- Unknown


Too many of us are not living our dreams because we are living our
fears.
 -- Les Brown


The difference between great people and everyone else is that great
people create their lives actively, while everyone else is created by
their lives, passively waiting to see where life takes them next. The
difference between the two is the difference between living fully and
just existing.
 - Michael E. Gerber


Whatever you're ready for is ready for you.
 -- Mark Victor Hansen


Chains of habit are too light to be felt until they are too heavy to be
broken.
 -- Warren Buffett


The discipline of writing something down is the first step toward making
it happen.
 -- Lee Iacocca


A society of sheep must in time beget a government of wolves.
 -- Bertrand de Juvenal


Big goals get big results. No goals get no results or somebody else's
results.
 -- Mark Victor Hansen


There is no scarcity of opportunity to make a living at what you love to
do, there is only scarcity of resolve to make it happen.
 -- Wayne Dyer


In the Beginning there was nothing. So God said "apt-get install light".
 -- Tim Bray


Your own mind is a sacred enclosure into which nothing harmful can enter
except by your permission.
 -- Ralph Waldo Emerson


You do not merely want to be considered just the best of the best. You
want to be considered the only one who does what you do.
 -- Jerry Garcia


You may have a fresh start any moment you choose, for this thing that we
call "failure" is not the falling down, but the staying down.
 -- Mary Pickford


A difficult time can be more readily endured if we retain the
conviction that our existence holds a purpose - a cause to pursue, a
person to love, a goal to achieve.
 -- John Maxwell


The other day, upon the stair,
I met a man who wasn't there.
He wasn't there again today;
I think he's from the CIA.


People with goals succeed because they know where they are going...
It's as simple as that.
 -- Earl Nightingale


Let me not pray to be sheltered from dangers, but to be fearless in
facing them. Let me not beg for the stilling of my pain, but for the
heart to conquer it.
 -- Rabindranath Tagore


It's the damndest thing. There's something wrong with every last one of
you, and I *never* thought that was a possibility. But now I feel it's the
only reasonable conclusion.
 -- Jesse F. Hughes


Est autem fides credere quod nondum vides; cuius fidei merces est
videre quod credis.
(Faith is to believe what you do not see; the reward of this faith is to
see what you believe.)
 -- S. Augustinus


The only thing that stands between a man and what he wants from life is
often merely the will to try it and the faith to believe that it is
possible.
 -- Richard M. DeVos


Ability is what you're capable of doing. Motivation determines what you
do. Attitude determines how well you do it.
 -- Lou Holtz


"The men who try to do something and fail are infinitely better than
those who try to do nothing and succeed."
 -- Lloyd Jones


Beloved Pan, and all ye other gods who haunt this place, make me
beautiful within, and grant that what-ever happens outside of me will
help my soul to grow. May I always be aware that true wealth lies in
wisdom, and may my "gold" be so abundant that only a wise man can lift
and carry it away. For me that is prayer enough.
 -- Socrates


Sexual acts are one of the primary means by which we can act out our
inarticulated inner lives.
 -- Sallie Tisdale


The one without dreams is the one without wings.
 -- Muhammad Ali


If you're never scared or embarrassed or hurt, it means you never take
any chances.
 -- Julia Sorel


Happiness is a conscious choice, not an automatic response.
 -- Michael Bartel


Conspiracy theories are the sophistication of the ignorant.


As long as there are final exams, there will be prayer in public
schools.


"Better" is better than "not better", any day of the week. :)
 -- BAO


You always do what you want to do. This is true with every act. You may
say that you had to do something, or that you were forced to, but
actually, whatever you do, you do by choice. Only you have the power to
choose for yourself.
 -- W. Clement Stone


Destroy the sun! We hatessss it! It burns! The pale yellow face mocks
us, keeps us from hearing the machine. It causes global warming. It
causes sunburns. DARPA says the sun is bad, it warms our enemies. It
weakens our dependence on foreign oil. There's only one logical
conclusion: we must destroy the sun.
 -- Mike Salib, _Starkiller_ talk, at PyCon 2004


I only seek a peaceful settlement to my just demands. This is
absolutely my last territorial ambition.
 -- Adolph Hitler


It's easier to build a child than repair an adult.


The whore is closer to God than the theologian.


The future belongs to the risk takers, not the security seekers. The more
you seek security, the less of it you will have and the more you pursue
opportunity, the more security you will achieve.
 -- Brian Tracy 


High achievement always takes place in the framework of high expectation.
 -- Jack and Garry Kinder


Declare the past, diagnose the present, foretell the future; practice these
acts. As to diseases, make a habit of two things - to help, or at least do
no harm.
 -- Hippocrates, "Epidemics" 


A 'no' uttered from deepest conviction is better and greater than a
'yes' merely uttered to please, or what is worse, to avoid trouble.
 -- Mahatma Gandhi


Life is NP-hard, and then you die.
 -- Dave Cock


If ye love wealth greater than liberty, the tranquility of servitude
greater than the animating contest for freedom, go home from us in
peace. We seek not your counsel, nor your arms. Crouch down and lick the
hand that feeds you; and posterity forget that ye were our countrymen.
 -- Samuel Adams


For what fertility of genius, what copiousness of eloquence can be so
great, what language can be found of such divine and extraordinary
power, as to enable any one, I will not say to do due honour to the
universal kindness of you all towards us, but even to count up and
enumerate all the separate acts of kindness which we have received from
you?
 -- Marcus Tullius Cicero


My house burned down
But anyway, it was after
The flower petals had already fallen.
 -- Chibana Hokushi


Always remember, to every reality there's a shadow. Just because you see a
woman standing at a bus stop don't mean she's waiting for a bus. Eyes
closed don't mean sleep. Good-bye don't mean gone.
 -- Randy in Jane Juska's "Round-Heeled Woman"


With the intellect I always have - always shall overcome, but that is not
the half of the work. The life, the life, O my God! Shall the life never be
sweet?
 -- Margaret Fuller


Warrior-bodhisattvas enter challenging situations in order to alleviate
suffering.
 -- Pema Chödrön


Wherever we are, we can train as a warrior. Our tools are sitting
meditation, tonglen, slogan practice, and cultivating the four limitless
qualities of loving-kindness, compassion, joy, and equanimity.
 -- Pema Chödrön


If we find ourselves in doubt that we're up to being a warrior-in-training,
we can contemplate this question: "Do I prefer to grow up and relate to
life directly, or do I choose to live and die in fear?"
 -- Pema Chödrön


Every winner has scars.
 -- Herbert N. Casson


"A woman should wear a fragrance wherever she expects to be kissed."
 -- Coco Chanel


~ A search for "the quiet" in which the small inner voice could be heard
~ A longing for the authentic and the real
~ A visceral need for self-expression
~ A sense of rebellion against the "captivity" of our old lives
~ An inchoate sense of something unimaginable about to be born out of the
	disorganization of our lives
 -- Stephen Cope's list of motives for change at 40 (from "Yoga and the
 Quest for the True Self")


In the world of yoga, primitive and archaic religious forms lie side by
side with the most sublime and sophisticated spirituality known to
humankind.
 -- Stephen Cope, "Yoga and the Quest for the True Self"


Do not kill the instinct of the body for the glory of the pose.
 -- Vanda Scaravelli


The only authority is within the soul.
 -- Krishna Prem


My position is generally a reactive one. I am viewed by Marxists as too
codic, by feminists as too male-identified, by indigenous theorists as
too committed to Western Theory. I am uneasily pleased about this.
 -- Gayatri Spivak


The desire to know oneself more deeply is often rooted in the feeling of
never having been known.
 -- Dr. Mark Epstein


In Buddhism, we are constantly practicing the mindful observance of
ourselves, including the arising, abiding, and subsiding of destructive
emotions like anger. We don't stuff our anger down, but we don't buy its
storyline either.
 -- Thubten Chödrön 


Yogis understand anger as an energy existing, like all emotions, halfway
between a physical and mental experience.
 -- Stephen Cope


You had to admire the way perfectly innocent words were mugged, ravished,
stripped of all true meaning and decency and then sent to walk the gutter
for Reacher Gilt, although 'synergistically' had probably been a whore from
the start.
 -- Terry Pratchett, "Going Postal"


Breathe
Relax
Feel
Watch
Allow
 -- Daya Shakti's (Sandra Shearer) "Ride The Wave" process for emotional
 release


Always meditate on whatever provokes resentment.
 -- Buddhist teaching


This very moment is the perfect teacher.
 -- Pema Chödrön


If we were to make a list of people we don't like - people we find
obnoxious, threatening, or worthy of contempt - we would discover much
about those aspects of ourselves that we can't face. [ ... ] The people who
repel us unwittingly show us aspects of ourselves that we find
unacceptable, which otherwise we can't see.
 -- Pema Chödrön


What remains unconscious will come to us as fate.
 -- Carl Jung


Understanding spiritual development as a tension arc between these two
poles [awareness and equanimity] is crucial.
 -- Stephen Cope, "Yoga and the Quest for the True Self"


Through refraining, we see that there is something between the arising of
the craving - or the aggression or the loneliness or whatever it might be -
and whatever action we take as a result. There's something there in us that
we don't want to experience, and we never do experience, because we're so
quick to act.
 --  Pema Chödrön


According to anthropologists, the favorite territory of human beings is
high ground above water.


Reality is relentless. It follows behind every denial, every avoidance,
until it is embraced with open arms.
 -- Amrit Desai


Living in the moment is the most dangerous situation anybody ever faces in
life, because everything you have ever avoided is revealed to you [...] You
get to face all the denied contents of your subconscious as they reappear
again and again through the events of your life.
 -- Amrit Desai


Fear is a natural reaction to moving closer to the truth.
 -- Pema Chödrön


The spiritual journey is not about heaven and finally getting to a place
that's really swell.
 -- Pema Chödrön


Drive all blames into oneself. The essence of this slogan is, "When it
hurts so bad, it's because I'm hanging on so tight."
 -- Buddhist /mahayana/ teachings, via Pema Chödrön


Lean into the sharp points.
 --Buddhist teachings


When you get right down to the root of the meaning of the word
"succeed," you find that it simply means to follow through.
 -- F. W. Nichol


Resentment is like swallowing poison and waiting for the other person to
die.


Only to the extent that we expose ourselves over and over to annihilation
can that which is indestructible be found in us.
 -- via Pema Chödrön


Love of the truth puts you on the spot.
 -- motto of the Naropa Institute


It is possible to move through the drama of our lives without believing so
earnestly in the character that we play.
 -- Pema Chödrön


Inquisitiveness or curiosity involves being gentle, precise and open -
actually being able to let go and open. Gentleness is a sense of
goodheartedness toward ourselves. Precision is being able to see very
clearly, not being afraid to see what's really there, just as a scientist
is not afraid to look into the microscope. Openness is being able to let go
and open.
 -- Pema Chödrön, "The Wisdom of No Escape"


Confess your hidden faults.
Approach what you find repulsive.
Help those you think you cannot help.
Anything you are attached to, let it go.
Go to places that scare you.
 -- advice from a Tibetan yoga teacher


Any fool can make things bigger, more complex, and more violent. It takes a
touch of genius - and a lot of courage - to move in the opposite direction.
 -- Albert Einstein


I will not let anyone walk through my mind with their dirty feet.
 -- Mahatma Gandhi


I will love the light for it shows me the way, yet I will endure the
darkness because it shows me the stars.
 -- Og Mandino


Hatha Yoga teaches us to use the body as the bow, the /asana/ (posture) as
the arrow, and the soul as the target.
  -- B. K. S. Iyengar


Expectations are resentments under construction.
 -- Anne Lamott


Bullies are always to be found where there are cowards.
 -- Mahatma Gandhi


In France, they ignore those who set fires and punish those who give the alarm.
 -- Nicolas Chamfort, French writer


Is this "deja moo"? Have I heard this bullshit before?


Contemplate thy powers, contemplate thy wants and thy connections; so shalt
thou discover the duties of life, and be directed in all thy ways.
 -- Akhenaton


We can debug relationships, but it's always good policy to consider the
people themselves to be features. People get annoyed when you try to
debug them.
 -- Larry Wall


"Future" is inherently plural.
 -- William Gibson


Let us not look back in anger, nor forward in fear, but around in
awareness.
 -- James Thurber


Be wary of systems that degrade gracefully, for unless they inflict some
pain in an attempt to right their hurt, they will tend to always operate
in a degraded state.
 -- Kent Borg


All power is delightful, but absolute power is absolutely delightful.
 -- Kenneth Tynan


Nothing can stop the man with the right mental attitude from achieving
his goal; nothing on earth can help the man with the wrong mental
attitude.
 -- Thomas Jefferson


You can't wait for inspiration. You have to go after it with a club.
 -- Jack London


There are no secrets to success. It is the result of preparation, hard
work, and learning from failure.
 -- Colin Powell


A strong nation, like a strong person, can afford to be gentle, firm,
thoughtful, and restrained. It can afford to extend a helping hand to
others. It's a weak nation, like a weak person, that must behave with
bluster and boasting and rashness and other signs of insecurity.
 - Jimmy Carter


The state of your life is nothing more than a reflection of your state
of mind.
 - Dr. Wayne W. Dyer


Make no small plans for they have not the power to stir men's blood.
 - Niccolo Machiavelli


The consequences of our actions take us by the scruff of the neck,
altogether indifferent to the fact that we have "improved" in the
meantime.
 -- Nietzsche


C++ is a ridiculously complicated travesty that few have the excess IQ
points to understand enough not to screw up massively.
 -- Tom Christiansen


The best time to plant a tree was 20 years ago. The second best time is
now.
 -- Chinese Proverb


If you have an apple and I have an apple and we exchange apples then
you and I will still each have one apple. But if you have an idea and I
have an idea and we exchange these ideas, then each of us will have two
ideas.
 -- George Bernard Shaw


I am not bound to win, I am bound to be true. I am not bound to succeed,
but I am bound to live up to the light I have.
 -- Abraham Lincoln


Do not wait; the time will never be just right. Start where you stand,
and work with whatever tools you may have at your command, and better
tools will be found as you go along.
 -- Napoleon Hill


Yoga is like going to church and getting a massage at the same time.
 -- Hans Stoever


Value is that which one acts to gain and keep, virtue is the action by
which one gains and keeps it.
 -- Ayn Rand, "Atlas Shrugged"


Not much good for pretty, but pretty much good for strong.
 -- Jack Mayberry


Live with intention.
Walk the edge.
Listen hard.
Practice wellness.
Play with abandon.
Laugh.
Choose with no regret.
Continue to learn.
Appreciate your friends.
Do what you love.
Live as if this was all there is.
 -- Mary Anne Radmacher


[He] is more than just a sick mind looking to twist the perceptions of
those whose realities remain uncorrupted - though that should be enough
recommendation to read his work.
 -- Douglas Rushkoff, regarding Cory Doctorow's "Down and Out in the Magic
 Kingdom"


A man is a success if he gets up in the morning and goes to bed at night
and in between does what he wants to do.
 -- Bob Dylan


Control your destiny or somebody else will.
 -- Jack Welch


The question all men want answered: are women an NP-complete problem?
 -- k5 hardburn


When you take out the garbage, it stinks.
 -- Deva Parnell, on the pain of dealing with stored anger


Most people are fools, most authority is malignant, God does not exist,
and everything is wrong.
 -- Ted Nelson


Gaining enlightenment is an accident. Spiritual practice simply makes us
accident-prone.


Big goals get big results. No goals get no results or somebody else's
results.
 -- Mark Victor Hansen


Go ahead, light your candles and burn your incense and ring your bells
and call out to God, but watch out, because God will come and He will
put you on His anvil and fire up His forge and beat you and beat you
until he turns brass into pure gold.
 -- Sant Keshavadas


Courage is the ability to offer a tender heart to the challenges of
emotional upheaval.
 -- BAO


If only there were evil people out there insidiously committing evil
deeds and it was only necessary to separate them from the rest of us and
destroy them. But the line dividing good and evil cuts through the
heart of every human being, and who among us is willing to destroy a
piece of their own heart?
 -- Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn


Security is mostly a superstition. It does not exist in nature, nor do
the children of humans as a whole experience it. Avoiding danger is no
safer in the long run than outright exposure. Life is either a daring
adventure or nothing.
 -- Hellen Keller


There is no scarcity of opportunity to make a living at what you love to
do, there is only scarcity of resolve to make it happen.
 -- Wayne Dyer


I've been excited, awed, afraid, frustrated, touched deep, and stunned
by the beauty and power surrounding me, but I've almost forgotten what
it's like to be bored. The ocean fills some nameless void within me;
without it, I feel myself starving to death in the midst of plenty. I've
never been a religious man, all that I have read about religions
describes straitjackets which I could only wear by contorting myself
into unnatural shapes - but I've found something in Ocean that fills
that niche in me. It's not written in any books I know of, except for
shadows of it in my log, but it has to do with great admiration, love,
and respect for the infinite power and majesty of it, and with the joy
of knowing that I can live and prosper there if I only follow the old
rules etched in the stones of the fjords by the storms over millions of
years. It takes knowledge, effort - sometimes effort far beyond what
those living on land would consider possible - scrupulous honesty, and
unrelenting attention to duty, but it pays back in self-respect,
self-knowledge, growth, and other things too numerous to mention or even
impossible to describe outside your own brain and heart.
 -- BAO


There are moments of pure, heart-stopping beauty in the most tragic and
broken environments. And the loveliest community on earth will not be able
to eliminate the dog turd.
 -- Warren Ellis


When you have a number of disagreeable duties to perform, always do the
most disagreeable first.
 - Josiah Quincy


Once you have a clear picture of your priorities - that is values,
goals, and high leverage activities - organize around them.
 -- Stephen Covey


We have a natural right to make use of our pens as of our tongue, at our
peril, risk, and hazard.
 -- Voltaire


Anything to do with HTML processing /usually/ involves a pact with an
evil supernatural being, I find.
 -- Sean Burke


Only those defenses are good, certain and durable, which depend on
yourself alone and your own ability.
 -- Niccolo Machiavelli, " The Prince"


Break the program into tasks. Break each task into subtasks. Break down
each of those subtasks. Keep breaking it down (functional decomposition)
until the entire program is represented by trivially obvious subtasks.
Then code it, debug it, and deploy it.
 -- Steve Litt, "Software Design With Outlines"


The world's tragedies absolutely deserve our immediate attention. And
our hope. And our divine raw funky sexed-up intellectual perspective.
This is not a question. But what it needs even more is the
counter-energy. For us all to remember to shut it all off and get the
hell away from the computer and go have a glass of wine and a deep
tongue kiss and a romp and a an intense book and a hot sweaty yoga class
and a soft swoon to an incredible blues singer. This fuels the
resistance. Rekindles meaning. Steals life back from those who would
deign to devour it with pitchforks and judiciary committees and heavy
artillery.
 -- Mark Morford, "The Morning Fix"


It is a matter of craft but no genius to organize web content that
serves an organizational or business goal. But it is difficult if not
impossible to properly organize diffuse personal content, because such
content serves no particular purpose.
 -- Jeffrey Zeldman, zeldman.com


And I know you'll win. You're too bull-headed not to. I know you're
afraid, but I also know that you're the most stubborn guy I've ever met.
If anyone can beat an enemy just by wearing it out through sheer
willpower and refusal to surrender, that person is you. It's something
that I admire about you, as much as it occasionally infuriates me.
*grin*
 -- Rivka


The whole problem with the world is that fools and fanatics are always
so certain of themselves, and wiser people so full of doubts.
 -- Bertrand Russell


Sometimes I get the sudden urge to run around naked, but then I just
drink some Windex and it goes away. It keeps me from streaking.


Education is the best provision for old age.
 -- Aristotle


The thirteenth strike of a clock is not only obviously wrong, but it throws
great doubt upon the previous 12.


If you're not all about what happens next then you are probably way too
much about what happened before.
 -- Mark Morford, "The Morning Fix"


some people never go crazy.
what truly horrible lives
they must lead.
 -- Charles Bukowski


You call Donald Rumsfeld and tell him our sorry asses are ready to go
home. Tell him to come spend a night in our building.
 -- Pfc. Matthew C. O'Dell, in Iraq


Future is inherently plural.
 -- William Gibson


Time flies.
You can't.
They move too fast.
 -- demonstrating context in English


Club sandwiches
Not seals
 -- from the "Slippery English" department


I tried to get in touch with my inner child but he isn't allowed to talk
to strangers.


...there are opportunities for so many excellent puns in our language
that, to an educated person like myself, the temptation to express them
is almost irresistable.
 -- Professor H.M. Woggle-Bug, T.E.


No person is your friend who demands your silence, or denies your right
to grow.
 -- Alice Walker


...not only catch up to your muse but buy her four sake cocktails and
whisper sweet everythings into her ear and massage her ass with a fine
lavender oil and with deep kneading strokes until she moans and sighs
and opens you up to the possibilities.
 -- Mark Morford, "The Morning Fix"


When the only tool you have is Perl, the whole world begins to look like
your oyster.
 -- Roy Johnson


The difference between common sense and paranoia is that common sense is
thinking everyone is out to get you. That's normal; they are. Paranoia is
thinking they're conspiring.
 -- J. Kegler


C00K13 M0N573R 0WNZ J00!! PH34R C00K13 M0N573R 4ND 0SC4R 4ND 3LM0 4ND
5NUFFL3UP46U5 4ND 7H3 31337 535AM3 57R337 CR3W!!


Every turn you fear is empty air, dressed to look like jagged hell.
 -- Richard Bach


Tessa, when Chevette had had the conversation with her that had resulted
in her moving to Malibu, had said that she envied men the inability to
get it up, when there was something wrong. Even if they don't
consciously know, Tessa said, it won't happen. But we don't have that,
so something can be just as wrong as can be, and we still stay.
 -- William Gibson


The handles of a craftsman's tools bespeak an absolute simplicity, the
plainest forms affording the greatest range of possibilities for the user's
hand. That which is overdesigned, too highly specific, anticipates outcome;
the anticipation of outcome guarantees, if not failure, the absence of
grace.
 -- William Gibson


I am no more humble than my talents require.
 -- Oscar Levant


First thing to go in a zealot? Their sense of humor. Second:
Perspective. Third: Cool clothes.
 -- Mark Morford, "The Morning Fix"


"Heedless of grammar, they all cried 'It's him!'"
 -- R.H. Barham, "Misadventure at Margate"


First they came for the verbs, and I said nothing, for verbing weirds
language. Then, they arrival for the nouns and I speech nothing, for I
no verbs.
 -- Peter Ellis


It is perfectly monstrous, the way people go about nowadays saying things
against one, behind one's back, that are absolutely and entirely true.
 -- Oscar Wilde


Be the still pool. Let your face reflect the glory, the
wonder. Be the dragonfly, silent but joyful. 
Be the bud. Prepare to blossom. 
Be the tree. Grant shelter.
 -- Charmaine Aserappa, with regard to Vrksasana (the Tree posture)


No better friend
No worse enemy
 -- Lucius Cornelius Sulla's epitaph


I've had occasion to wonder if perhaps one of the great comforts of
religion is that it gives you someone to blame, and then someone to
forgive, for the death of a loved one.
 -- Eric Meyer, meyerweb.com


Engineers use Science to solve their problems, *if* the science is
available. but available or not, the problems must be solved, and
whatever form the solution takes under these conditions is called
engineering.
 -- Shigley and Mischke, "Mechanical Engineering Design"


God is beyond religion.
 -- Thich Nhat Hanh, "Call Me By My True Names"


There are ways to integrate the practice in your daily life. Buddhism
[deals] with the here and the now, your existing suffering. Buddhism
[does not] offer you relief in the future, after you die.
 -- Thich Nhat Hanh, "Call Me By My True Names"


...the spiritual dimension should be equal to the dimension of action. If
you lack spiritual dimension in your life as a social activist, you will
give up after some time of service. [ ... ] Doctors, nurses, and other
helping professionals should be helped, and that is why we have offered
special retreats for these people, and if they don't practice to nourish
themselves, to restore their peace and solidity, they will lose themselves
after a number of years - they will burn up.
 -- Thich Nhat Hanh, "Call Me By My True Names"


At the risk of seeming ridiculous, let me say that the true
revolutionary is guided by great feelings of love. It is impossible to
think of a genuine revolutionary lacking this quality.
 -- Che Guevarra


Don't use no double negatives.
Proofread carefully to see if you any words out.
Take the bull by the hand and avoid mixed metaphors.
If I've told you once, I've told you a thousand times, resist hyperbole.
"Avoid over use of 'quotation "marks."'"
Avoid commas, that are not necessary.
If you reread your work, you will find on rereading that a great deal of
	repetition can be avoided by rereading and editing.
Avoid cliches like the plague.
Never use a long word when a diminutive one will do.
Avoid colloquial stuff.
 -- William Safire's advice to authors


Java is COBOL 2.0.
 -- Deirdre Saoirse Moen


He has all the virtues I dislike and none of the vices I admire.
 -- Sir Winston Churchill


Wall Street has all the emotional stability of a thirteen-year-old girl.
 -- Louis Rukeyser


Do not believe in anything simply because you have heard it. Do not believe
simply because it has been handed down for many generations. Do not believe
in anything simply because it is spoken and rumored by many. Do not believe
in anything simply because it is written in Holy Scriptures. Do not believe
in anything merely on the authority of Teachers, elders or wise men.
Believe only after careful observation and analysis, when you find that it
agrees with reason and is conducive to the good and benefit of one and all.
Then accept it and live up to it.
 -- The Buddha, "Kalama Sutta"


Friendship is when one is always ready to sacrifice himself, and the
other will never accept it.
 -- translated from anekdot.ru


I used to be on the border of insanity. However, due to pressing
political concerns, I recently had to invade.
 -- Kurt Montandon, in r.a.sf.w.r-j


Katlyn: I was working lunch and these church ladies come in. ... I expected
a decent tip on their $75 dollar check. Instead [of money] they left a
note: "Don't worry, God will provide." 

Bitterwaitress: It's bad enough that religion is used as an excuse for
prejudice and war, but using it for stiffing a server is totally
unacceptable.
 -- seen at http://www.bitterwaitress.com


Do not become your enemy to defeat your enemy.
 -- epitaph for Captain Marvel


When a boundary is endangered, it becomes necessary to articulate
specific limits in that area.
 -- Rivka


Do not look into laser with remaining eye.


The cynics among us might say: "We laugh, monkeyboys - Linux IS the
mainstream UNIX now! MuaHaHaHa!" but that would be rude.
 -- Jim Dennis


He's got a high IQ... that's why he's dumb as a post.
 -- Larry Metcalf, S/V "BananaWind"


You don't have to eat the entire turd to know that it's not a crab cake.
 -- Orson Scott Card, "Shadow of the Hegemon"


If you're going through Hell, keep going.
 -- Winston Churchill


Believe nothing, no matter where you read it, or who said it, no matter
if I have said it, unless it agrees with your own reason and your own
common sense.
 -- Buddha


And the air was full of the smell of burning bridges.
 -- Larry Niven, "Protector"


The morally noble will always overcome the less noble and will persist
longer than the mean.
 -- Immanuel Kant


Honest lack of knowledge is less harmful than false knowledge.
 -- Theodore Mommsen


Six months of holding hands with a man tells you nothing; one night in
bed tells you everything.
 -- Edith Piaf


"Computers in the future may weigh no more than 1.5 tons."
 -- Popular Mechanics (1949)


He was a sovereign who lived and died without having been able to assert so
much as a single claim on the gratitude of posterity.
 -- Duke of Wellington regarding King George IV


Remember the adage: If all you have is a hammer, everything looks like a
nail. If all you have is a bitter sexual sneer, everything looks like
dumb misogyny.
 -- Mark Morford, SFGate


Do not let your tongue differ from your heart when you are asked for
counsel.


...the conscious mind has its own ideas and desires, some of them real,
some of them impressed on it by propaganda and training and the
necessity for putting up a good front and cutting a fine figure to other
people. Down below is the unconscious mind, blind and deaf and stupid
and sly, and with usually a different set of desires and very different
motivations. It wants its own way... and when it doesn't get it, it
raises a stink until it is satisfied. The trick in easy living is to
find out what your unconscious mind really wants and give it to it on
the cheapest terms possible, before it sends you through emotional
bankruptcy to get its own way.
 -- Robert Heinlein, "Time for the Stars"


I have always wished that my computer would be as easy to use as my
telephone. My wish has come true. I no longer know how to use my
telephone.
 -- Bjarne Stroustrup, CS professor and author of C++


Make definite assertions. Avoid tame, colorless, hesitating,
non-committal language.
 -- William Strunk, Jr., Rule 12 of "The Elements of Style"


Lots of folks... wouldn't know what SCSI was if it crawled up their leg
with a wet sucking sound and threatened them with an ovipositor.
 -- BAO


In my definition of a good relationship, people are vulnerable, and
expose themselves to the chance that they, or other people could screw
things up for them horribly, but hope the 2 or more of them are up to
dealing with the challenge when and/or if things get screwy. Realizing
that it's OK to be afraid can be liberating. It's how you react to those
fears that makes the relationship move in one direction or the other.

Personally, I tend to react *badly* to fear by either going totally self
sacrificing or withdrawing from the person I'm afraid might hurt me.
When I react *positively* to my fears, I unlock the box I keep them in,
show them around, and ask the people I'm involved with to help me out
with them.
 -- Josh Jasper, in a.p.


Write documentation as if whoever reads it is a violent psychopath who
knows where you live.
 -- Steve English


Pot. Kettle. COLOR="#000000"
 -- umar in alt.poly


During my eighty-seven years I have witnessed a whole succession of
technological revolutions. But none of them has done away with the need
for character in the individual or the ability to think.
 -- Bernard M. Baruch


Poly means "many", not "any".


"This bad grade is lowering my self-esteem!"
"Then you should work harder so you don't get bad grades."
"Your denial of my victimhood is lowering my self-esteem!"
 -- Calvin & Hobbes by Watterson


Theology is an attempt to explain a subject by men who do not understand
it. The intent is not to tell the truth but to satisfy the questioner.
 -- Elbert Hubbard


Learn to distinguish the difference between errors of knowledge and
breaches of morality. An error of knowledge is not a moral flaw, provided
you are willing to correct it; only a mystic would judge human beings by
the standard of an impossible, automatic omniscience. But a breach of
morality is the conscious choice of an action you know to be evil, or a
willful evasion of knowledge, a suspension of sight and of thought. That
which you do not know, is not a moral charge against you; but that which
you refuse to know, is an account of infamy growing in your soul. Make
every allowance for errors of knowledge; do not forgive or accept any
breach of morality.
 -- Ayn Rand, "Atlas Shrugged"


Power is the ultimate aphrodisiac.
 -- Henry A. Kissinger


University politics are vicious precisely because the stakes are so small.
 -- Henry A. Kissinger


High office teaches decision making, not substance. [It] consumes
intellectual capital; it does not create it. Most high officials leave
office with the perceptions and insights with which they entered; they
learn how to make decisions but not what decisions to make.
 -- Henry A. Kissinger


In crises the most daring course is often safest.
 -- Henry A. Kissinger


You can't make war in the Middle East without Egypt and you can't make
peace without Syria.
 -- Henry A. Kissinger


When you meet the president, you ask yourself, "How did it ever occur to
anybody that he should be governor much less president?"
 -- Henry A. Kissinger


The illegal we do immediately. The unconstitutional takes a little longer.
 -- Henry A. Kissinger


Any fact that needs to be disclosed should be put out now or as quickly as
possible, because otherwise the bleeding will not end.
 -- Henry A. Kissinger


Accept everything about yourself - I mean everything, You are you and that
is the beginning and the end - no apologies, no regrets.
 -- Henry A. Kissinger


I can think of no faster way to unite the American people behind George W.
Bush than a terrorist attack on an American target overseas. And I believe
George W. Bush will quickly unite the American people through his foreign
policy.
 -- Henry A. Kissinger


Moderation is a virtue only in those who are thought to have an
alternative.
 -- Henry A. Kissinger


Another damned fat book, eh, Mr. Gibbon? Scribble, scribble, scribble, eh,
Mr. Gibbon?
 -- Duke of Gloucester on "The Decline and Fall"


The effects of technology do not occur at the level of opinions or
concepts, but alter sense ratios or patterns of perception steadily and
without any resistance.
 -- Marshall McLuhan, "Understanding Media"


"This season the man of goodwill will wear his heart up his sleeve, not on
it... the honest manly style is today suited only to Iago."
 -- W. H. Auden


Ring the bells that still can ring.
Forget your perfect offering.
There is a crack in everything.
That's how the light gets in.
 -- Leonard Cohen


I don't think that "balance" is necessarily a good analogy for a
relationship. It is not necessary for both people in a relationship to have
transactionally equivalent benefits - for one thing, it's impossible to
define such a thing. What is necessary is that both people find the
relationship more beneficial than detrimental.
 -- Xiphias Gladius in a.p.


- If you have greater clarity about what you want, you're more likely to
  know when you're not getting it. Now what? That clarity just cost you
  some contentment.

- It's not always comfortable to realize what someone else wants. Maybe you
  learn something uncomfortable about them.

- If you ask for what you want, someone may be shocked and amazed. And if
  you're clear, you'll be aware of their shock and amazement. That may cost
  you, if you care about that person's good opinion. The shock and amazement
  may cost you your good opinion of them. Either of you may change your
  behavior toward the other.

- Getting clear about a situation may require certain actions out of you
  based on your personal ethics. That's a choice. I've run into this one
  several times in being a manager. My ethics require that I offer an
  employee a square deal, and live up to the contract we've made. When the
  company - my boss - wants to unilaterally change the deal, I've got some
  issues with that. There are things I won't do, and that costs me from
  time to time. Costs me less than the alternative, but still it isn't
  free.

Personally, I think the choice: clarity or not, is a no-brainer. That
clarity may cost you an illusion or two, however, and sometimes illusions
are comfortable and safe.
 -- James B., the SHAPE forum


I curse the lesson and bless the knowledge.
 -- Harlan Ellison


It turns out that every conference/training event/course I've had
professionally, I've either pushed for, negotiated for, or paid for
directly. The "Why this is directly good for you" offer is best. The
"It'll make me happy, which is good for you" offer is next best. The
"I'm going after this, you can help or not" offer is least good, but in
the end tells you a lot about the relationship.
 -- James B., the SHAPE forum


Hurricanes of Yes are never blocked by the flimsy screen doors of But
Why.
 -- Mark Morford, "The Morning Fix"


Next to being right, the best of all things is to be clearly and
definitely wrong.
 -- Thomas Huxley


Only the mediocre are always at their best.
 -- Jean Giraudoux


A foolish consistency is the hobgoblin of little minds, adored by
little statesmen and philosophers and divines.
 -- Emerson


Great minds judge ideas 
Average ones judge the news 
The rest judge other people


In crises the most daring course is often safest.
 -- Henry A. Kissinger


> How do you "test" this 'God' to "prove" it is who it says it is?
If you're God, you know exactly what it would take to convince me. Do
that.
 -- Marc Fleury on alt.atheism


It's impossible to gain one religion's heaven without qualifying for all
the others' hells.
 -- translated from anekdot.ru


I route 
Therefore you are


Those who are too smart to engage in politics are punished by being
governed by those who are dumber.
 -- Plato


He was a great patriot, a humanitarian, a loyal friend; provided, of
course, he really is dead.
 -- Voltaire


"Grant us prudence in proportion to our power, Wisdom in proportion to
our science, Humaneness in proportion to our wealth and might."
 -- Thomas Merton, excerpt from his prayer before the House of
    Representatives, 1962


The first adventurer was a nuisance. I am sure he acted against his
mother's, his wife's, and the council of old men's strict orders when he
did it; but it was he that found where the mammoths die and where after a
thousand years of use there was still enough ivory to equip the entire
tribe with weapons. Such is the ultimate outline of the adventurer;
society's benefactor as well as pest.
 -- William Bolitho, "Twelve Against the Gods"


I'd rather watch a gifted plumber than listen to a bad poet.
 -- E. B. White


There's many ways to victimize people. The most insidious is to convince
them that they're victims.
 -- Tom Robbins


Hearing nuns' confessions is like being stoned to death with popcorn.
 -- Fulton Sheen


Sure you can live your life all open and wild and full of wonder and
bliss and sex and wine and ease and laughter and lack of fear and angst
and dire shivery dread, but then organized religion would cease to
exist.
 -- Mark Morford, SFGate's "Morning Fix"


I smelled troll due to the style. The poster spent more energy
misunderstanding what was written then in trying to understand the
writer(s). He shot for the inflammatory one liner whenever possible and
obviously "enjoyed" the conflict. That's troll material to me,
regardless of the content being discussed.
 -- Ron, in sex.wizards


Life is complex, with real and imaginary parts.


Anyone who slaps a "this page is best viewed with Browser X" label on a
Web page appears to be yearning for the bad old days, before the Web,
when you had very little chance of reading a document written on another
computer, another word processor, or another network.
 -- Tim Berners-Lee in Technology Review, July 1996


Fortunately for my credit, from the outside most people can't tell the
rapid exploitation of a belatedly recognized opportunity from deep-laid
planning.
 -- Miles Vorkosigan in "Komarr", by Lois McMaster Bujold


Yeah, you're being oppressed, and observing the violence inherent in the
system. Seen that flick.
 -- Rick Moen


I believe in compassionate ruthlessness.


You can believe anything you want. The universe is not obliged to keep
a straight face.
 -- Solomon Short


"I'm sure we can all pull together, sir." 
"Oh, I do hope not, I really do hope not. Pulling together is the aim of
despotism and tyranny. Free men pull in all kinds of directions."
 -- Terry Pratchett, "The Truth"


Many programmers seem to forget that programming is an engineering
discipline. They put in code that they don't understand because "I wanted
to be on the safe side," or "Bob said I should always do that," or "I heard
that sometimes it would break if I did it the other way." There's nothing
wrong with being on the safe side, but throwing salt over your shoulder
won't help.
 -- Mark-Jason Dominus


I'm not yet 100% convinced that all of IRC is a dick-length war with
13-year-old participants, but the available data indicate a strong
correlation.
 -- BAO


The urge to save humanity is almost always a false-face for the urge to
rule it.
 -- H. L. Mencken


  Asuka gawa                The mists rise over
  Kawa yodo sarazu          The waters at Asuka;
  Tatsu kiri no             Memory does not
  Omoi sugu beki            Pass away so easily.
  Koi ni aranuku ni         
   -- Yamabe no Akahito, translated by K. Rexroth


Just because the microphone in front of you amplifies your voice around the
world is no reason to think you have any more wisdom than when our voices
could reach only from one end of the bar to the other.
 -- Edward R. Murrow


No matter how ancient and revered and colorful and beautiful, you should be
extremely wary if not outright disgusted by any religion that violently
scowls on holding hands and public smooching, to say nothing of sloppy
fabulous blowjobs and hours of mad delirious cunnilingus.
 -- Mark Morford


Shy and unready men are great betrayers of secrets; for there are few
wants more urgent for the moment than the want of something to say.
 -- Sir Henry Taylor


People sleep peaceably in their beds at night only because rough men
stand ready to do violence on their behalf.
 -- George Orwell


"Ah! But a man cannot be held to write down in cold blood the wild and
black thoughts that storm his brain when an uncontrolled passion has
battered a breach for them. Yet, unless he sets up as a saint, he need
not hate himself for them. He is better employed, it seems to me, in
giving thanks that power to resist was vouchsafed to him, than in
fretting over wicked impulses which come unsought and extort an
unwilling hospitality from the weakness of our nature."
 -- Anthony Hope, "Prisoner of Zenda"


On the face of it, Microsoft complaining about the source license used by
Linux is like the event horizon calling the kettle black.
 -- Adam Barr, former Microsoft Corp. programmer


It was a typical net.exercise - a screaming mob pounding on a greasy spot
on the pavement, where used to lie the carcass of a dead horse.
 -- via Dirk A. Loedding


Bad Unabomber!
Blowing people all to hell.
Do you take requests?
 -- Unabomber Haiku Contest, CyberLaw mailing list


Religion is regarded by the common people as true, by the wise as false,
and by the rulers as useful.
 -- Lucius Annaeus Seneca


Language is the most massive and inclusive art we know, a mountainous and
anonymous work of unconscious generations.
 - Edward Sapir, "Language" (1921)


Never ruin an apology with an excuse.
 -- Kimberly Johnson


The problem with the global village is all the global village idiots.
 -- Paul Ginsparg


I have often said there are two kinds of mystics, the optimystics and
the pessimystics. Now pessimystics seem to be more in touch with
"reality," but optimystics are happier and live longer for some reason.
The pessimystics have been crying, "The sky is falling, the sky is
falling!" The optimystics say, "No. It just looks that way because we
are ascending."
 -- Swami Beyondananda


The only rule is, if the reader is willing to go there with you, you can
go wherever the hell you want. Failure is frequent, but success makes
life lickable.
 -- Mark Morford, "The Morning Fix"


We write precisely            We say exactly
Since such is our habit in    How to do a thing or how
Talking to machines;          Every detail works.
Excerpt from Prof. Touretzky's DECSS-Haiku <http://www.cs.cmu.edu/~dst/>


There are a lot of things we don't know. Many people, disliking a void,
fill it up with nonsense.
 -- Bill Thayer


Greatness is not where we stand, but in what direction we're moving. We
must sail sometimes with the wind and sometimes against it - but sail we
must, and not drift, nor lie at anchor.
 -- Oliver Wendell Holmes


I suppose I just like getting my ass out of the house, where I can hole
up for years at a time and amuse myself with intellectual wanking. I'd
like some more play in my life, but what I need, I'm realizing, is
impetus to stay connected in meat life.
 -- Lydia


If it were possible for a nation to fight its way to security, Israel
would be the safest place on the planet. 
 -- Ron Richardson


...we will have peace, when you and all your works have perished - and
the works of your dark master to whom you would deliver us. You are a
liar, Saruman, and a corrupter of men's hearts.
 --Theoden in /usr/src/perl/taint.c


Clay lies still, but blood's a rover;
    Breath's a ware that will not keep.
Up, lad: when the journey's over
    There'll be time enough to sleep.
 -- A. E. Housman


For every disciplined effort, there are multiple rewards.
 -- Jim Rohn


Let me assure you, I will march up and down the High Street blowing a
trumpet and proclaiming at the top of my voice, "NO NEED TO REINVENT THE
WHEEL!" on the day that someone actually produces a ROUND WHEEL.
 -- Stephen Bint in "The Ultimate Editor", Linux Gazette


More issues in history have been decided by force and violence than any
other factor, and people and nations who failed to learn this lesson
have often paid for it with their lives and freedom.
 -- Robert Heinlein


I am sure that the party system is right and necessary. There must be
some scum.
 -- A. P. Herbert, Member of British Parliament


I'm -very- possessive. I'm just not -exclusively- possessive. So long as
my partners are _mine_, I don't care whose else's they are too. But the
_mine_ is important. :}
 - Darkhawk, the rapacious raptor (in alt.polyamory)


for whatever we lose(like you or me) 
it's always ourselves we find in the sea
 -- e.e. cummings


Cute-poet-chick and I do this a lot. 
 - "Baby, do these pants make my ass look fat?"
 - "No, sweetie, your fat ass makes your ass look fat."
 - "Okey-dokey, thanks!"
 -- Serene, in alt.polyamory


I expect the gods to play pranks; I suspect immortality gets /dull/ if
one doesn't.
 -- Darkhawk


I don't want to get to the end of my life and find that I lived just the
length of it. I want to have lived the width of it as well.
 -- Diane Ackerman


Responsibility cannot be delegated.
 -- Lucius Pompeius Octavianus, Tribunus Plebis, NR


I have /usr/sbin/coffee mounted from /dev/mug right now, and you can't have
it. Oh no, I just tried to seek past end-of-beverage. *sigh*
 -- Graham Reed, in the Monastery


Intelligence is the ability to find alternate solutions.
 -- Cpt. Norman Johnson


The key word there, Mike, is "scientist"; I don't even play one on TV.  I'm
an engineer all the way to the bone, the guy you call when theory fails. I
show up lugging stainless-steel baling wire, tapered HDPE shims, duct tape,
WD-40, epoxy and cyanoacrylate, a Dremel with a hand-selected kit of bits,
and a bootable Linux CD. When I leave, stuff *works*. Hardware is
_terrified_ of me, and that's the way it should be.
 -- BAO


When you say you like that little flower over there, you become vulnerable
in the mind of the asshole who tramples it under your very eyes.
 -- R. Ashcroft, British rock singer 


If C gives you enough rope to hang yourself, then C++ gives you enough to
bind and gag your neighbourhood, rig the sails on a small ship, and still
have enough to hang yourself from the yardarm.


Sir, we would bury your leg (injured at the Battle of Saratoga) with full
military honors, and hang the remainder for a traitor.
 -- a captured Continental soldier to General Benedict Arnold 


If everything's under control, you're going too slow.
 -- Mario Andretti


He who dares not offend cannot be honest.
 -- Thomas Paine


...the exercising of weapons puts away aches, griefs, and diseases, it
increases strength, and sharpens the wits. It gives a perfect judgement,
it expels melancholy, choleric and evil conceits, it keeps a man in
breath, perfect health, and long life. It is unto him that has the
perfection thereof, a most friendly and comfortable companion when he is
alone, having but only his weapon about him. It puts him out of fear, &
in the wars and places of most danger, it makes him bold, hardy and
valiant. 
 -- George Silver, "Paradoxes"


Why, yes, _of course_ I'm an elitist. Isn't everyone?


"Stranger, go tell the Spartans that here we lie, obedient to their
command."
 -- inscription at Thermopylae


Debugging is easy - just carve pieces off of a block of bug till what you
have left looks like a mistake. :-)
 -- Larry Wall


People can have many reasons for putting forth an opinion. But I usually
give them the benefit of the doubt and suppose that they were asking for
critical comment. :-)
 -- Larry Wall


I'm reminded of the day my daughter came in, looked over my shoulder at
some Perl 4 code, and said, "What is that, swearing?"
 -- Larry Wall


Doing linear scans over a [hash] is like trying to club someone to death
with a loaded Uzi.
 -- Larry Wall 


In human affairs, the sources of success are ever to be found in the
fountains of quick resolve and swift stroke; and it seems to be a law
inflexible and inexorable that he who will not risk cannot win.
 -- John Paul Jones


Using another as a means of satisfaction and security is not love. Love is
never security; love is a state in which there is no desire to be secure;
it is a state of vulnerability.
 -- J. Krishnamurti


To cheat oneself out of love is the most terrible deception; it is an
eternal loss for which there is no reparation, either in time or in
eternity.
 -- Soren Kierkegaard


I'm serious about thinking through all the possibilities before we settle
on anything. All things have the advantages of their disadvantages, and
vice versa.
 -- Larry Wall


The young apprentice may come aboard with his head filled with queer ideas
about sailing ships and the seas. His first month at sea may be a
distressing experience, shattering illusions right and left until he sees
only the bare bones of real life remain. Then, after a while, when he's
settled into things, he finds that there really can be romance in those
bare bones.
 -- Capt. Alan Villiers, "The Way of a Ship" 


I know enough about you to know that beneath that innocent exterior lies
all manner of wonderful stuff, from the poet and philosopher to the wanton
and wicked.
 -- D. Riggio


The right to be heard does not include the right to be taken seriously.
 -- Hubert H. Humphrey


...mine goes into giving people information so they don't start asking
questions. Untraining that tendancy has been difficult (its an 'ooh,
someone's talking to me. Wow, someone's actually paying attention to me.
Lets give them all sorts of info so they keep talking to me' reaction).
 -- Tendyl


Defending *palatable* speech is unremarkable.
 -- Jay R. Ashworth


Anyone who can't laugh at himself is not taking life seriously enough.
 -- Larry Wall


The only protection [against reversals of Fortune] is constancy of
character; for if one behaves wretchedly, then others will think his luck
ill-deserved and his misfortune just; but if one is brave and upright,
his misfortune will seem unjust and his good fortune well-earned.
 -- Lucius Aemilius Paullus, to his officers and sons, after defeating
    Perseus


Ben: Emacs is so rude!
Emacs: Why didn't you read the FM?
Ben: Why didn't you give me a warning the first time I ran it, O Editor
	That Calls Itself "Self-Documenting"? You're the one that's using
	an esoteric, incompatible format.
Emacs: It was probably the standard format in the environment where emacs
	mail was written, and then remain unchanged three decades later.
Ben: I'll show you who's boss!!! I'm going to uninstall you with extreme
	prejudice!!
Emacs: Bigot!
Ben: Bloated piece of crap! You've got more features than Internet Explorer,
	nyaa, nyaa, nyaa!
Emacs (Eliza mode): Is the fact that I'm a bloated piece of crap the reason
	we're having this conversation?
 -- Mike Orr in TAG-admin, after my "Emacs destroyed my mailbox" story


Few men have the virtue to withstand the highest bidder.
 -- George Washington


<ironic>
Security hint of the day:
        find . -name '*.[ch]' | \
        xargs egrep -l 'sprintf|strcat|strcpy' | \
        xargs rm
</ironic>
 -- Pavel Kankovsky aka Peak


The most likely way for the world to be destroyed, most experts agree, is
by accident. That's where we come in. We're computer professionals. We
cause accidents.
 -- Nathaniel Borenstein, inventor of MIME


Life is not measured by the number of breaths we take, but by the moments
that take our breath away.


Learning Java has been a slow and tortuous process for me. Every few
minutes, I start screaming 'No, you fools!' and have to go read something
from _Structure and Interpretation of Computer Programs_ to de-stress.
 -- The Cube, www.forum3000.org


Every word she writes is a lie, including "a" and "the".
 -- Mary McCarthy


Send a policeman, and have it arrested.
 -- Otto von Bismarck, when asked what he would do if the British Army landed


There's a sucker born every minute. eBay is the delivery room.
 -- David Crowe


Orthodoxy is my doxy. Heterodoxy is someone else's doxy. 
 -- William Warburton, Bishop of Gloucester (1698-1779)


Now that I think of it, O'Reilly is to a system administrator as a
shoulder length latex glove is to a veterinarian.
 -- Peter da Silva


Debugging is twice as hard as writing the code in the first place.
Therefore, if you write the code as cleverly as possible, you are, by
definition, not smart enough to debug it.
 -- Brian W. Kernighan


I have come to the frightening conclusion that I am the decisive element.
It is my personal approach that creates the climate. It is my daily mood
that makes the weather. I possess tremendous power to make life miserable
or joyous. I can be a tool of torture or an instrument of inspiration, I
can humiliate or humor, hurt or heal. In all situations, it is my response
that decides whether a crisis is escalated or de-escalated, and a person is
humanized or de-humanized. If we treat people as they are, we make them
worse. If we treat people as they ought to be, we help them become what
they are capable of becoming.
 -- Goethe


Higgledy-Piggledy / Kibo Ubiquitous, 
Greps for his name in the / Happynet spool. 
Interdimensional / Cyberspace deity: 
Didaktyliaios / Dada is cool.
 -- Lewis Stiller


- "For this advice, you owe me a billion buckazoids." 
- "All right - the chequeazoid is in the mail!" 
 -- seen on comp.mail.mutt


"Why is the alphabet in that order? Is it because of that song?"
 -- Steven Wright


On the 012th day of September my luser sent to me:

Eighty lines of WINMAIL.DAT
Forty lines of PGP\PUBKEY.ASC
Twenty lines of C:\NETSCAPE\SIGFILE.TXT
Ten lines of Content-type: application/msword; name=LIGHTBULB.DOC
Six lines of VCARD.DXF
Five lines of quoted-printable HTML
Four lines of embedded URLs.
Three lines of MIME headers
Two lines of Re:RE:(fwd)Re:
And a one line email help request!
 -- Peter da Silva


We are not gentle tolerant people. We like drastically effective
solutions.
 -- Steve VanDevender, a.s.r.


So the canonical metasyntactic syllables are foo, bar, baz, gzork,
and zot? I always wondered what came after baz. 
 -- Charles Cazabon

Nono: bletch before baz, except after frob.
-- Malcolm Ray


NANAU taught me the Second Clue. If you make a decision under pressure,
and someone who's never been in the same position decides at leisure
to criticise without being polite and asking questions, make sure that
the person understands the absolute inappropriateness of this as hard
as possible. If someone with more technical experience wants to suggest
how you should handle it next time, that's okay fine.
 -- Rebecca Ore


This is mad, egotistical, sick, twisted, and stretches the bounds of good
taste right off the tongue, past the uvula, and down around the duodenum.
It has other merits, but that should indicate positive interest.
 -- The Cube, http://www.forum3000.org/


I respect faith, but doubt is what gets you an education.
 -- Wilson Mizner


find / -name \*yourbase\* -exec chown us:us {} \;


There are only 10 types of people in this world: those who understand
binary arithmetic and those who don't.


Ah, September, when the sysadmins turn colors and fall off the trees....
 -- Dave Van Domelen


There may have been babies in that bathwater.
 -- tadmc in c.l.p.m.


People use those they can, and respect those they can't.


I hatehate*hate* juggling flasks of nitro while rollerskating toward a
cliff at high speed down a greased 60-degree decline with a razorwire fence
on either side and maddened wolverines just beyond.
 -- BAO


Is it not the beauty of an asynchronous form of discussion that one can
go and make cups of tea, floss the cat, fluff the geraniums, open the
kitchen window and scream out it with operatic force, volume, and decorum,
and then return to the vexed glowing letters calmer of mind and soul?
 -- The Cube, <forum3000.org>


So great has been the endurance, so incredible the achievement, that, as
long as the sun keeps a set course in heaven, it would be foolish to
despair of the human race.
 -- Ernest L. Woodward


Words ought to be a little wild for they are the assault of thoughts on the
unthinking.
 -- John Maynard Keynes


What does a man need - really need? A few pounds of food each day, heat and 
shelter, six feet to lie down in - and some form of working activity that will
yield a sense of accomplishment. That's all - in the material sense. And we
know it. But we are brainwashed by our economic system until we end up in a
tomb beneath a pyramid of time payments, mortgages, preposterous gadgetry,
playthings that divert our attention from the sheer idiocy of the charade. The
years thunder by. The dreams of youth grow dim where they lie caked in dust on
the shelves of patience. Before we know it, the tomb is sealed. Where, then,
lies the answer? In choice. Which shall it be: bankruptcy of purse or
bankruptcy of life?
 -- Sterling Hayden, "Wanderer"


Beware the leader who bangs the drums of war in order to whip the citizenry
into a patriotic fervor, for patriotism is indeed a double-edged sword. It
both emboldens the blood, just as it narrows the mind. And when the drums
of war have reached a fever pitch and the blood boils with hate and the
mind has closed, the leader will have no need in seizing the rights of the
citizenry. Rather, the citizenry, infused with fear and blinded by
patriotism, will offer up all of their rights unto the leader and gladly
so. How do I know? For this is what I have done. And I am Caesar.
 -- Julius Caesar


The world is not something you can wrap your head around without needing
years of experience.
 -- Kent M. Pitman in comp.lang.lisp


So: My point is that [Microsoft] may have a ton of money and be more
vicious than a junkyard dog, and have a stranglehold on dimwitted
IS managers, but they're just not very _competent_. 
 -- Rick Moen, in macosx-for-users


The Computer industry is often very cruel to the English language.
There are a lot of ugly phrases we use regularly. "Killer app." "User
interface." "Monetize." "Steve Ballmer." 
 -- Sean M. Dugan, in Puget Sound Computer User


The data is in from the most precise study ever done on the effects of
quitting smoking: a man who quits at age 35 adds 6.9-8.5 years to his life.
Quitting at 45 adds 5.6-7.1. And stopping even at 65 adds 1.4-2.
 -- Men's Journal, August 2002


Our vitality is restored not by ease but by effort.
 -- Phil Caputo


The year 1935 will go down in history. For the first time, a civilized
nation has full gun registration. Our streets will be safer, our police
more efficient, and the world will follow our lead into the future.
-- Adolph Hitler


There are two ways of constructing a software design. One way is to make
it so simple that there are obviously no deficiencies. And the other
way is to make it so complicated that there are no obvious deficiencies.
 -- C.A.R. Hoare


Jihad must not be abandoned until Allah alone is worshipped by mankind...
Jihad and the rifle alone... no negotiations, no conferences and no
dialogue.
 -- Sheik Abdullah Azzam


He either fears his fate too much,
Or his deserts are small,
Who dares not put it to the touch,
To win or lose it all.
 -- Montrose's Toast


With reasonable men, I will reason; with humane men, I will plead;
But to tyrants, I will give no quarter.
 -- William Lloyd Garrison


I am aware that many object to the severity of my language; but is
there not cause for severity? I will be as harsh as truth, and as
uncompromising as justice. On this subject, I do not wish to think,
or speak, or write with moderation; No! no! Tell a man whose house is
on fire to give a moderate alarm; tell him to moderately rescue his
wife from the hands of the ravisher; tell the mother to gradually
extricate her babe from the fire into which it has fallen; but urge
me not to use moderation in a cause like the present. I am in earnest
- I will not equivocate - I will not retreat a single inch, - AND I
WILL BE HEARD.
 -- William Lloyd Garrison


...the truth is that I already know as much about my fate as I need
to know. The day will come when I will die. So the only matter of
consequence before me is what I will do with my allotted time. I can
remain on shore, paralyzed with fear, or I can raise my sails and dip
and soar in the breeze.
 -- Richard Bode, "First you have to row a little boat"


Life is property, property is life, both indistinguishable from
liberty. The root of all evil - aside from forgetting that fact -
lies in taking property against its rightful owners wishes.
 -- L. Neil Smith, "Henry Martyn"


...In the Carboniferous Epoch
We were promised abundance for all,
By robbing selected Peter
To pay for collective Paul;
But though we had plenty of money,
There was nothing our money could buy,
And the Gods of the Copybook Headings said:
"If you don't work, you die."
 -- R. Kipling, "The Gods of the Copybook Headings"


I used to wait for a sign, she said, before I did anything. Then one
night I had a dream & an angel in black tights came to me and said,
You can start any time now & then I asked is this a sign? & the angel
started laughing & I woke up.

Now, I think the whole world is filled with signs, but if there's no
laughter, I know they're not for me.
 -- Brian Andreas, "Mostly True"


In the year Nineteen Hundred and Forty Nine, my friends and I
happened on a curious footnote in "Nature", the Journal of the
Academy of Sciences. It was written there in small letters that on
the Kolyma river, during a dig, there was somehow discovered an
underground ice stratum - a frozen ancient stream, and in it -
samples of prehistoric (some tens of thousands of years old) fauna,
also frozen. Whether fish or tritons, these were so perfectly
preserved, witnessed the learned correspondent, that those present,
having cracked the ice, immediately and WILLINGLY ate them.

The few readers of the Journal must have been not a little bemused by
how long fish flesh may be preserved in ice. But few indeed would
have been those who perceived the true heroic meaning of this
incautious footnote. We - understood immediately. We saw the entire
scene, brightly and in minute detail: how those present, in a cruel
state of immediacy, smashed the ice; how, elbowing aside the high
interests of ichthyology and each other, they hacked off chunks of
thousands-year-old fish, dragged it to the fire, defrosted it, and
stuffed themselves.

We understood, because we were of THOSE PRESENT - of that, unique on
earth, great tribe of zeki*, the only ones that could WILLINGLY eat a
triton. And Kolyma was - the largest and most famous island, a pole
of viciousness of the awful country of GULag, ripped by geography
into an archipelago, but chained by psychology into a continent, -
almost invisible, almost non-perceivable country, that was peopled by
the tribe of zeki.

...My own eleven years, spent there, acquired not as shame, not even
as an accursed nightmare, but having almost come to love that twisted
world, and now, by a lucky circumstance, having become acquainted
with many latter stories and letters, - might I yet be able to bring
you something of the bones and the flesh? - and, incidentally, living
flesh, and, incidentally, of a currently living triton.
 -- Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn, from the introduction to "GULag
Archipelago" (translation mine)

* Zeki - short for "Zaklyuchonniye" (prisoners), a term used to
describe the inmates of GULag.


While the Union lasts, we have high, exciting, gratifying prospects
spread out before us, for us and our children. Beyond that I seek not
to penetrate the veil. God grant that, in my day at least, that
curtain may not rise! God grant that on my vision never may be opened
what lies behind! When my eyes shall be turned to behold for the last
time the sun in heaven, may I not see him shining on the broken and
dishonored fragments of a once glorious Union; on states dissevered,
discordant, belligerent; on a land rent with civil feuds, or
drenched, it may be, in fraternal blood! Let their last feeble and
lingering glance rather behold the gorgeous ensign of the Republic,
now known and honored throughout the earth, still full high advanced,
its arms and trophies streaming in their original luster, not a
stripe erased or polluted, not a single star obscured, bearing for
its motto no such miserable interrogatory as "What is all this worth?
" nor those other words of delusion and folly, "Liberty first and
Union afterwards"; but everywhere, spread all over in characters of
living light, blazing on all its ample folds, as they float over the
sea and over the land, and in every wind under the whole heavens,
that other sentiment, dear to every true American heart -- Liberty
and Union, now and forever, one and inseparable!
 -- Daniel Webster, the Reply to Hayne, January 27, 1830


To live, man must hold three things as the supreme and ruling values
of his life: Reason - Purpose - Self-esteem. Reason, as his only tool
of knowledge - Purpose, as his choice of the happiness which that
tool must proceed to achieve - Self-esteem, as his inviolate
certainty that his mind is competent to think and his person is
worthy of happiness, which means: is worthy of living.
 -- Ayn Rand, "Atlas Shrugged"


They are fools that think that wealth or women or strong drink or
even drugs can buy the most in effort out of the soul of a man. 
These things offer pale pleasures compared to that which is greatest
of them all, that task which demands from him more than his utmost
strength, that absorbs him, bone and sinew and brain and hope and
fear and dreams -- and still calls for more.

They are fools that think otherwise. No great effort was ever
bought. No painting, no music, no poem, no cathedral in stone, no
church, no state was ever raised into being for payment of any kind. 
No parthenon, no Thermopylae was ever built or fought for pay or
glory; no Bukhara sacked, or China ground beneath Mongol heel, for
loot or power alone. The payment for doing these things was itself
the doing of them.

To wield onself -- to use oneself as a tool in one's own hand -- and
so to make or break that which no one else can build or ruin -- THAT
is the greatest pleasure known to man! To one who has felt the
chisel in his hand and set free the angel prisoned in the marble
block, or to one who has felt sword in hand and set homeless the soul
that a moment before lived in the body of his mortal enemy -- to
those both come alike the taste of that rare food spread only for
demons or for gods.
 -- Gordon R. Dickson, "Soldier Ask Not"


There's a trick to the Graceful Exit. It begins with the vision to
recognize when a job, a life stage, a relationship is over -- and to
let go. It means leaving what's over without denying its validity or
its past importance in our lives. It involves a sense of future, a
belief that every exit line is an entry, that we are moving on,
rather than out.

The trick of retiring well may be the trick of living well. It's
hard to recognize that life isn't a holding action, but a process. 
It's hard to learn that we don't leave the best parts of ourselves
behind, back in the dugout or the office. We own what we learned back
there. The experiences and the growth are grafted onto our lives. 
And when we exit, we can take ourselves along -- quite gracefully.
 -- Ellen Goodman


Who has known heights and depths shall not again
Know peace -- not as the calm heart knows
Low ivied walls, a garden close,
The old enchantment of a rose,
And though he tread the humble ways of men
He shall not speak the common tongue again.
 -- Wilfred Noyce, "Springs of Adventure"


There is a limit to the practical application of democratic methods.
You can inquire of all the passengers as to what type of car they
like to ride in, but it is impossible to question them as to whether
to apply the brakes when the train is at full speed and accident
threatens.
 -- Leon Trotsky


Each success only buys an admission ticket to a more difficult
problem.
 -- Henry Kissinger


"You only have power over people as long as you don't take everything
away from them. But when you've robbed a man of everything he's no longer
in your power -- he's free again."
 -- Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn


Let Rome in Tiber melt, and the wide arch 
Of the ranged empire fall! 
Here is my space. Kingdoms are clay. 
 -- Shakespeare, "Antony and Cleopatra", I:1


If I am staying, I will stay wholeheartedly, rather than just waiting
for my partner to fuck up next to prove how mean they are to me, or how
underappreciated I am, or whatever. If I go, I will go as decently and
respectfully as I can, being clear about what I am doing. I will not
wait until we have some argument or crisis where I will make the break
that I didn't find the guts to make when my eyes were clear and my voice
was level. 
 -- Elise Matthesen, in a.p.


"Lee shores exist to build our character." 
 -- Sterling Hayden, "Voyage" (paraphrased from memory)


"The good Christian should beware of mathematicians and all those who
make empty prophecies. The danger already exists that mathematicians
have made a covenant with the devil to darken the spirit and confine
man in the bonds of Hell." 
 -- Saint Augustine


Wisdom should be cherished as a means of traveling from youth to old age,
for it is more lasting than any other possession.
 -- Bias of Priene, one of the Seven Sages of ancient Greece, ca. 570BC


"The mere tendency of speech to encourage unlawful acts is not a
sufficient reason for banning it."
 -- Justice Kennedy, April, 2002, Ashcroft v. Free Speech Coalition


The Constitution of the United States of America is an imperfect document,
but IT'S A DAMN SIGHT BETTER THAN WHAT WE'RE USING NOW! 
 -- Jim Dennis, in an LWN article


Act in the valley so that you need not fear those who stand on the hill.
 -- Danish proverb


{^._.^}
 ( Y ) 
()~+~()
 (   )
(_)-(_)


Generally, Russian technology assumes dumb machines and smart humans,
not the other way around. 
 -- Daniel Nagy, "Russian-Tea-HOWTO"


Sir, you are an apogenous, bovaristic, coprolalial, dasypygal,
excerebrose, facinorous, gnathonic, hircine, ithyphallic, jumentous,
kyphotic, labrose, mephitic, napiform, oligophrenial, papuliferous,
quisquilian, rebarbative, saponaceous, thersitical, unguinous,
ventripotent, wlatsome, xylocephalous, yirning zoophyte. 

(Translation: "Sir, you are an impotent, conceited, obscene,
hairy-buttocked, brainless, wicked, toadying, goatish, indecent,
stable-smelling, hunch-backed, thick-lipped, stinking, turnip-shaped,
feeble-minded, pimply, trashy, repellent, smarmy, foul-mouthed, greasy,
gluttonous, loathsome, wooden-headed, whining, extremely low form of animal
life.)
 -- Peter Bowler's Abecedarian insult


An honorable spiritual practice recognizes the losses we have suffered,
tells our story, and sheds our tears to free us from the past. 
 -- Jack Kornfield


"A being so brilliant yet so corrupt, which, like a rotten mackerel by
moonlight, shines and stinks."
 -- John Randolph of Roanoke's opinion of Henry Clay


Your manuscript is both good and original, but the part that is good is
not original and the part that is original is not good. 
 -- Samuel Johnson


If I can't fuck someone I've just met and come at the top of my lungs,
I don't want to be part of your revolution.
 -- Karen Hurley


"Naturally the common people don't want war... but after all it is the
leaders of a country who determine policy, and it is always a simple
matter to drag the people along. ... All you have to do is tell them they
are being attacked, and denounce the pacifists for lack of patriotism and
exposing the country to danger."
 -- Hermann Goering (1832-1946), German Nazi political leader 

"To those who scare peace-loving people with phantoms of lost liberty, my
message is this: Your tactics only aid terrorists, for they erode our
national unity and diminish our resolve... They give ammunition to
America's enemies and pause to America's friends."
 -- John Ashcroft, U.S. Attorney General, Dec. 7th 2001.


If you can't take a little bloody nose, maybe you ought to go back
home and crawl under your bed. It's not safe out here. It's wondrous,
with treasures to satiate desires both subtle and gross. But it's not
for the timid. 
 -- Alister, in a.s.r.


Clues seem to seep out of lusers faster than you can LART them back in.
 -- Simon Burr


People are allowed to see me in whatever way they want. I do not have to
give their viewpoints respect, a hearing, or the time of day - nor will I,
if their viewpoint starts out with the kind of assumptions that stand
behind the word "privilege". 
 -- BAO


...while time and space and attention may be painfully finite, love is
not. Love has no quantity to exhaust. It is a quality, a living thing,
that grows stronger the more it is felt.
-- John Perry Barlow


A bad reputation can set you free. After all, if you've already declared
yourself to be a pot-smoking, acid-addled slut, your opponents are forced
to oppose your ideas on their merits, rather than strategically revealing
your hidden depravities. Shame is no weapon against the shameless.
-- John Perry Barlow


Courtesy is owed, respect is earned, love is given.


There were no freeze-ups or crashes during testing of these procedures. We
suspect GNU/Linux software is to blame. 
 -- Bill Bennet


"sendmail"'s configuration file looks like someone's been banging their
head on the keyboard. And after looking at it... I can see why!
-- Anonymous


Likewise, just because it is possible to examine every social interaction
in terms of power - who has it, who's gaining it, who's losing it - doesn't
mean that it is useful to do so, nor does the effort of doing so always get
you to any insight denied to other approaches.
 -- Bruce Baugh in alt.poly


...polys have to (get to) define for ourselves what it means in our own
lives, where the rubber hits the road. To ask what MOST polys do or
how MOST polys define ourselves is to miss the point of poly. Even if
you could do a perfectly constructed, statistically virtuous study, you
would have no better understanding - and probably worse. Poly lives in
the individual life, not the demographic generality. 
 -- Lydia Swartz, on the sex.wizards list


Hm. OK, after writing that, I can see that I am a product of my culture
and upbringing, and basically a hard-ass judgemental opinionated
barely-past-feudal German-Danish-American blue-collar bitch with a
consent fetish, who is repelled by people hoodwinking people, and who
gets good-feeling adrenalin rushes from honesty, vulnerability, and
intimacy in combination. It's a weird-ass ecological niche, but it's
mine. <big feral grin>
 -- Elise Matthesen, in alt.poly


One can speak about skydiving in the most poetic words - but always make
sure the pin goes thru the loop. (In the trade it's known as *pin-check*.)


If I leave the office at night and my brain doesn't feel like it's
fried - I didn't work hard enough. If I leave gym and don't feel like
puking in the shower - I cheated myself out of a good workout. If love
doesn't make me scream with pain when it ends - it wasn't worth it in
the first place.
 -- Kirill


The whole "patriarchy" thing really makes my skin crawl, especially when
compared to the rhapsodic strains of "the gold age of matriarchy." The
overly simplistic, reductionistic and extremely sexist trend of equating
all things matriarchal with goodness and light and all things patriarchal
with unwholesome oppression strikes me as oppressive and negating
towards men. 
 -- Magdalene Meretrix, on the "sex-wizards" list


The rules of the universe were made to be bent, but they will break whoever
tries to actually *break* them.
 -- Heather Stern


Under no circumstances should you program the way I say to because I say
to; program the way you think expresses best what you're trying to
accomplish in the program. And do so consistently and ruthlessly.
 -- Rob Pike


Nothing is an obstacle to the conquerors, and nothing safe to the
conquered.
 -- Caesar, "De Bello Gallica", book 2


-   if we were priests   -
-      we would hack     -
-     the mind of god    -

 -- SimpleNomad on Bugtraq


People shouldn't think that it's better to have loved and lost than never
loved at all. It's not, it's better to have loved and won. All the other
options really suck.
 -- Dan Redican


Take a census, and you'll find a solid body of Buddhists among programmers,
who run the motors which spin Sansara, the Wheel of Life, while the end
users will cleave to Protestantism, with its characteristic alert
expectation of miracles.
 -- via Petr Pomorov, from a Russian discussion list (translation mine)


Generality often goes hand in hand with simplicity, for it may make
possible solving a problem once and for all rather than over and over
again for individual cases.
 -- Kernighan and Pike, "The Practice of Programming"


Simplicity and clarity are first and most important, since almost
everything else follows from them. 
 -- Kernighan and Pike, "The Practice of Programming"


A quick check is reboot your Solaris system with "set kmem_flags = 0xf" in
/etc/system; this enables the kernel memory debugger and causes all
uninitialized data reads to 0xbaddcafe; if it reads from previously
free memory you'll find 0xdeadbeef; if you read from a buffer's readzone
you'll get 0xfeedface. A packet returning bad data would most likely
contain 0xbaddcafe. 
 -- Casper, in Bugtraq


Security isn't easy, nor is it something that you can bolt onto a product
after the fact. 
 -- Bruce Schneider


In programming, broad definitions of failure and narrow definitions of
success are almost always Good Things.
 -- BAO, in TAG


The Notes/RFC822 gateway is the most miserable, worthless excuse for a
mailer ever created by man or demon. The authors should be hung, shot,
boiled in oil, drawn and quartered, and the pieces arrested. 
 -- Jay R. Ashworth, in TAG


This is hard work, shared like a journey through dangerous territory. There
will be minefields, moments when I don't want to be there, don't want it to
be my turn to speak, don't want to sit one minute more and listen to
something hard. I know this, just as I know that if I stay it will be
worthwhile. Like childbirth there will be times when I cannot do this one
minute more, but the only way out is through.
 -- BarbaraFox, "Packing for Mysteries"


Love is a joy and a delight, and it is not for sissies.
 -- BarbaraFox


I may not have gone where I intended to go, but I think I have ended
up where I intended to be.
 -- Douglas Adams


Perdition
=========
I lately lost a preposition;
It hid, I thought, beneath my chair
And angrily I cried, "Perdition!
Up from out of under there."

Correctness is my vade mecum,
And straggling phrases I abhor,
And yet I wondered, "What should he come
Up from out of under for?"
 -- Morris Bishop


You've embarked, you've made the voyage, you have come to the shore;
get out! 
 -- Marcus Aurelius


Honor is about being strong, and controling that strength for the benefit
of others. It's about being worthy of being trusted. It's about having
rules that mean that, even though you have the ability to hurt people, you
choose not to hurt people, as much as you possibly can.

It's about letting what you say be true, and making sure that what you
promise happens. It's about living up to your word. It's about
protecting those in your care. It's about letting one's gentleness temper
one's capacity for violence, and about only letting violence happen in the
service of gentleness.

It's about believing that there's something more important than your own
personal immediate comfort.
 -- Xiphias Gladius, in alt.polyamory


"You? I know you! You trust beyond reason!"
"Yes. It's how I get results beyond hope."
 -- Cordelia Naismith, in Lois McMaster Bujold's "A Civil Campaign"


Freedom boils down to this: if you disagree with somebody, *argue*
with them. Don't ask Big Brother to put a gun behind your opinion.


...There is also all this spiritual quest, mainly among women. You can
afford that, because that's something you can do when you have passed
the stages of survival. In other cultures, women are at the stage of
feeding their children. There are many people in this country who also
have that as their first priority, but there are many who don't. And
those people can afford the luxury of searching for the god or goddess,
and worrying about the body, and vitamins, and organic chicken, and the
perfect cappuccino. 
 -- Isabel Allende, in an interview


Go to a restaurant, see a show. The life of the city goes on. 
 -- NYC mayor Rudolph Giuliani, September 16, 2001


"I'm a patriot. I love my decadent, cosmopolitan, self-indulgent,
racially-mixed, godless, intellectually dilletante, drug-abusing,
promiscuous, queer-loving country. And its flag is the Stars and Stripes."
 -- Patrick Nielsen Hayden, on rec.arts.sf.fandom


His theory was that systems often break due to malfunction or mismatch at
the interfaces between parts. The data collection in in meters per second
but the limit setting is in feet per second. Crossed wires in a cable.
Something not plugged in. Hose not properly crimped, prone to spewing under
pressure. So after we believed a setup was totally ready to go, we'd go
back over it once more, subsystem by subsystem, listing the interfaces and
checking everything we could. We caught a lot of problems that way before
they resulted in missing data or out-of-control tests. Since then I've
always tried to remember Don Locker's Maxim. Check all interfaces. 
 -- Dan Wilder, TAG


question=$((to_be?1:0))
 -- BAO


Many of you know what happens when the size of your Perl process exceeds
the size of your physical memory - you start thrashing. Well, that's
basically what happened to me. I couldn't get enough of the problem into
my head at once to make good progress, and I'm not actually very good at
subdividing problems. My forte is synthesis, not analysis. 
 -- Larry Wall


     __o
   _ \<_
  (_)/(_)


   (o_
   //\
   V_/_
Debian GNU


The only secure computer is one that's unplugged, locked in a safe,
and buried 20 feet under the ground in a secret location... and I'm not
even too sure about that one.
 -- Dennis Hughes, FBI


When the itch is inside the boot, scratching outside provides little
consolation.
 -- Chinese proverb


My dog is worried about the economy because Alpo is up to 99 cents a
can. That's almost $7.00 in dog money.
 -- Joe Weinstein


Keep away from people who try to belittle your ambitions. Small people
always do that, but the really great make you feel that you, too, can
become great.
 -- Mark Twain


Murder is a crime. Writing about it isn't. Sex is not a crime, but
writing about it is. Why?
 -- Larry Flynt


An unbreakable toy is useful for breaking other toys!


Experience is the best teacher, but the school fees are heavy.


Trouble is only opportunity in work clothes.


It's a wise husband who will buy his wife such fine china that she
won't trust him to wash the dishes.


No one grows old by living; only by losing interest in living.


When you are born you are crying and everyone around you is smiling.
Live your life so that when you die you are smiling and everyone
around you is crying.


The tragedy of life doesn't lie in not reaching your goal. The tragedy
lies in having no goal to reach.
 -- Benjamin Mays


"I do" is the shortest sentence in the English language. Also the
longest.


And the things that we fear are a weapon to be held against us...
 -- Rush


I am different from Washington; I have a higher, grander standard of
principle. Washington could not lie. I can lie, but I won't.
 -- Mark Twain


The aim of education should be to teach us rather how to think, than
what to think - rather to improve our minds, so as to enable us to
think for ourselves, than to load the memory with the thoughts of
other men. 
 -- Bill Beattie


Not everything that can be counted counts, and not everything that
counts can be counted.
 -- Albert Einstein


Reality is that which, when you stop believing in it, doesn't go away.
 -- Philip K. Dick


Efficiency is intelligent laziness.
 -- David Dunham


We really don't have any enemies. It's just that some of our best
friends are trying to kill us.


We don't stop playing because we get old... we get old because we stop
playing.


The test of literature is, I suppose, whether we ourselves live more
intensely for the reading of it.
 -- Elizabeth Drew


Friends are relatives you make for yourself.
 -- Eustache Deschamps


He is not poor that hath not much, but he that craves much.
 -- Thomas Fuller


I like to think that a good painting (or a good poem or a good book,
or any good thing) can be measured by how much, after experiencing it
for a while, you start to forget that it was made about someone other
than you.
 -- Andrew Hershey


We live in deeds, not years: In thoughts not breaths; In feelings, not
in figures on a dial. We should count time by heart throbs. He most
lives who thinks most, feels the noblest, acts the best.
 -- David Bailey


Don't quit when the tide is lowest,
For it's just about to turn;
Don't quit over doubts and questions,
For there's something you may learn.

Don't quit when the night is darkest,
For it's just a while 'till dawn;
Don't quit when you've run the farthest,
For the race is almost won.

Don't quit when the hill is steepest,
For your goal is almost nigh;
Don't quit, for you're not a failure
Until you fail to try.


In just two days, tomorrow will be yesterday.


If a cluttered desk is characteristic of a cluttered mind, what does
an empty desk mean?


If it isn't broken, fix it till it is.


Me a skeptic? I hope you have proof.


Everyone has a right to be stupid. Some just abuse the privilege.


Byron Elbows' two rules of human nature:
No one is as weird as they think they are.
Everyone is weirder than others think they are.


"Silly cracker, root is for admins!"


For my entire junior year of college, I slept under a six-foot-square
poster emblazoned with the words "Love will tear us apart" and then
wondered why nothing good ever happened in that bed.
 - Elizabeth Wurtzel, "Prozac Nation"


Husband's note on the refrigerator to his wife: "Your Doctor's office
called: Said Pabst beer is normal."


The whole concept of professional ethics is based on the idea that
ethics transcends legality: the idea that an action can be legal
but unethical. If "they paid for it" means that all legal acts
are ethical, then you've pretty much defined away the whole idea
of professional ethics. *That* is probably best not attempted on
comp.security.misc/unix.
 -- From the comp.security.misc/unix FAQ


> > Teach them to RTFM.
> 
> I'm afraid that's not good enough - what does the F manual have to say about
> security?
> 
> Chapter 9: Security
> Welcome to Windows 2000, it's real secure. In fact, Windows 2000 is so
> smart it takes care of all your security for you! So just sit back,
> relax, and never mind that excessive disk and network activity!
> Chapter 10: ....
 -- Devdas Bhagat and Jim on Bugtraq, re user education


They laugh at me because I'm different. I laugh at them because they're
all the same.


I think that's how Chicago got started. A bunch of people in New York
said, "Gee, I'm enjoying the crime and the poverty, but it just isn't
cold enough. Let's go west."
 -- Richard Jeni


Chicago was a town where nobody could forget how the money was made. It
was picked up from floors still slippery with blood.
 -- Norman Mailer,"Miami and the Siege of Chicago," 1968


If the soup had been as warm as the wine; if the wine had been as old 
as the turkey; and if the turkey had had a breast like the waitress, it 
would have been a swell dinner.
 -- Duncan Hines


The world is not interested in the storms you encountered, but did you 
bring in the ship.
 -- Anonymous


If you have a lot of tension and you get a headache, do what it says on
the aspirin bottle: "Take two aspirin" and "Keep away from children."
 -- Anonymous


If clues are outlawed, only outlaws will have a clue. 
 -- Heather Stern, TAG's Answer Gal


Well-behaved women rarely make history.
 -- Laurel Thatcher Ulrich


"The concept is interesting and well-formed, but in order to earn better
than a 'C,' the idea must be feasible." 
 -- A Yale University management professor in response to Fred Smith's 
    paper proposing reliable overnight delivery service. (Smith went on 
    to found Federal Express Corp.)


I have only seen two miracles in my life, nuclear fusion and compound
interest.
 -- Albert Einstein


The relative importance of files depends on their cost in terms of the
human effort needed to regenerate them. 
 -- T.A. Dolotta


Programmers don't die, They just GOSUB without RETURN.


In fact, as it turns out, I have never left anybody for anybody (except
for myself).
 -- Stef


[I'm] trying to figure out how to carry a grudge, but I can't find the
handles.
 -- Ryk


Me: Would you ajar that door, please?
Mevima: Ack! You're verbing *adjectives* now!

Verbing. It's not just for nouns any more. 
 -- Angi Long of House Windstalker


Cattle die, Kinsmen die,            Cattle die, Kinsmen die,
You, yourself, shall likewise die,  You, yourself, shall likewise die,
But word fame never dies            But one thing that shall never die
For he who achieves it well.        Are the stories of deeds well done.
 -- The Song of Odin, AD 76-77


Carpe diem (fish for ten cents)
 -- Usenet Oracle


We cannot put off living until we are ready. The most salient
characteristic of life is its coerciveness; it is always urgent, "here and
now," without any possible postponement. Life is fired at us point blank.
 -- Ortega y Gasset


 -0.017641646 -- The Sine of the Beast


Obviously I've never used any version of Informix; so I'm not sure how
much help I'll be in any event. However, I am a semi-intelligent interface
to search engines; so here's some results from my online burrowing.
-- Jim Dennis


My parents spelled the whole choice paralysis thing out for me once, for
which I shall be forever grateful. "Look, the fact that you're having
a hard time deciding means that any of these options would probably be
equally good. If there were big differences in quality between them,
you'd have an easier time choosing. So you're free to just pick one -
you're not going to make an awful mistake." 
 -- Rivka


"Awkward in a hundred ways, clumsy in a thousand, still I go on."
 -- Yueh-shan


E-mail is reincarnating the age of letter writing. We're keeping
in touch the way the Victorians did, building a personal community
connected by a constant stream of letters sharing news and gossip.
 -- Leslie Schroeder, 1994


"Lo sentimos, el numero que acaba de marcar es imaginario. Por favor,
rotelo 90 grados y vuelva a intentarlo."


Axiom: all jobs involve bullshit. What makes a job good *for you* is
that it is bullshit that *you can handle*.
 -- EveningStar


...there are three ways that marriages are effected biblically. We Jews,
just to be on the safe side, use all three.

The three ways are contract, purchase, and, basically, "sex with
intent."

"Contract" is pretty self-explanatory. It's a legal document between two
people which states that they're now married. "Purchase" is the reason for
wedding rings - in this method, the husband purchases the right to be
married from the wife. (The fact that the right to be married belongs to
the woman is part of why men can have multiple wives, but women can only
have one husband: women can only sell that right once, but men can buy as
many as will be sold to them.) And "sex with intent" - or, more properly,
seclusion with intent (it doesn't require actual sex, only the chance to
have sex, with intent) is the most primitive method - the two people spend
the night together, and in the morning, they're married.
 -- Xiphias Gladius, explaining Jewish laws of marriage


"Has your husband made off with my wife?"
"Which husband, which wife, or yes?"
"Yes."
 -- overheard by Darkhawk at AP7


"Laws that forbid the carrying of arms... disarm only those who are
neither inclined nor determined to commit crimes... Such laws make
things worse for the assaulted and better for the assailants; they serve
rather to encourage than to prevent homicides, for an unarmed man may be
attacked with greater confidence than an armed man."
 -- criminologist Cesare Beccaria, 1764


Windoze: The colorful clown suit for DOS.


The last word in computers: "Starting Windows 2000..."


Hiroshima 45... Chernobyl 86... Windows 2000


Q: I heard if you play the NT-4.0-CD backwards, you get a satanic
message? 
A: That's nothing, if you play it forward, it installs NT-4.0...


  / /    __  _  _  _  _ __  __
 / /__  / / / \// //_// \ \/ /
/____/ /_/ /_/\/ /___/  /_/\_\
 ...for IQ's Greater than 95...


Physics is the art of figuring out what you can logically ignore.
Engineering is the art of correcting for physics.
 -- Darkhawk


Death: Life's way of saying, "You can let go of your ankles now."


I love my enemies when they are intelligent as much as I hate those who
are stupid when they are defending me.
 -- Salvador Dali


Sometimes you can't help but be appalled at what's crept into your head
when you weren't looking.
 -- Bezel


And that the truth may appear for the satisfaction of all men, this is
my resolution: that there is no advantage absolutely, nor disadvantage in
striker, thruster, or warder, and there is great advantage in the striker,
thruster & warder, but in this manner. In the perfection of fight the
advantage consists in fight between party and party, that is, whosoever
wins or gains the place in true pace, space and time, has the advantage,
whether he is striker, thruster or warder. And that is my resolution.
 -- George Silver, "Paradoxes of Defence", 1599


Once it has been uprooted, 
the tumbleweed travels forever. 
 -- Li Po, "Parting" (Sam Hamill translation)


Linux: It is now safe to turn on your computer.


 - "You can write a Perl script to do *anything*."
 - "Hah! I'd like to see you write a Perl program to cut down a Redwood with
    a banana!"
 - "Easy."

1 while 'banana';   # wait for the tree to rot and fall over

 -- several of the clpm wizards


'Play the game by my rules and you will have great rewards [but I won't
tell you that my rules are imperceivable by mortals]" is a game that some
manipulative people (and some dangerous faery-folk) play. You didn't say
the [] part and you didn't actually *say* "Play the game by my rules" but
what you said sort of strayed into the general area to where you could
smell the stench of the bodies of people who had died chasing after those
rewards.'
 -- Stef Maruch


Marx said the purpose of philosophy is to change the world, rather than
to understand it, and his followers have spent 150 years changing what
they don't understand.
 -- Arthur D. Hlavaty


Confidence is going after Moby Dick in a row boat and taking the tartar
sauce with you. 
 -- Scott R. Godin in c.l.p.m.


For we fight, not for glory nor for riches nor for honour, but only and
alone for freedom, which no good man surrenders but with his life.
 -- Declaration of Arbroath, 6 April 1320


If I goof up socially, and I get the social equivalent of a kick in the
groin in return, I'm not likely to care about that person's hurt feelings.
I'll be putting social ice on my social balls. 
 -- Josh Jasper


Cattle die, kinfolk die, but one thing I know dies not ever; 
When hands are still, tongue stilled, and heart-drum sounds no more, 
Yet live name-deeds after - so where, now, is effort owed? 
Where, this day, shall I set my hands?
 -- from a post by Elise Anna Matthesen


... in my universe, interest in and openness to all the variances is not
just operational, it's a survival skill. And a sex toy.
 -- Elise Matthesen


It seems that Microsoft's definition of "stable" is exactly like the one
that horsemen use: it involves the production of manure, costs loads of
money, brings little tangible benefit, and when it falls sick, all you can
do is shoot it and put it out of its mis^H^Hemory.
 -- BAO


Just a thought: the more you think someone is being a bad person, the
more important it is to objectively examine your own judgments as well.
 -- Jay R. Ashworth in alt.poly


I hunger for knowledge, and anecdote is my favorite spoon.
 -- Elise Matthesen


Don't bother running away. You'll just die tired.
 -- Jealousy


You'd just *love* Australia then, where most of the creepy-crawlie
population carry sidearms, and a goodly proportion of those are of the "it
bites you and all your relatives die" kind... <g>
 -- Teal


A tutor who tooted a flute
Tried to tutor two tutors to toot
Said the two to the tutor:
"Is it harder to toot or
To tutor two tutors to toot?"


Civilization advances by extending the number of important operations
which we can perform without thinking.
 -- Alfred North Whitehead


If the gods one uses manage to model the universe in a useful manner, who
*cares* if they exist or not?
 -- Xiphias Gladius


It's not the years, it's the mileage.
 -- Indiana Jones


The Generation That Took Acid To Escape Reality
Now Takes Antacid To Deal With Reality


I have deep reservations about any system for classifying sexual
preferences that requires definitions of both the desirer and the desiree
in a binary, pick-ONE, model of gender as a basis for identifying sexual
orientation or affectional preference. ``What is your sex - M or F? What
is your partner's sex - M or F? `` I think these questions, like many of
the questions on the census, are broken. They just don't work. If life were
a bowl of soup and those questions were spoons, you could starve to death.
 -- Elise Matthesen


Okay. So I have real reservations about the utility, not to mention the
accuracy, of a two-choice gender system. And yet I use the word
``bisexual.'' I DID feel identification with it when I heard it. It sits
mostly pretty securely on my head, at those times when I am wearing labels
like hats. It helps me find other people who are considering and puzzling
over some of the same things I am. And I have often felt that the concept
of bisexuality sometimes just pisses off all the right people.
 -- Elise Matthesen


In the 17th century, Kikaku, one of the ten disciples of the great Japanese
poet Basho, composed a haiku:

Take a pair of wings
From a dragonfly, you would
Make a pepper-pod. 

Basho told Kikaku: "That's not a haiku. You kill the dragonfly." Kikaku
recomposed the lines:

Add a pair of wings
To a pepper-pod, you would
Make a dragonfly.

 -- Amal Naj, "Peppers"


What appears to be sloppy or meaningless use of words may well be a
completely correct use of words to express sloppy or meaningless ideas.
 -- Anon. 


If language is not correct, then what is said is not what is meant. If what
is said is not what is meant, then what ought to be done remains undone. 
 -- Kung Fu Tse (Confucius)


The search for the correct phrase is not a pedantic fad but a vital
necessity. Words are precision tools. Imprecision engenders ambiguity and
hours are wasted in removing verbal misunderstandings before the argument
of substance can begin.
 -- Anon.


When you write, do not forget that pestilent fellow, the critical reader,
who is not satisfied with catching the general drift and obvious intention
of the sentence, but insists that the words used must actually yield on
scrutiny the desired sense. 
 -- Paraphrased from Gower's preface to Fowler's Modern English Usage


Be an artist in words, that you may be strong, for the tongue is a sword.
 -- Unknown ancient Egyptian author


He who knows not and knows not that he knows not is a fool. Shun him.
He who know not and knows that he knows not is a child. Teach him.
He who knows and knows not that he knows is asleep. Wake him.
He who knows and knows that he knows is a wise man. Follow him.
 -- Arab proverb


And so they teach and babble undeterred -
With fools there's not a hope of intervening -
And when the people hear a sounding word,
They stand convinced that somewhere there's a meaning.
 -- Johann Wolfgang von Goethe


St. Patrick's Day: the one day of the year when the 2% of the world's
population that's Irish gets the other 98% completely shitfaced.


Trying to do *anything* industrial-strength on a NT platform is doomed
to failure - it's like the realization that you've been allocated a
bunk-space below a confirmed bedwetter. The question is not whether you
are going to get pissed on, but when.


Abundance consists not alone in material possession but in an uncovetous
spirit.
 -- Charles Sheldon


To have life more abundant, we must think in the limitless terms of
abundance.
 -- Thomas Dreier


There is no good in arguing with the inevitable. The only argument
available with an east wind is to put on your overcoat.
 -- James Russell Lowell


Paradise is where I am.
 -- Voltaire


The person who says, believes, and acts on the phrase "I ain't taking
any shit from anybody" is a very busy person indeed. This person must be
ever vigilant against news vendors who shortchange him, cab drivers who
take him the wrong way around, waiters who serve the other guy first,
florists who are charging ten cents more per tulip than the one down the
block, pharmacists who make you wait too long and cars that cut you off
at the light: they are a veritable miasma of righteous indignation and
never have a minute to relax and have a good time.
 -- Cynthia Heimel


If you accept your limitations you go beyond them.
 -- Brendan Francis


And that's the way it is.
 -- Walter Cronkite


Take what you can use and let the rest go by.
 -- Ken Kesey


Vex not thy spirit at the course of things; they heed not thy vexation. How
ludicrous and outlandish is astonishment at anything that may happen in
life.
 -- Marcus Antoninus


Everything I did in my life that was worthwhile I caught hell for.
 -- Earl Warren


The world is moving so fast these days that the man who says it can't
be done is generally interrupted by someone doing it.
 -- Harry Emerson Fosdick


We may affirm absolutely that nothing great in the world has been
accomplished without passion.
 -- Georg Hegel


To accomplish our destiny it is not enough merely to guard prudently
against road accidents. We must also cover before nightfall the distance
assigned to each of us.
 -- Alexis Carrel


'Tis God gives skill, but not without men's hands: He could not make
Antonio Stradivari's violins without Antonio.
 -- Stradivarius


Life consists not in holding good cards but in playing those you hold
well.
 -- Josh Billings


Things won are done; joy's soul lies in the doing.
 -- William Shakespeare


The world is divided into two classes, those who believe the incredible,
and those who do the improbable.
 -- Oscar Wilde


Always listen to experts. They'll tell you what can't be done and
why. Then do it.
 -- Robert Heinlein


The great thing in this world is not so much where we are, but in what
direction we are moving.
 -- Oliver Wendell Holmes


People are always blaming their circumstances for what they are. I don't
believe in circumstances. The people who get on in this world are the
people who get up and look for the circumstances they want, and, if they
can't find them, make them.
 -- George Bernard Shaw


Drive thy business, or it will drive thee.
 -- Benjamin Franklin


Look, I really don't want to wax philosophic, but I will say that
if you're alive, you got to flap your arms and legs, you got to jump
around a lot, you got to make a lot of noise, because life is the very
opposite of death. And therefore, as I see it, if you're quiet, you're
not living. You've got to be noisy, or at least your thoughts should be
noisy and colorful and lively.
 -- Mel Brooks


It is better to light a candle than to curse the darkness.
 -- Chinese Proverb / Motto Of The Christophers


The essential conditions of everything you do must be choice, love,
passion.
 -- Nadia Boulanger


If you have built castles in the air, your work need not be lost; that
is where they should be. Now put the foundations under them.
 -- Henry David Thoreau


The hand is the cutting edge of the mind.
 -- Jacob Bronowski


Our main business is not to see what lies dimly in the distance, but to
do what lies clearly at hand.
 -- Thomas Carlyle


Genius is an infinite capacity for taking pains.
 -- Janice Elice Hopkins


It's not the having, it's the getting.
 -- Needlepoint Pillow In Elizabeth Taylor's Living Room


Getting an idea should be like sitting down on a pin; it should make
you jump up and do something. 
 -- E. L. Simpson 


We should be taught not to wait for inspiration to start a thing. Action
always generates inspiration. Inspiration seldom generates action.
 -- Frank Tibolt


Do what you can, with what you have, with where you are.
 -- Theodore Roosevelt


We must cultivate our garden.
 -- Voltaire


He who has begun has half done. Dare to be wise; begin!
 -- Horace


It is not enough to have a good mind. The main thing is to use it well.
 -- René Descartes


Action is the antidote to despair.
 -- Joan Baez


Take it easy, but take it.
 -- Woody Guthrie


Every human mind is a great slumbering power until awakened by a keen
desire and by definite resolution to do.
 -- Edgar F. Roberts


An idea isn't worth much until a man is found who has the energy and
ability to make it work.
 -- William Feather


The reward of a thing well done is to have done it.
 -- Ralph Waldo Emerson


Men are all alike in their promises. It is only in their deeds that
they differ.
 -- Moliére


The smallest good deed is better than the grandest good intention.
 -- Duguet


All worthwhile men have good thoughts, good ideas and good intentions,
but precious few of them ever translate those into action.
 -- John Hancock Field


All the beautiful sentiments in the world weigh less than a single
lovely action.
 -- James Russell Lowell


I will not steep my speech in lies; the test of any man lies in action.
 -- Pindar


"Do-so" is more important than "say-so."
 -- Pete Seeger


You can't build a reputation on what you're GOING to do.
 -- Henry Ford


When a Roman was returning from a trip, he used to send someone ahead
to let his wife know, so as not to surprise her in the act.
 -- Michel De Montaigne


The psychology of adultery has been falsified by conventional morals,
which assume, in monogamous countries, that attraction to one person
cannot coexist with affection for another. Everybody knows that this
is untrue.
 -- Bertrand Russell


A man is insensible to the relish of prosperity till he has tasted
adversity.
 -- Sa'id


The good things which belong to prosperity are to be wished, but good
things that belong to adversity are to be admired.
 -- Seneca


A reasonable amount of fleas is good for a dog; it keeps him from brooding
over being a dog.
 -- Edward Westcott


In the depth of winter, I finally learned that within me there lay an
invincible summer.
 -- Albert Camus


Oh, isn't life a terrible thing, thank God?
 -- Dylan Thomas


The school of hard knocks is an accelerated curriculum.
 -- Anonymous


Nobody, as long as he moves about among the chaotic currents of life,
is without trouble.
 -- Carl Jung


If I had a formula for bypassing trouble, I would not pass it
round. Trouble creates a capacity to handle it. I don't embrace trouble;
that's as bad as treating it as an enemy. But I do say meet it as a
friend, for you'll see a lot of it and had better be on speaking terms
with it.
 -- Oliver Wendell Holmes


God gave burdens, also shoulders.
 -- Yiddish Proverb


Life is mostly froth and bubble, 
Two things stand like stone, 
Kindness in another's trouble, 
Courage in your own.
 -- Adam Lindsay Gordon


Please give me some good advice in your next letter. I promise not to
follow it.
 -- Edna St. Vincent Millay


I owe my success to having listened respectfully to the very best advice,
and then going away and doing the exact opposite.
 -- G. K. Chesterton


Advice is what we ask for when we already know the answer but wish
we didn't.
 -- Erica Jong


Father told me that if I ever met a lady in a dress like yours, I must
look her straight in the eyes.
 -- Charles, Prince Of Wales (on Susan Hampshire's decolletage)


Meet the sun every morning as if it could cast a ballot.
 -- Henry Cabot Lodge, Jr. To Novice Political Campaigner Dwight
    D. Eisenhower


If you want a quality, act as if you already had it. Try the "as if"
technique.
 -- William James


Affirmation of life is the spiritual act by which man ceases to live
unreflectively and begins to devote himself to his life with reverence
in order to raise it to its true value. To affirm life is to deepen,
to make more inward, and to exalt the will to live.
 -- Albert Schweitzer


The words "I am..." are potent words; be careful what you hitch them to.
The thing you're claiming has a way of reaching back and claiming you.
 -- A. L. Kitselman


I am by temperament a conquistador.
 -- Sigmund Freud


I am not a member of any organized political party. I am a Democrat.
 -- Will Rogers


His huff arrived, and he departed in it.
 -- Alexander Woollcott


Anybody can become angry, that is easy; but to be angry with the right
person, and to the right degree, and at the right time, and for the right
purpose, and in the right way, that is not within everybody's power and
is not easy.
 -- Aristotle


If you do not wish to be prone to anger, do not feed the habit; give
it nothing which may tend to its increase. At first, keep quiet and
count the days when you were not angry: "I used to be angry every day,
then every other day: next, every two, then every three days!" and if
you succeed in passing thirty days, sacrifice to the gods in thanksgiving.
 -- Epictetus


Every little yielding to anxiety is a step away from the natural heart
of man.
 -- Japanese Proverb


Most human beings use their public life like a visiting card. They show
it to others and say, This is me. The others take the card and think to
themselves, If you say so. But most human beings have another life too,
a gray one, lurking in the darkness, torturing us, a life we try to hide
like an ugly sin.
 -- Federico García Lorca


I don't say we all ought to misbehave, but we ought to look as if
we could.
 -- Orson Welles


While you're saving your face, you're losing your ass.
 -- Lyndon B. Johnson


The genitals themselves have not undergone the development of the rest
of the human form in the direction of beauty.
 -- Sigmund Freud


Our greatest pretenses are built up not to hide the evil and the ugly
in us, but our emptiness. The hardest thing to hide is something that
is not there.
 -- Eric Hoffer


Excuse me, I have to use the toilet. Actually, I have to use the
telephone, but I'm too embarrassed to say so.
 -- Dorothy Parker


The sheer beauty of our planet surprised me. It was a huge pearl,
set in spangled ebony. It was nacreous, it was opal. No, it was far
more lovely than any jewel. Its patterned coloring was more subtle,
more ethereal. It displayed the delicacy and brilliance, the intricacy
and harmony of a live thing.
 -- Olaf Stapledon


Father, each of your sermons is better than the next.
 -- Anonymous Church Goer


Art is a collaboration between God and the artist, and the less the
artist does the better.
 -- André Gide


Art is a jealous mistress, and if a man has a genius for painting,
poetry, music, architecture or philosophy, he makes a bad husband and
an ill provider.
 -- Ralph Waldo Emerson


It is a mistake for a sculptor or a painter to speak or write very often
about his job. It releases tension needed for his work.
 -- Henry Moore


A physicist is an atom's way of knowing about atoms.
 -- George Wald


If they can get you asking the wrong questions, they don't have to worry
about the answers.
 -- Thomas Pynchon


You have a right to an opinion. You just don't have a right to an opinion
that no one disagrees with.
 -- SFJ


The hidden sting in getting one's sense of being worthwhile from taking
care of others is that if people do not stay in need of one in exactly
the same way, one might become afraid that one is losing one's job
security. People sure can get pretty upset if the damaged person gets
healed, as you say. It might take away the thing that they feel pays
their rent on the planet. 
 -- Elise Matthesen


It is also insanely easy to get caught in nasty codependancy traps when
one attracts and is attracted to fragile people. And that's not something
that's easy to catch/detect, when you're sliding into it.
 -- Netdancer&


You can program badly in any language (even Pascal if you try hard enough).
 -- Nick Kew


I can do this because Perl lays down like a wanton woman and lets me
have my way with her.
 -- Geoff Gerrietts


The idiotic interaction between the filesystem notation
and the C syntax of escaping characters is one that only
an idiot ignorant of history, programming, and computer
science could have devised. Who did this stupid thing?

   "What has it gots in its slasheness? Curse the Gates!
    We hates him forever!"

 -- Tom Christiansen


Yes: Java's main advantage over Perl is that it's hard to use for casual
programmers, so keeps all but the most intrepid programmers away from it.
It has no decent support for string processing, allowing you to spend
hours at useless debugging. It has a very restrictive and static system 
to make sure you don't try anything interesting. It makes sure that you
use objects, by golly, because James Gosling said so. It's easy for C++
programmers to use, and hard for shell or BASIC programmers to use. It
also only runs on a few systems, locking its customers into a a closed
system and restricting their options.
 -- Tom Christiansen


Java is cute. Perl is practical.
 -- Nathan V Patwardhan


The Internet Revolution was founded on open systems: an open system is one
whose software you can look at, a box you can unwrap and play with. It's
not about secret binaries or crippleware or brother-can-you-spare-a-dime
shareware. If everyone always had hidden software, you wouldn't have
1/100th the useful software you have right now.

And you wouldn't have Perl.
 -- Tom Christiansen


What could you say? The guy had no business asking the question and no use
for the answer. Maybe the right answer would have been to cut off his
finger or something. I dunno.
 -- Mark Atwood


Before you think UNIX is too family-oriented, note that all children must
die.
 -- Eric F. Johnson


Um, my OED has neither a CLI nor a GUI -- it's made of paper.
 -- Tom Christiansen


The Vikings aren't dead; they've only been domesticated.
 -- Terje Bless


EMACS belongs in <sys/errno.h>: Editor Too Big!
 -- Tom Christiansen


You call THIS sugar? I'd say it's syntactic vinegar. One can at least read
lambda notation.
 -- Vladimir Alexiev


I don't know - most books on Java at least present a lot of good reasons to
learn Perl.
 -- David Alan Black


In a business, marketroids, salespukes, and lawyers have different goals
from those who actually do work and produce something.
 -- Tom Christiansen


Vi is still around because they got it right the first time and
nothing better has come along. (Emacs is just a bloated vi clone! :))
 -- Scott McMahan


Vi isn't a particularly good editor for those whose brains haven't been
previously damaged by its interface. Emacs suffers from the same problem and
comparing the two is mostly pointless. I don't particularly like vi, but 1) I
was forced to use it a long time ago when there weren't any alternatives
(well, none that my CS department was willing to investigate), 2) given a host
of crappy unix editors, I stick with the devil I know, 3) I could never get
the hang of emacs (Ctrl-Esc-Esc-Backspace-Toilet_Seat...), and 4) I trust vi
to simply mangle my text on a wrong keystroke, not wipe my filesystem,
refinance my house, make large political contributions on behalf of dead
relatives, drive while intoxicated or consort with demons, all of which (I
suspect) emacs could perform with an accidental Meta-Meta-Keystroke.
 -- Bob Apthorpe


The problem is that you need to use Perl for a year before your sense of
surprise matches Perl's.
 -- ChipDude


C with decent text manipulation isn't C. C is for creating good things, it
itself is not a cool thing.
 -- ChipDude


Signals are for people who can't handle sequential execution.
 -- ChipDude


UNIX people really only need tar and gzip, to get by.
 -- William Middleton


Well, Bill Gates *did* invent the Internet, right after he founded Sun
Microsystems. Of course, it was called uucp then, and it was secret,
because the DoD wanted a network which would continue working even if
the commies infected all the modems with viruses. I can't understand
what you've got against win95 - after all, it's really just NT with a
registry thingy changed, and we all know NT is the best platform for
mission-critical networked systems. Unix was invented in the 60's by
hippies and faggots, and Linus Torvalds' name backwards is something
satanic, and how can you trust an OS written by someone named after a
character from "Peanuts" anyway?
 -- Malcolm Ray


The following two statements are usually both true:
       There's not enough documentation.
       There's too much documentation.
 -- Larry Wall


Of course, this being Perl, we could always take both approaches.
 -- Larry Wall


Chess is a game. Magic is a game. Maj Jongg and Shafskopf are games. D&D is
a game. Even pinball is a game. But video diversions are merely a way to
weed out those with latent epilepsy.
 -- Tom Christiansen


But the possibility of abuse may be a good reason for leaving capabilities
out of other computer languages, it's not a good reason for leaving
capabilities out of Perl.
 -- Larry Wall


Besides, I wasn't trying to help them understand. I was only trying to
help them think they understand.
 -- Larry Wall


And don't tell me there isn't one bit of difference between null and
space, because that's exactly how much difference there is. :-)
 -- Larry Wall


I have a gut feeling that Perl could ultimately replace COBOL as the
data-mangling glue of choice for large DP shops.
 -- Charlie Stross


Seems to me it used to be considered rude to be a random newbie and ask
everyone else to solve a problem for you and be done with it.
 -- Abby Franquemont


Tom P. is a clever perl script, a la Eliza. Read thirty of his posts
and look at the heavy redundancy. Humans are not that patient.

Which is not to say there is not also a human Tom P, he teaches for
Stonehenge.
 -- Eli the Bearded


Maybe Pi looks like this:

   =for C
       i++;                    /* add 1 to i */
   =end
   =for C++
       i.value() += 1;         // add 1 to i, probably
   =end
   =for Java
       system().foo().bar().i().value().please().increment(); // ???  
   =end
 -- Larry Wall


Because the programmer knows what he or she wants to optimize for, and
the language designer doesn't. Plus, it's more fun.

Dink Thifferent.
 -- Larry Wall


[To George Reese] Don't let the frustration of not being able to form a
coherent argument get to you, George. Instead, try to learn something from
those who frustrated you by outperforming you.
 -- Chris Russo


On the sociology axis, anyone who's read the whole of the thread now
understands Internet Flamewar Rule Number Twelve: if you simply have no
clue, don't pretend you do. Perhaps some young impressionable kindling
wannabe, learning from the example of George Reese, will now go learn
something before posting - a positive result, wouldn't you agree?
 -- Felix S. Gallo


Perl should only be studied as a second language. A good first 
language would be English.
 -- Larry Wall


Don't teach Perl as a first language. Instead, find a nice small
language and teach the subset of Perl that corresponds to it.
 -- Larry Wall


The trouble with teaching Perl as a first computer language is that your
students won't appreciate it till they start learning their second. 

The trouble with teaching Perl as a second language is that there's
no single suitable first language to go in front.
 -- Larry Wall


Don't teach them Perl as a first language, or they'll never make it to
their second language...
 -- Larry Wall


Don't let anyone tell you what your first computer language should be
before you've learned several.
 -- Larry Wall


Perl can certainly be used as a first computer language, but it was
really designed to be a *last* computer language.
 -- Larry Wall


Well of *course* Perl should not be taught to everyone. It should only
be taught to people who want to like their computers.
 -- Larry Wall


Honk if you love Perl! (or strawberries!)
 -- Larry Wall


If UNIX is the Great American Novel, Perl is the Cliff's Notes.
 -- David Jacoby


In article <slrn7q2f86.fmt.abigail@alexandra.delanet.com>,
       abigail@delanet.com (Abigail) writes:
: So, let's try to tie @ISA. ;-)
   $abigail->reserve($hell->{'pit'}[6]);  # :-)
 -- Greg Bacon


Good. If I can annoy one luser a day, my time hasn't been wasted.
 -- Malcomb Ray


As the length of a thread in comp.lang.perl.{misc,moderated} approaches
infinity, the probability that someone will argue with a benchmark goes
to one.
 -- Greg Bacon


But also, and this is the important bit, because I *couldn't have written 
it* without Larry Wall giving away Perl, or Linus Torvalds handing out this
thing he was hacking on in 1991, that inspired a college sophomore in 1992
to say, "You know, this Unix thing that we've got on these here Sun boxes,
it's really nifty. Beats the shit out of Windows 3.0. And here's a way I
can get something like it on the machine in my room, for no cost."[0] Or
Ken and Dennis wanting to play games on a PDP-7 and figuring that someone
else might find their work neat. Or John Von Neumann for realizing that,
hey, here's a way to design a machine that can be almost a Universal Turing
Machine. Or Bill Shockley for figuring out that there's a neat trick you 
can do to build semiconductor switches. And because I owe a lot to all
these other people whose work I'm using, it doesn't feel right to say
Nyah! Nyah! You can't have it!" Sure, I deserve credit for what I did.
So do all the giants on whose shoulders I'm standing.
 -- Adam J. Thornton


[On whether SMTP is a mail injection protocol]
Yes, it *is* a mail injection protocol. What on earth do you think Eudora, 
Netscape, IE, Outlook, Pegasus Mail et al use to send mail? Carrier
pigeons?

Good grief, man, just because you like making life difficult for yourself 
doesn't mean you're right.
 -- Dan Sugalski


The way perl does communication between processes on VMS involves mailboxes.
 -- Dan Sugalski


[Eliminating symrefs so you can "use strict"]... is a little like saying
you have decided to stop setting your furniture on fire, because you want
to be able to turn your smoke alarms back on.
 -- Mark Jason Dominus in c.l.p.misc


If you don't use use strict; you're on your own anyway.
 -- Abigail in comp.lang.perl.misc


The screwdriver *is* the portable method.
 -- Abigail in c.l.p.m


By promoting postconditions to preconditions, algorithms become remarkably
simple.
 -- Abigail


Your example is a pathological extreme. But then :) I would expect nothing
less in this forum.
 -- T. Alex Beamish in comp.lang.perl.misc


What gets me is 'extra virgin olive oil'. I always thought virginity was
a binary state.
 -- Craig Berry in comp.lang.perl.misc


Monitoring a nuclear power plant? Well... maybe not. Not sure I'd trust
C for this either as a core dump could lead to, well, a core dump.
 -- Michael Carman in comp.lang.perl.misc


TIMTOWTDI, but did you have to pick the ugliest way you could find?
 -- after Michael Carman in comp.lang.perl.misc


Usenet is a lousy way to get quick service. It's even worse if you want
quick and *correct* answers.
 -- David Cassell in comp.lang.perl.misc


Congratulations, you have just reinvented the wheel. *And* made it square.
 -- Simon Cozens in comp.lang.perl.misc


TIMTOWTDI often means there is more than one really bad way to do it.
 -- after Tim Cuffel in comp.lang.perl.misc


When they say that Perl is a `glue language', what they really mean is
that it is good for cleaning up after the mistakes of other programs.
 -- Mark-Jason Dominus in comp.lang.perl.misc


My previous boss... was never afraid to make himself look silly if it was
a step to acquiring new knowledge, and we all respected him for that.
 -- Alan J. Flavell in comp.lang.perl.misc


Opinions may of course differ on this topic, but wouldn't it be better
to persuade the hon. Usenaut, as a first priority, to post accurate
information, before persuading them to abandon this remarkably accurate
indicator of usenet bogosity?
 -- Alan J. Flavell in c.l.p.misc


I don't know what your original problem is, but I suggest to use a hash.
 -- Rafael Garcia-Suarez in comp.lang.perl.misc


Do you replace the battery with a grapefruit when your car won't start,
just in case that's the problem?
 -- Sam Holden in comp.lang.perl.misc


'Manners' evolve to avoid conflict in crowded situations. Usenet (and this
newsgroup in particular) is crowded.
 -- Tad McClellan in clp.misc


Get real! This is a discussion group, not a helpdesk. You post
something, we discuss its implications. If the discussion happens to
answer a question you've asked, that's incidental.
 -- nobull in clpm


I leave that to Abigail. I won't say that she heals the sick, but they
sure never complain anymore...
 -- Alex Rhomberg in comp.lang.perl.misc


Unless you perform unnatural acts, indexes start at 0, not 1.
 -- Larry Rosler in comp.lang.perl misc


If circles were squares, this would be an accurate value of pi.
 -- Joe Schaefer in comp.lang.perl.misc


Yup. Luckily I'm using PSI::ESP_XS, so it's all quite fast.
 -- Martien Verbruggen in comp.lang.perl.misc


Did I mention that I can't tell you how to get rich? If I could, I'd be
rich, and not here.
 -- Martien Verbruggen in comp.lang.perl.misc


However, SQL is better in this regard, tempting you from the start in MySQL
with the good old 'insert into users ...'
 -- W K in comp.lang.perl.misc


Yes I know you can see it in MSIE, but you could feed MSIE a banana and
it would think it was HTML.
 -- Jeff Zucker in comp.lang.perl.misc


And, to close this post, let me pick a rather universally appropriate
quote from a clpm regular in another newsgroup:

Ilmari Karonen - http://www.sci.fi/~iltzu/
/* If you don't understand, don't touch */
 -- Abigail in the monastery


Carpe Diem (Seize the day).
-- Juvenal ( Decimus Junius Juvenalis, Roman poet 55-127 AD)


Opportunities multiply as they are seized.
 -- Sun Tzu


To say yes, you have to sweat and roll up your sleeves and plunge both
hands into life up to the elbows. It is easy to say no, even if saying no
means death.
 -- Jean Anouilh, French playwright


For a long time it had seemed to me that life was about to begin - real
life. But there was always some obstacle in the way, something to be gotten
through first, some unfinished business, time still to be served, a debt to
be paid. Then life would begin. At last it dawned on me that these
obstacles were my life.
 -- Alfred D. Souza Martinique, African poet and playwright


It is by teaching that we teach ourselves, by relating that we observe, by
affirming that we examine, by showing that we look, by writing that we
think, by pumping that we draw water into the well.
 -- Henri-Fredric Amiel


A day dawns, quite like other days; in it, a single hour comes, quite like
other hours; but in that day and in that hour the chance of a lifetime
faces us.
 -- Maltbie Babcock


A person is only as big as the dream they dare to live.
 -- Author Unknown


Most of all beware, even in thought, of assuming the sterile attitude of
the spectator, for life is not a spectacle, a sea of griefs is not a
proscenium, and a man who wails is not a dancing bear.
 -- Aimé-Fernand Césaire


A little inaccuracy sometimes saves a ton of explanation.
 -- H. H. Munro (Saki)


Sometimes our inner voices need a good smack.
 -- Torrent


Sometimes when you set something free, it comes back to you only when
it wants food or money.
 -- SJM


"If I had known you were a virgin, I'd have taken more time."
"If I had known you had more time, I'd have taken off my pantyhose."


Indifference is a militant thing... When it goes away it leaves smoking
ruins, where lie citizens bayonetted through the throat. It is not a
children's pastime like mere highway robbery.
 -- Stephen Crane


It wasn't the "love" in "I love you" that changed, it was the "I" and the
"you". 
 -- Papersky


> you loved them 10 seconds ago, before you found out. what, the 
> love disappears in an instant?

I don't know. It's never happened. 

But, yes, I think it would. It would mean that the person I loved didn't,
in fact, exist. 
 -- Xiphias Gladius, responding to piranha


Mit der Dummheit kaempfen Goetter selbst vergebens. 
(Against stupidity the gods themselves contend in vain.)
 -- Friedrich Schiller (1759-1805) 


Six hundred million sperm and you were the *fastest*? please.
 -- Scott R. Godwin


If you have to flame, flame creatively or not at all. (i.e. everyone
else should be grinning but the recipient, who should either wind up off
his rocker with fury, or scratching his head wondering if (or how badly)
he really got flamed.) Telling someone to fuck off simply isn't nearly
as entertaining or educational. (:
 -- srg


Fortunately, learning behavior occurred shortly thereafter. ;-) (That's
in the immortal words of the Juan I live with.) 
 -- Elise Matthesen


Take myself, subtract films, and the remainder is zero.
 -- Akira Kurosawa 


Listen to your brain. It has lots of information.
 -- Chelsey, Age 7 


I shall \0x0D.
 -- Nathan Roberts 


Uh, yeah. Well, that's my mistake for the year... 
 -- Larry Wall 


My theory is that his ignorance clouded his poor judgment.
 -- Alice, in Dilbert's office 


I didn't jump. I took a tiny step and the conclusions were right there.
 -- Buffy


People don't buy our products because they want a 1/2 inch drill, they buy
our products because they want a 1/2 inch hole.
 -- reportedly, some exec at Black and Decker 


Chemistry is easy. It's just like witchcraft, but with less newt. 
 -- Willow 


Your question doesn't make any sense. You might as well ask whether
it is possible to grow vegetables from a painting, without becoming
Wednesday first.
 -- Abigail, c.l.p.misc 


You kids today have it easy. I remember when we had to write programs with
an ice pick and index cards. compliant. Soon people will ask, "What's an
ice pick?"
 -- Lee Sharp 


Six course banquet of nothing, with a scoop of sod-all for a palate
cleanser.
 -- Rupert Giles 


Assume the person who'll need to maintain your code owns an axe and isn't
afraid to use it.
 -- Dan Sugalski on good coding practice 


What kind of marathon crack binge would cause you believe this?
 -- Mark Rogaski


Sex is the mathematics urge sublimated. 
 -- M. C. Reed


Interestingly enough, Linux has a share that is greater than any single 
proprietary Unix.
 -- Michael Dell Keynote Address, Canadian Club of Toronto, April 7/2000


You're a Christian missionary. Your profession uses lies like bok choi
farmers use pig shit.
 -- Dr. Rev. Chuck, M.D., P.A.


i used to be a superhero
no one could touch me
not even myself you are like a phone booth
that I somehow stumbled into and now look at me
i am just like everybody else.
 -- Ani DiFranco, "Superhero"


Fuck, it's people like that that make me wish I had a bazooka. But I
digress.
 -- Mark 'Kamikaze' Hughes in the Perl monastery


If you want to make yourself be wanted, then learn to eat criticism when it
comes your way. Learn that you are not always right, and you don't always
_have_ to be right. accept that some people know more than you do about
some subjects. Instead of getting defensive, learn.
 -- Martien Verbruggen


The thing about translation problems is that nobody has to be "wrong" for
stuff to be all fucked up, pardon my idiom.
 -- Elise Matthesen


Sometimes my body language goes around talking behind my back, though.
<wry look>
 -- Elise Matthesen


111% of crap is everything.
 -- Larry Wall


What is the sound of Perl? Is it not the sound of a wall that people
have stopped banging their heads against?
 -- Larry Wall


In general, if you think something isn't in Perl, try it out, because
it usually is. :-)
 -- Larry Wall


Perl is designed to give you several ways to do anything, so consider
picking the most readable one.
 -- Larry Wall


All language designers are arrogant. Goes with the territory... :-)
 -- Larry Wall


Any computer scientist who praises orthogonality should be sentenced to
use an Etch-a-Sketch.
 -- Larry Wall


Historically speaking, the presence of wheels in Unix has never
precluded their reinvention.
 -- Larry Wall


I already have too much problem with people thinking the efficiency
of a perl construct is related to its length. On the other hand, I'm
perfectly capable of changing my mind next week...
 -- Larry Wall


I can only bend the rules so much before it starts looking like I'm
breaking the rules.
 -- Larry Wall


I do quarrel with logic that says, `Stupid people are associated with
X, therefore X is stupid.' Stupid people are associated with everything.
 -- Larry Wall


If you only have a nail, you tend to see every hammer as a problem.
 -- Larry Wall


It's okay to be wrong temporarily.
 -- Larry Wall


Just because something is obviously happening doesn't mean something
obvious is happening.
 -- Larry Wall


Just because you're into control doesn't mean you're in control.
 -- Larry Wall


"Just because you're screwed *up* doesn't mean you're screwed.
 -- Larry Wall


Let's say the docs present a simplified view of reality...
 -- Larry Wall


New versions happen.
 -- Larry Wall


Real programmers can write assembly code in any language.
 -- Larry Wall


Some people think abstraction makes things easier, while others think
it makes things harder. It depends on whether you like to think about
things.
 -- Larry Wall


That which does not kill me makes me stranger.
 -- Larry Wall


The purpose of most computer languages is to lengthen your resume by a
word and a comma.
 -- Larry Wall


There ain't nothin' in this world that's worth being a snot over.
 -- Larry Wall


There are probably better ways to do that, but it would make the parser
more complex. I do, occasionally, struggle feebly against complexity...
 -- Larry Wall


The social dynamics of the net are a direct consequence of the fact
that nobody has yet developed a Remote Strangulation Protocol.
 -- Larry Wall


The young think they are immortal, and are determined to prove
otherwise.
 -- Larry Wall


To claim any more than that is to invite a religious war, which I
ain't. Go thou and don't likewise.
 -- Larry Wall


Winter is worth its wait in cold.
 -- Larry Wall


Yes, you can think of almost everything as a function, but this may
upset your wife.
 -- Larry Wall


You can only measure the size of your head from the inside.
 -- Larry Wall


I am not an angry girl, But it seems that I've got everyone fooled... 
Every time I say something they find hard to hear, they chalk it up to my
own anger, and never to their own fear...
 -- Ani DiFranco


"Windows? No thanks, I have work to do..."


"Calling all... this is our last cry before our eternal silence."
 -- one of the last Morse Code messages ever transmitted; sent by a French 
  vessel shortly before the last official Morse station went off the air


"Sales of accordions have increased 36%. So maybe the rise in teen drug use
isn't the most disturbing trend in society."
 -- The Cutler Daily Scoop


Most of the programs I write are not in the "casual programming" category,
and in fact Stonehenge's official position on "strict" is "anything that
exceeds 10 lines or 10 minutes of use or we get paid more than $10 for
must use strict". 
 -- Randal Schwartz


There is no greater blessing a mother can give her daughter than a reliable
sense of the veracity of her own intuition. Intuition is handed from parent
to child in the simplest ways: "You have good judgment. What do you think
lies hidden behind all this?"
 -- Clarissa Pinkola Estes, Women Who Run With the Wolves


The problem with sharks is that they are too large to get to the shallow 
end of the gene pool.
 -- Scott R. Godin


Give a man a fish, and he'll eat for a day. Teach a man to fish, and
he'll get nailed by a U.S. nuclear submarine.
 -- Glenn Brensinger in rec.humor.funny


I find a lot of human communication patterns very underspecified for a
communications protocol.
 -- Russ Allbery <rra@stanford.edu>


We got the one where we were supposed to always tell the truth, and
we were told what the truth should be, so it was our job to change our
lives and our minds and hearts so that we could truthfully tell them what
they wanted to hear. Didn't work fer shit. Doesn't work real well in
relationships either, come to think of it.
 -- Elise Matthesen


Still, my current default reaction to an intermediary is the same reaction
that a lot of people have to the words "We have to talk." (And no, I don't
have to stay stuck on that reaction, and I can't abdicate responsibility
for my actions. But I have the reaction.) 
 -- Elise Matthesen


I'm not real impressed by smiting. Almost anybody can smite. It gets old;
plus it's sometimes a waste of the smitten. To successfully invite someone
into constructive dialogue - *that* impresses me.
 -- Elise Matthesen


While I sit here alone at my computer, one of my sweeties is in the
bedroom with my husband. Teaching him how to use Linux. 
 -- Rivka, "The Shocking Truth About Polyamory" (post on alt.polyamory)


Those who profess to favor freedom, and yet deprecate agitation, are
men who want rain without thunder and lightning. They want the ocean
without the roar of its many waters.
 -- Frederick Douglass


We shall have a yurt of barbaric splendor, with heads of misunderstandings
and miscommunications hanging over the fireplace and their furry skins
spread out on the floor.
 -- BAO


And if He closes before you
All passes and all ways 
He'll show you a hidden pathway
Which no one yet has known
 -- Maulana Rumi


Laws that restrict speech are an abomination for a simple reason. They're
like a poison gas; they seem to be a good weapon to vanquish your enemy,
but the wind has a way of shifting.
 -- Ira Glasser


A conservative, seeing a man drowning twenty feet from shore, will throw
him a fifteen-foot rope and tell him to swim for it. A liberal, faced
with the same situation, throws the man a twenty-foot rope, then lets
go of his end so that he may go off and perform another good deed.
 -- Frederick Wamsley


I draw the line at "what you can get away with" - and I mean that in the
nicest of possible ways. If you're commercial and you write something
trivial then someone's going to implement it as freeware and you get what
you deserve: no business. If you do something that's not being done in the
freeware community, then that's a service and people will pay for it. I
guess I take a very Darwinian view of the division of freeware vs. commercial.
 -- Larry Wall


Only users lose drugs.
 -- Mikey


Your emotional state at this very moment does not define you.
 -- somebody on alt.support.depression


I want to die peacefully in my sleep like my grandfather - not screaming
in terror like his passengers.
 -- Jim Larkin


In great deeds something abides. On great fields something stays. Forms
change and pass; bodies disappear; but spirits linger, to consecrate
ground for the vision-place of souls. And reverent men and women
from afar, and generations that know us not and that we know not of,
heart-drawn to see where and by whom great things were suffered and done
for them, shall come to this deathless field, to ponder and dream; and
lo! the shadow of a mighty presence shall wrap them in its bosom, and the
power of the vision pass into their souls.
 --Joshua Lawrence Chamberlain


Thanks for quoting my entire post back at me, by the way. I had no idea
what I'd said.
 -- Rose


The goddess delights in making us eat our strongly stated preferences.
-- SJM


A lovely minister (Episcopalian, IIRC) once posted something to
alt.callahans to the effect of "I overheard someone say 'What would
Jesus do?'. I said, 'He'd point to a light bulb and scream "What is
_that_?!" Except he'd do it in Aramaic.'" 
 -- Rose


It's like watching a nature documentary about piranha in which all the
deadly fish do is write each other love notes: eventually, we want to see
them bare their teeth and shred an ox.
 --Max Sparber in City Pages, 31-Jan-2001


We're not just taking off our clothes and having sex. We've also got
karaoke.
 -- "Wild" Bill Goodwin, 71, denying to police investigators in May 
    that he was conducting orgies at his Costa Mesa home. [via San
    Francisco Chronicle-AP, 1995]


The cherry blossom
In my neighbour's garden - Oh!
It looks really nice.
 -- Wendy Cope, "Strugnell's Haiku"


The leaves have fallen
And the snow has fallen and
Soon my hair also...
 -- Wendy Cope, "Strugnell's Haiku"


November evening:
The moon is up, rooks settle,
The pubs are open.
 -- Wendy Cope, "Strugnell's Haiku"


Poor Torpalcat. I'm sure as soon as I open the door and get horizontal
again he will recolonize me, though. I'm warm. And he is clear on his
relationship needs. <heh> 
-- Elise Matthesen


He who has never hacked sendmail.cf has no soul; he who has hacked
sendmail.cf more than once has no brain.
 -- Old Hacker Proverb


Hath not a dude eyes? If you prick us, do we not get bummed? If we eat bad
guacamole, do we not blow chunks?
 -- Keanu Reeves as Shylock in The Critic


/Coitus a tergo in more ferarum/ (fucking from behind in the manner of
beasts)
 -- Catullus describing doggy style sex


A well-rounded geek should be able to geek about anything.
 -- nicolai@esperi.org


THIS IS NOT A HELP DESK.
THIS IS A COMMUNITY POTLUCK.
DON'T WHINE BECAUSE SOMEONE DIDN'T BRING ICE CREAM.
DON'T BOGART THE POTATO SALAD.
BRING SOMETHING OCCASIONALLY, YOU BUM. EVEN CHIPS.
DON'T WHINE WHEN SOMEONE SAYS WE DON'T HAVE TABLE SERVICE.

That last one is the one you want, or even think you have a right to have. 
No, there is no table service in comp.lang.perl.misc. It's all self-serve. 
Get unlazy, and get all the food you want. It's buffet-style, baby. You
gotta do some footwork yourself.
 -- Randal L. Schwartz, in clpm


Again, thank you for the kind words that we are sure are in your e-mail but
we didn't have the time to confirm by reading it in detail.
 -- from http://www.queeg.com/hellokitty/


Confront a child, a puppy, and a kitten with a sudden danger; the child
will turn instinctively for more assistance, the puppy will grovel in
abject submission, the kitten will brace its tiny body for a frantic
resistance.
 -- H. H. Munro


Bill, I say this with all due respect and much love.
You are a scary, scary man who should be medicated by professionals.
 -- RJ


Five Drinking Laws of Dionysus - 
1. Never drink alone.
2. Glory in the sweat and slime of the glad-hearted fuck.
3. Always drink to excess; never leave a bottle half-full.
4. Moderation is for monks; life is meant to be lived well.
5. Make what you drink that others may drink of you.


At that point I think things are utterly negotiable depending upon the
preferences/choices/whims of the parties involved. ... Magic 8 Ball says,
"Future Hazy, Ask Again When It's Not Hypothetical."
 -- RJ


songbird  *peep*  (thinking of a poi pond where half formed poi
                  ngs swim about until they are ready to
                                                              leap out
 -- songbird in alt.poly


I object to the creation of [news://intelligence.lack-of] on the grounds
that it duplicates Usenet.
 -- Russ Allbery on the proposal to create the above NG


If we discovered we only had five minutes left to say all that we wanted to
say, every telephone booth would be occupied by people calling other people
to stammer that they loved them.
 -- Christopher Morley


I would like to thank my parents, Ayn Rand and God. 
 -- illustrating the power of the serial comma


I said "no" to drugs, but they just wouldn't listen.


Check one:
  [ ] BANG
  [ ] whimper
 -- Bhob Stewart and T. S. Eliot, _The Realist_, 1962


Let me understand this. You had a perfectly good job where you got to hang
out with reasonably attractive nude women and a few idiots; then you left
that to work with a *lot* of idiots and *no* nude women? 
 -- Glen Appleby


"[He] is a sick human being. We shouldn't hate him, we shouldn't make fun
of him, we shouldn't treat him as a pariah or a net.idiot -- above all, we
shouldn't flame him. We should reach out to him as a brother, with love and
compassion, and operate on his brain."
 -- Gene Ward Smith


*snrch* Oh, bad Lioness. No doughnut. And we are too differently-abled to
attempt the flying fuck, anymore.
 -- Elise Matthesen


i like this about my being polyamorous, that no love is ever a mistake,
that maybe our paths were not close enough for comfort, is all. 
 -- piranha


Abigail is kind of like Unix manpages. Nearly worthless at first glance,
but solid gold after you have attained a certain level of knowledge.
 -- Steven Meritt in clpm


Where do these people come from? Is there an agency out there that reads
the Net and says "oops, not enough morons on this newsgroup" and then
assigns some slack-jawed inbred grit-eatin' stooge to gum up the works?
 -- Jim Cowling


what one does with one's feelings matters rather a lot more than just the
fact that one feels them.
 -- piranha


Sexism is a systematic abuse of power. So is racism. So are many other
isms. And it's possible to have more than one power dynamic at work.
Simplifying a model until it declares one set of people incapable of abuse
is, in my opinion, sloppy and dangerous. 
 -- Elise Matthesen


...if Josh *is* into Girl Scout uniforms, I don't really want to know.
 -- Rivka

I don't think they make those in my size :-)
 -- Josh

You just don't know where to shop, Josh. Do you want one in regular
materials, pvc, leather, or latex? 
 -- RJ


The hottest places in hell are reserved for those who, in a time of
great moral crisis, maintain their neutrality.
 -- Dante


The first artificial object in space was a steel plate used to cover a 
500-foot deep hole during a nuclear test. Its velocity, as recorded by
high-speed cameras, was six times higher than the Earth's escape speed.
(source: February/March 1992 issue of Air & Space magazine, p. 52)


All possibility of understanding is rooted in the ability to say no.
 -- Susan Sontag


I'd rather clean all the bathrooms in Grand Central Station with my 
tongue than spend one more minute with you.
 -- Weird Al Yankovic


I can't figure women out. They put on makeup for three hours. They wear
things that make them smaller. Things that make them bigger. Then they
meet a man and they want truth.
 -- Rodney Dangerfield


Imagination should be all in a day's work.
 -- Sigfried, of Roy and Siegfried 


Fat gives things flavor.
 -- Julia Childs 


Drama is very important in life: You have to come on with a bang. You never
want to go out with a whimper. Everything can have drama if it's done
right. Even a pancake.
 -- Julia Childs 


Avoid random motion.
 -- Andy Grove, chairman of Intel 


Not all problems have a technological answer, but when they do, that is the
more lasting solution. 
 -- Andy Grove, chairman of Intel


You have to pretend you're 100 percent sure. You have to take action; you
can't hesitate or hedge your bets. Anything less will condemn your efforts
to failure.
-- Andy Grove, chairman of Intel 


Assume any career moves you make won't go smoothly. They won't. But don't
look back. 
 -- Andy Grove, Intel chairman


If a guy hasn't got any gamble in him, he isn't worth a crap.
 -- Evel Knievel


In my lifetime, I bet you we killed thirty to forty million people. It's
dictators. It's religion. But we've got that stopped, I'm sure. I'd say the
atomic bomb stopped everybody short.
 -- J.R. Simplot


I don't give a goddamn: You get a wind blowing away from a dairy, you're
going to get some smell. 
 -- J.R. Simplot


You can't borrow money without collateral. You have to have something to
get started with. That's the problem: You got to have that taw. You shoot
marbles? You shoot that taw marble because you can knock the other marbles
out easier with it. Each man has his own taw, and if he gets good with that
taw, he can knock the hell out of some marbles. And he can win, but he has
to have strong fingers and the right aim. It's like anything else: You got
to work at it.
 -- J.R. Simplot 


When you stand alone and sell yourself, you can't please everyone. But when
you're different, you can last. 
 -- Don Rickles 


I've never walked off stage and said, "I shouldn't have done that." Because
when you do what I do, you're like a fighter. You throw the right hand and
say, "That's what got me to this dance." You can't have doubt. If you have
doubt, there's no show.
 -- Don Rickles 


I never had a set of rules. Every situation is different. 
 -- Red Auerbach


If you're keeping score, win.
 -- Red Auerbach


If it flies, floats, or fucks, rent it. 
 -- Conrad Dobler, football player 


Never tell your wife she's lousy in bed. She'll go out and get a second
opinion.
 -- Rodney Dangerfield 


I tell ya, it's lonely at the top when there's no one on the bottom.
 -- Rodney Dangerfield 


Failure is not an option. It comes bundled with your Microsoft product.


My only experience came when I was about 12 and confessed to Father
Feeny that I had broken into the hardware store. He told me to make
a novena, and I allowed as how I didn't know what that was, but if he
would draw up the plans, I knew where to get the lumber and nails. 
 -- Denaldo in alt.callahans


No trees were killed to make this message. However, several bushes were 
hospitalized to make the tagline.


The problem with defending the purity of the English language is that
English is about as pure as a cribhouse whore. We don't just borrow words;
on occasion, English has pursued other languages down alleyways to beat
them unconscious and rifle their pockets for new vocabulary.
 -- James Nicoll, rasseff

Not only that, instead of the money, it escapes with the pocket lint.
 -- Don Roberts


The American Society for Numerology monitored the use of all numbers
during this posting to insure humane, or at least ordinal, treatment.
No numbers were injured during this posting, though an occasional and
necessary roundoff may have occurred.
 -- Brett Doehr


You mean there's such a thing as a relationship where there _aren't_
problems? I've never seen one, much less been part of one, and if I did I
think I'd keep poking at it and looking for the mold lines in the plastic.
It just wouldn't seem real. Without conflict, how does a relationship grow?
 -- Rose (mathgoddess) in alt.poly


A loaf of bread, a jug of wine, a high-definition TV with a hi-fi DVD
player and a surround sound stereo, a full fridge, a microwave/convection
oven, a UNIX network, two phone lines, DSL, and thou.
 -- SJM


Anger is one of the sinews of the soul; he that wants it hath a maimed
mind.
 -- Thomas Fuller


Sociobiologists define fitness as number of one's genes that remain in the
gene pool following one's death. This was illustrated in a quote by J.B.S.
Haldane who quipped that he would willingly give up his life for two of his
children, 4 of his cousins, or 8 half-cousins.


A confusion of the real with the ideal never goes unpunished.
 -- Goethe


There is a vitality, a life force, a quickening that is translated through
you into action, and because there is only one of you in all time, this
expression is unique. And if you block it, it will never exist through any
other medium and (will) be lost....It is not your business to determine how
good it is; nor how valuable it is; nor how it compares with other
expressions....You do not even have to believe in yourself or your work.
You have to keep open and aware directly to the urges that motivate you.
 -- Martha Graham


If you can't be a good example, then you'll just have to be a horrible
warning.
 -- Catherine Aird


Polyamory is seen as a much greater evil than cheating. More simply put,
cheating breaks the rules of the game while polyamory denies the
universality of the game.
 -- RJ Johnson in alt.poly


"polyamorous (adj) (of a person) Having the inclination to form loving sexual
and/or romantic relationships with more than one person concurrently;
engaging in multiple concurrent such relationships with the consent of all
partners involved; (of a relationship) Including an agreement that one or
more partners may form other concurrent sexual and/or romantic relationships
with the consent of all partners involved.
 -- Liz W. in alt.poly, working on the OED definition


The world breaks everyone, and afterward, some are strong at the broken
places.
 -- Hemingway


I view a programming language as a place to be explored, like Disneyland.
You don't need to have a lot of preparation to explore a theme park. You do
have to go along with the crowd control measures, though. In a sense, each
ride has its own prerequisites -- if you cut in line, you risk getting
tossed out of the park. What we have here in this newsgroup is a failure in
crowd control. Reading the FAQ is like staying in line--it's something you
should learn in kindergarten. Usenet needs a better kindergarten.
 -- Larry Wall


This is no time to be making new enemies.
 -- Voltaire, on his deathbed, when asked to forsake the Devil


when i get to the end of my life i don't want to be saved, i want to be
spent. :^)
 -- songbird in alt.poly


A great deal of life consists of hurling ourselves into poorly-mapped
abysses. That's how things get _done_. We can try to choose our abysses
well, but there comes a time when we have to leap. Daily.
 -- Patrick Nielsen Hayden


 - Yeah, but Bill, you're a Marine, you can defend yourself.
 - We bleed. We die. Training only goes so far. When it comes down to that
violent clash of independent wills, even the most well trained can lose, so
much hangs by the chance of an instant. 
 -- Elise Matthesen and Bill Gawne in alt.poly


You'll meet heroes and villains, numbwits and geniuses, dullards and
visionaries, gentlefolk and jerks and everything in between. The most
important part is, don't take this Internet stuff too seriously. Always
try to maintain a sense of humor.
 -- Joseph "Doc" Thompson


Skin-tight leather pants are a bitch to put on while running. Especially if
you're being shot at. During a thunderstorm. Across a railway trestle.
While carrying a heavily-sedated ocelot. I mean, I've heard that.
 -- Chris Bridges


The society which scorns excellence in plumbing as a humble activity and
tolerates shoddiness in philosophy because it is an exalted activity will
have neither good plumbing nor good philosophy... neither its pipes nor
its theories will hold water.


And sometimes [being polyamorous] just means you have an overloaded Palm
Pilot, a staggering latex bill, and a sleep debt that won't be repaid for
several lifetimes.
 -- Maggie Young


We should take care not to make the intellect our god; it has... powerful
muscles, but no personality.
 -- Albert Einstein


* Regarding communication, who am I incomplete with?
* Regarding communications, in what ways am I incomplete?
* What is my payoff for being incomplete?
* What is the cost of being incomplete?
* From whom have I withheld communication?
* What statement, if it is delivered will make this communication complete?
* What do I fear will happen if I say it?
* Will I survive if I complete the communication?


i just realized i am possibly "self-medicating" by having influenced my
attitude to not sweat the small stuff but to consciously engage with the
world around me in many small, positive instances. 
 -- piranha, in a.p.


Abundance makes command relationships difficult to sustain and exchange
relationships an almost pointless game. In gift cultures, social status
is determined not by what you control but by what you give away.
 -- Eric S. Raymond, "Homesteading on the Noosphere"


furuike ya            old pond...
kawazu tobikomu       a frog leaps in
mizu no oto           water's sound 
 -- Matsuo Bassho


And I don't mean little, cute, charlotte-thinks-I'm-a-swell-pig spiders.
They ranged from "getting up stunned and scurrying away" size (I was using
rolled up Wizard mag) to "Oh my god, whose ugly child?" size. These aren't
normal spiders. One gave me the finger as it dashed behind the couch. And
they all have this psycho death wish. They drop from the ceiling onto my
keyboard, swing from bungee cords attached to their asses over my dining
room table, and sit in wait in my empty coffee cups. I cannot tell you how
revolting it is to pour a cup of java to find some eight-legger frantically
hand-signing, "Throw me a raft, dumbass."
 -- Tangletoy


There is a California state law that says "All employees of Apple Computer,
Inc., must take either the Myers-Briggs Personality Traits Battery or a
urine test." I pissed on the Myers-Briggs test.
 -- Mike Cappella


As captain, you have 100% authority and 100% responsibility. You need to 
make sure that you exercise 100% of that authority - or you'll end up
hanging by 100% of that responsibility.
 -- Gil, S/V "Myrtle V"


I refuse to buy in to the idea that the government decides the terms of
contracts surrounding my romantic entanglements. But we can cuddle. :)
 -- Mary MacTavish in a.p.


Four Stages of Acceptance:
1. This is worthless nonsense.
2. This is an interesting, but perverse, point of view.
3. This is true, but quite unimportant.
4. I always said so.
--J.B.S. Haldane


When was the last time you heard of an atheist car bombing an embassy
because he thought it would bring him closer to the void? When was the
last time you heard of an atheist murdering his entire family because
he *didn't* hear the voice of god talking in his head?
 -- JMS


Multiple open honest relationships where everyone involved knows about
everyone else involved; not cheating, not swinging.
 -- Carla's definition of poly, on alt.poly


People understand instinctively that the best way for computer programs
to communicate with each other is for each of the them to be strict
in what they emit, and liberal in what they accept. The odd thing is
that people themselves are not willing to be strict in how they speak,
and liberal in how they listen.
 -- Larry Wall, author of Perl


Be conservative in what you do, liberal in what you accept from others.
 -- "The Robustness Principle" (RFC 793 referring to TCP, but a widely-held
    philosophy in Internet standards.)


"No, I understand now," Auberon said, calm in the woods - it was so simple,
really. "I didn't, for a long time, but I do now. You just can't hold
people, you can't own them. I mean it's only natural, a natural process
really. Meet. Love. Part. Life goes on. There was never any reason to
expect her to stay always the same - I mean `in love,' you know." There
were those doubt-quotes of Smoky's, heavily indicated. "I don't hold a
grudge. I can't."
"You do," Grandfather Trout said. "And you don't understand."
 -- Little, Big, "John Crowley"


The human race likes to give itself airs. One good volcano can produce
more greenhouse gases in a year than the human race has in its entire
history.
 -- Ray Bradbury


The teacher comes when the soul calls - and thank goodness, for the ego
is never fully ready.
 -- Clarissa Pinkola Estes, "Women Who Run With the Wolves"


If you are what you do, then when you don't, you aren't.
 -- Wayne Dyer


if i really am angry, i go for a walk to work off the adrenaline, because i
don't see any reason to unload the initial rage with possibly careless
words onto somebody i love -- _even_ if that person is the cause of the
anger. i don't see any value in that; it will only create a larger hurdle
before we can get to the core of the matter. i don't _want_ to strike out
(verbally) at somebody i love. i have had too much first-hand experience at
what sort of scars that can leave. 
 -- piranha in alt.poly


In my universe, people often suffer because of stupid things they've done.
But at least I have the human decency not to tell them that it's proof that
there is a loving god.
 -- Kevin J. Maroney


Anything's possible, but only a few things actually happen.


We have strange and wonderful relationship. You're strange and I'm
wonderful.


People generally quarrel because they cannot argue.
 -- Gilbert K. Chesterton


Tabi ni yande                   On a journey, ailing -
Yume wa kareno o                My dreams roam about
Kakemeguru                      Over a withered moor. 
 -- Bassho's last poem


Microsoft is not the Borg collective - the Borg collective has proper
networking.


"I think when my litter was being taught these skills, I was back in the
den dismembering a vole." --jon carroll, sfgate, 12.07.00


"ABCD Goldfish?"
"LMNO Goldfish!"
"OSAR! ICM!" 
 -- anon.


Breaking the manipulation was great - I let go at my anger at others,
because they didn't have power over me any more. I let go my anger at
myself, because I realized I wasn't "weak" or "spineless", I just was
missing some basic concepts.
 -- Dave ("Toallas N. Rollo") in a.p.


I had poor boundaries. I didn't have a clear idea of what was my property,
my responsibility and what wasn't. So I wound up with other people's
responsibilities, and other people wound up with my property. 
 -- Dave ("Toallas N. Rollo") in a.p.


Honor: Do what you say. Say what you mean. Mean what you do.


This morning, I distinctly heard my Rice Krispies say Snap, Crackle, Fuck
You.
 -- George Carlin


Any sufficiently immature humor is indistinguishable from cluelessness.
 -- SFJ


Once you've participated in enough hostile discussions about the obvious
gun-nut Nazi faggot libertarian abortionist sub-contexts in Robert
Heinlein's work (and how they relate to the text-editor and operating
system he used), it gets a little old.
 -- Bearpaw, in a.p.


"Quemadmodum gladius neminem occidit, occidentis telum est." 
("A sword is never a killer, it's a tool in the killer's hands.")
 -- Lucius Annaeus Seneca "the Younger" (c. 30 A.D.)


The trick is in what one emphasizes... We either make ourselves
miserable, or we make ourselves strong. The amount of work is the same.
 -- Carlos Castaneda


Then and there I invented this rule for myself to be applied to every
decision I might have to make in the future. I would sort out all the
arguments and see which belonged to fear and which to creativeness,
and other things being equal I would make the decision which had the
larger number of creative reasons on its side. I think it must be a
rule something like this that makes jonquils and crocuses come pushing
through the cold mud.
 -- Katherine Butler Hathaway


I was taught that [...] blaming others was the worst sin of all. (What
makes it the worst sin is how easily and often it can be committed; each
turn of that sharp of self-deception wears down the cog, thus that sin
becomes easier to commit through time.)
 -- LK, in a.p.


"C'mon, it's just like making love. Y'know, left, down, rotate sixty-two
degrees, engage rotors...." 
 -- Bender


I prefer rogues to imbeciles because they sometimes take a rest.
 -- Alexandre Dumas the younger (1824-1895)


I think the ability to resist being manipulated is less important than the
ability to recognize manipulation and leave relationships where "too much"
manipulation occurs. 
 -- Aahz in a.p.


...Some of [these questions] can be partially answered without actually
rolling the other person onto a flat surface and running reality
experimentally. 
 -- Heather Ann Nicoll, a.p.


If you don't learn your lesson the first time, the universe will kindly
teach it to you again. Harder.


We cannot leave our inner islands until we have slain our inner Gilligans.


Work like you don't need the money 
Love like you've never been hurt
Dance like no one's watching


Fantasy, abandoned by reason, produces impossible monsters; united with
it, she is the mother of the arts and the origin of marvels.
 -- Goya


My "birth religion" - lip-service Jewish - didn't stick: the hypocrisy molecule
didn't bind properly, which prevented adhesion and promoted dissension.
 -- me, in e-mail


Crotels of a Hare, the Friants of a Boar, the Spraints of an Otter, the
Werderobe of a Badger, the Waggying of a Fox, the Fumets of a Deer
 -- names for shit in the Middle Ages


It has long been an article of our folklore that too much knowledge or
skill, or especially consummate expertise, is a bad thing. It dehumanizes
those who achieve it, and makes difficult their commerce with just
plain folks, in whom good old common sense has not been obliterated by
mere book learning or fancy notions. This popular delusion flourishes
now more than ever, for we are all infected with it in the schools,
where educationists have elevated it from folklore to Article of
Belief. It enhances their self-esteem and lightens their labors by
providing theoretical justification for deciding that appreciation, or
even simple awareness, is more to be prized than knowledge, and relating
(to self and others), more than skill, in which minimum competence will
be quite enough.
 -- The Underground Grammarian


... so long as the people do not care to exercise their freedom, those
who wish to tyrranize will do so; for tyrants are active and ardent,
and will devote themselves in the name of any number of gods, religious
and otherwise, to put shackles upon sleeping men.
 -- Voltarine de Cleyre


When you are doing the right thing, time and patience are your allies.
 -- RJ Johnson in alt.poly


History shows that the human mind, fed by constant accessions of
knowledge, periodically grows too large for its theoretical coverings,
and bursts them asunder to appear in new habiliments, as the feeding
and growing grub, at intervals, casts its too narrow skin and assumes
another... Truly the imago state of Man seems to be terribly distant,
but every moult is a step gained.
 -- Charles Darwin, from "Origin of the Species"


A man either lives life as it happens to him, meets it head-on and licks
it, or he turns his back on it and starts to wither away. 
 -- Dr. Boyce, "The Menagerie" ("The Cage"), stardate unknown


"Shit's warm."
 -- Kathy Boniface, via Dawn Boniface


"The heroic hours of life do not announce their presence by drum and trumpet,
challenging us to be true to ourselves by appeals to the martial spirit that
keeps the blood at heat. Some little, unassuming, unobtrusive choice presents
itself before us slyly and craftily, glib and insinuating, in the modest garb
of innocence. To yield to its blandishments is so easy. The wrong, it seems,
is venial... Then it is that you will be summoned to show the courage of
adventurous youth."
 -- Benjamin Cardozo


If I had only known, I would have been a locksmith.
 -- Albert Einstein


Mathematics deals exclusively with the relations of concepts
to each other without consideration of their relation to experience.
 -- Albert Einstein


"Obviously, a major malfunction has occurred."
 -- Steve Nesbitt, voice of Mission Control, January 28, 1986, as the 
shuttle Challenger exploded within view of the grandstands.


Pound for pound, the amoeba is the most vicious animal on earth.


The explanation requiring the fewest assumptions is the most likely to be
correct.
 -- William of Occam


Experience varies directly with equipment ruined.


Experiments must be reproducible; they should all fail in the same way.


Entropy requires no maintenance.
 -- Markoff Chaney


Seems there's a savage tribe that worships the number zero.
Is nothing sacred?


Did you hear that two rabbits escaped from the zoo and so far they have
only recaptured 116 of them?


The tree of research must from time to time be refreshed with the blood
of bean counters.
 -- Alan Kay


Chemist who falls in acid is absorbed in work.
Chemist who falls in acid will be tripping for weeks.


UFOs are for real: the Air Force doesn't exist.


You know you've landed gear-up when it takes full power to taxi.


Nothing will ever be attempted if all possible objections must be first
overcome.
 -- Dr. Samuel Johnson


to be nobody but yourself in a world
which is doing its best night and day
to make you like everybody else
means to fight the hardest battle
any human being can fight and
never stop fighting.
 -- e.e. cummings


Freedom means two things: Freedom to and equally as important,
freedom from.
 -- Thomas Jefferson


"I hold a mouse's heart not worth a leek
That has but one hole into which to run,
And if it fail of that, then all is done."
 -- Chaucer, "The Wife of Bath's Prologue"


...most of them don't even know what atheism is. It's not a negation 
of anything. You don't have to negate what no one can prove exists. No,
atheism is a very positive affirmation of man's ability to think for
himself, to do for himself, to find answers to his own problems. 
 -- Madalyn Murray, Playboy interview 10/1965


"You've got to let the pain and the anger motivate you - make you
stronger!"
 -- Yancy the Drunk Asshole


Sim shook his head.
"We'll have to unshackle the buoy and haul the vessel back out on the slip
to clear her, skipper," he said sadly. 
Half an hour earlier I would have thought those were the sweetest words I
had ever heard. Not now. It may have been shame, rage, or perhaps something
more profound; something that even the most timid sailor may occasionally
be privileged to feel: the realization that no seafaring man ever really
masters his fear - he only learns to live with it.
"I'll be goddamned if I will!" I cried and, stripping off my clothes, I
took my sheath knife in my teeth and plunged overboard.
 -- Farley Mowat, "The Boat Who Wouldn't Float"


"He's mad that trusts in the tameness of a wolf, a horse's health,
a boy's love, or a whore's oath."
 -- William Shakespeare, "King Lear"


"Friends are God's apology to us for our families."


"He believed merely in fair play and square-dealing. Petty meanness,
in his code, was almost as serious as wanton homicide, and I am sure
that he respected a murderer more than a man given to small practices."
 -- Jack London, "The Heathen"


"...the last half of the '80s seems destined to produce another
generation of criminals like the one that got caught on the 
cusp of the '60s, when the Jell-O-conformity of the Eisenhower
Era finally created so many socioeconomic rejects that it 
eventually became fashionable to be one..."
 -- Hunter S. Thompson, "Generation of Swine"


My adversaries... applied the one means that wins the easiest 
victory over reason: terror and force.
 -- Adolph Hitler, "Mein Kampf"


Lie, cheat, kill, go to church on Sundays... do whatever makes you
feel alive.


``No one had ever told her, and she had not yet discovered, that when
one has to ask "Am I really in love?" the answer is always "No."''
 -- Arthur C. Clarke, "The Road to the Sea"


"The Earth is the cradle of the mind - but you cannot stay in the
cradle forever."
 -- Konstantin Tsiolkovsky, father of Russian space science


"We should not be crippled by the knowledge that no one of us can know
what all of us together know."
 -- The Shockwave Rider, John Brunner


"Linux is a danger to Microsoft precisely because it is decentralized.
There isn't one company that you can buy or put out of business, so
the usual Microsoft tactics do not work against Linux."
 -- Alexandre Julliard, WINE project head


"We spend our time sending messages to each other, talking and trying to listen
at the same time, exchanging information. This seems to be our most urgent
biological function; it is what we do with our lives."
 -- Lewis Thomas, "The Lives of a Cell"


If you wish to be happy for one hour, get drunk. If you wish to be happy
for three days, get married. If you wish to be happy for a month, kill
your pig and eat it. If you wish to be happy forever, learn to fish.
 -- Chinese Proverb


A piece of telco software had been written in C language, a standard
language of the telco field. Within the C software was a long "do. .
.while" construct. The "do. . .while" construct contained a "switch"
statement. The "switch" statement contained an "if" clause. The "if"
clause contained a "break." The "break" was SUPPOSED to "break" the
"if" clause. Instead, the "break" broke the "switch" statement.
 -- Bruce Sterling on the 1/15/90 AT&T SysCrash, "Hacker Crackdown"


...the faults in bad software can be so subtle as to be practically
theological.
 -- Bruce Sterling, "Hacker Crackdown"


``The words "community" and "communication" have the same root.
Wherever you put a communications network, you put a community as
well. And whenever you TAKE AWAY that network -- confiscate it, outlaw
it, crash it, raise its price beyond affordability -- then you hurt that
community.

Communities will fight to defend themselves. People will fight harder
and more bitterly to defend their communities, than they will fight
to defend their own individual selves.''
 -- Bruce Sterling, "Hacker Crackdown"


"I went into the business for the money, and the art grew out of it. If
people are disillusioned by that remark, I can't help it. It's the truth."
 -- Charlie Chaplin


"WARNING: I am a writer. Whatever you say to me will very likely become
fiction and/or pornography."
 -- .sig of Nick Maack


"My life closed twice before its close;  So huge, so hopeless to conceive,
It yet remains to see                    As these that twice befell.
If Immortality unveil                    Parting is all we know of heaven,
A third event to me.                     And all we need of hell."
 -- Emily Dickinson, ``Parting''


"On two occasions I have been asked [by members of Parliament],
'Pray, Mr. Babbage, if you put into the machine wrong figures, will
the right answers come out?' I am not able rightly to apprehend the
kind of confusion of ideas that could provoke such a question."
 -- Charles Babbage


"Life should be lived so vividly and so intensely that thoughts of another
life, or of a longer life, are not necessary." 
 -- Marjory Stoneman Douglas, Florida environmentalist (1892-1998)


"In my mind, Microsoft is the illegal operation and the DOJ is guilty
of general protection faults [for] not protecting the public in general."
 -- Bill Bennett, in the Linux Gazette


"God, Root - what's the difference?"


 * * * Linux... Don't fear the penguins * * * 


Hi, I'm a deadly e-mail virus,  :: Bonjour, je suis un dangereux virus. 
please copy me into your .sig   :: SVP copiez-moi dans votre fichier 
file to help me spread.         :: .sig pour m'aider a me propager.


You can have a dog as a friend. You can have whiskey as a friend. But if
you have a woman as a friend, you're going to wind up drunk and kissing
your dog.
 -- foolin' around


We cannot simultaneously set a boundary and take care of another
person's feelings. It's impossible; the two acts contradict.
 -- Melody Beattie, "The language of letting go"


Anxiety gives power to the problem, not the solution. It does
not help to harbor turmoil. *It does not help.*
 -- Melody Beattie, "The Language of Letting Go"


Any sufficiently advanced Operating System is indistinguishable 
from Linux.
 -- James "The Answer Guy" Dennis, in LG


Oh My God! They Killed init! You Bastards! 


Your mouse has moved. Windows must be restarted for the change to 
take effect. Reboot now? [ OK ] 


If Bill Gates had a nickel for every time Windows crashed... Oh 
wait, he does.


Dear answer.guy.jim: 
I'm not at all sure this is how one sends questions for the "Answer 
Guy" column, so if I'm guessing wrong, please let me know how I should 
do this before piping my message to /dev/rtfm. 
 -- "DrDave" in LG


Never tell people how to do things. Tell them WHAT to do and they 
will surprise you with their ingenuity. 
 -- Gen. George S. Patton, Jr.


The simplicity of Macs and Windows can largely be summed up as: 
"If you don't see a menu option, button or dialog for it -- you 
probably can't do it."
 -- Jim Dennis, "The Answer Guy" at the Linux Gazette


If everyone has an angle, why are most of them so obtuse?


UNIX _is_ user friendly. It's just selective about who its friends are.


The Messiah will come. There will be a resurrection of the dead -- all
the things that Jews believed in before they got so damn sophisticated.
 -- Rabbi Meir Kahane


"I honestly believe that the doctrine of hell was born in the glittering
eyes of snakes that run in frightful coils watching for their prey. I
believe it was born with the yelping, howling, growling and snarling of
wild beasts... I despise it, I defy it, and I hate it."
 -- Robert G. Ingersoll


What do I consider a reasonable person to be? I'd say a reasonable person
is one who accepts that we are all human and therefore fallible, and takes
that into account when dealing with others. Implicit in this definition is
the belief that it is the right and the responsibility of each person to
live his or her own life as he or she sees fit, to respect this right in
others, and to demand the assumption of this responsibility by others.


Why I am an atheist:
1. Atheists do not believe in higher powers.
2. God is the highest power.
3. Therefore, God must be an atheist.
4. We should all strive to be like God.
5. We should all be atheists.


Any resemblance between the above views and those of any other 
person, my terminal, or the view out of the nearest porthole are 
purely coincidental. Any resemblance between the above and my 
own views is non-deterministic. The question of the existence of 
views in the absence of anyone to hold them is left as an exercise 
for the reader. The question of the existence of the reader is 
left as an exercise for the second god coefficient. (A discussion 
of non-orthogonal, non-integral polytheism is beyond the scope of 
this article.)


How I'm rushing through this! How much each sentence in this
brief story contains. "The stars are made of the same atoms
as the earth." I usually pick one small topic like this to
give a lecture on. Poets say science takes away from the 
beauty of the stars - mere globs of atoms. Nothing is "mere".
I too can see the stars on a desert night, and feel them. 
But do I see less or more? The vastness of the heavens stretches
my imagination - stuck on this carousel my little eye can catch
one-million-year-old light. A vast pattern - of which I am a
part - perhaps my stuff was belched from some forgotten star, 
as one is belching there. Or see them with the greater eye of
Palomar, rushing all apart from some common starting point 
when they were perhaps all together. What is the pattern, or
the meaning, or the /why?/ It does not do harm to the mystery
to know a little about it. For far more marvelous is the truth
than any artists of the past imagined! Why do the poets of the 
present not speak of it? What men are poets who can speak of 
Jupiter if he were like a man, but if he is an immense 
spinning sphere of methane and ammonia must be silent?
 -- Richard P. Feynman, a footnote in "Six Easy Pieces"


 - "So what's Armitage got dissolving inside you?"
 - "I'm an easy make." She smiled. "Anybody any good at what they
do, that's what they _are,_ right? You gotta jack, I gotta 
tussle."
 -- William Gibson, "Neuromancer"


"Let us go whither the omens of the gods and the iniquity of our 
enemies call up. The die is cast."
 -- Caesar, at the Rubicon


You'll hear a voice saying that 'you don't deserve forgiveness.'
'Deserve' got nothing to do with it, do it *anyway*, that's what 
unconditional means. Because you *have* to, to get that monkey 
off your back.
 -- Leslie, in a.c.


"Grant yourself unconditional amnesty. Come in from the cold,
and every time your internal judge tries to pronounce you
guilty forevermore, spit in his eye, and refuse delivery on that
poisonous package."
 -- Leslie, in a.c.


Everything I needed to know in life, I learned in kindergarten. Like: the 
abilities to see love, and beauty, and to achieve great understanding of 
people's thoughts and feelings are of limited value when you're a complete 
fucking loony.
 -- John Palmer, being bitter, in a.c.


With women, I've got a long bamboo pole with a leather loop on the 
end of it. I slip the loop around their necks so they can't get 
away or come too close. Like catching snakes.
 -- Marlon Brando


Fuck more.
Write more. 
Be safe in your fucking.
Take risks in your writing.


"The moment he read it, he was done for. He had always had a helpless
habit of falling for women through their writing."
 -- Dan Y. <dany@irvine.com>, the Eros Workshop


Always remember that you are unique. Just like everyone else.


"It seems that the project of self-emancipation must begin, at least, with
acts of repudiation, with saying, "This I do not like, this is bad, this I
reject." The see-er begins as a rebel, a destroyer. The experience may be
compared to a housecleaning, when painful decisions must be made as to
what is rubbish and what is not. It may also be likened to an internal
civil war, in whose aftermath a successful reconstruction is uncertain.
This necessary destructive beginning is difficult to do well; it takes
clear, hard thinking, as well as strength of will."
 -- Thomas S. Vernon


Society everywhere is in conspiracy against the manhood of every one of
its members.
 -- Ralph Waldo Emerson


"You don't need a marriage license to live with someone, to have the 
security of a home, to rear any number of children, to have years
of companionship; that's not illegal, but the moment you want to screw
somebody, you have to get a license from the state to use your genital
organs -- or run the risk of being charged with any number of crimes
carrying sentences up to and including death."
 -- Madalyn Murray, `Playboy' interview


"Money is how people with no talent keep score;
Control is how others with no money keep score."
 -- Michael S. Hart, Project Gutenberg


"What was the difference? Why could Steve, for example, stop giving 
the free Tai Chi classes and turn to writing books with Larry Niven;
easily, no regrets, no hangups, no...

Wait a minute. What _implied_ process was I describing here? Not
the overt "Decided to, went ahead and did it" stuff; what were the
assumptions that led me to believe that Steve _should_ have had
difficulties or regrets?

As I stood there, and ran down the list, I felt a little door open
in my brain; a little reservoir of information that had been there
all along, but would not empty. 

"Permissions." That was the answer. Steve and Casey gave themselves
their _own_ permissions; they did not look to doctors, teachers, 
policemen, society, government, God, or Devil for authority. No one 
else's permission was needed - or wanted."
 -- Me, in an e-mail to Joylene


"There was no rational reason - NONE - for obeying anything other than
the dictates of my own mind. As long as I dealt with other people,
antisocial behavior of any sort would be punished according to its
degree. If I killed somebody, unless I got away with it, I would 
die. If I cheated someone, I would be putting out a signal that I
was willing to be dealt with in that manner... and would be. If
I lied, I would be forfeiting my reality to someone else's wants.
No matter what, I would be paid back in the coin in which I paid
out."
 -- Me, in an e-mail to Joylene


"I was posting to NGs _long_ before I thought of the security issue... 
and you, or anyone else, is welcome to look at anything I've ever posted 
anywhere; I am not ashamed of a single thing that I've said. Not to imply 
that I haven't said, or done stupid stuff; just that it came from the 
person that I was at the time, and if I decided that what I said
didn't suit me, I changed who I was until I didn't do that anymore. 
Self-improvement at the first level."
 -- Me, in an e-mail to Joylene


"I need a couple of weeks on a deserted cay somewhere,
and my understanding JoJo by my side... Strike and erase. Someone
understanding by my side. 'Taint that restrictive; I love you lots,
but problem resolution never depends on any person but the one 
having the problem; it just would be good to have someone I trust
with me."
 -- Me, in an e-mail to Joylene


You can wash the head of a jackass but you're wasting time and soap.
 -- Yiddishe folk wisdom


"...If I didn't want to hear it, I wouldn't have brought it up.
`You always say what you need to hear'; and this is yet another 
chance for me to say to my subconscious: "Yes, it really _is_ 
over. Hear it, buy it, own it, get rid of it."
 -- Me, in e-mail


"_Feel_ the pain; _own_ it, make it yours - that which you own, 
you control; _forgive_ the person that caused it - not because 
it's OK to cause you pain, your forgiveness is not an OK signal 
to them - you forgive them so that *you* can go on with your life; 
and, last of all, _dismiss_ it.

The key here is this: you have two choices in regard to pain -
you can deal with it, or you can hold on to it. No third option
exists."
 -- Me, in e-mail


"You may educate your conscience to choose the right before
the wrong, but, remember, an educated conscience does
not always save a man from being a fool now and then.
He needs an educated brain sometimes by which to save his soul.
Meantime, settle with your conscience, if you owe it anything.
It is a troublesome creditor."
 -- Margaret McCarter, "A Master's Degree"


"The neurotic who learns to laugh at himself may be on the
way to self-management, perhaps to cure."
 -- Gordon W. Allport, "The Individual and His Religion"


He who has a `why' to live for can bear almost any `how'.
 -- Friedrich Nietzsche


"Was mich nicht umbringt, macht mich stärker."
("That which does not kill me, makes me stronger.")
 -- Friedrich Nietzsche


Now, my co-mates and brothers in exile,
Hath not old custom made this life more sweet
Than that of painted pomp? Are not these woods
More free from peril than the envious court?
Here feel we but the penalty of Adam,
The seasons' difference, as the icy fang
And churlish chiding of the winter's wind,
Which, when it bites and blows upon my body,
Even till I shrink with cold, I smile and say
'This is no flattery: these are counsellors
That feelingly persuade me what I am.'
Sweet are the uses of adversity,
Which, like the toad, ugly and venomous,
Wears yet a precious jewel in his head;
And this our life exempt from public haunt
Finds tongues in trees, books in the running brooks,
Sermons in stones and good in every thing.
I would not change it.
 -- William Shakespeare, `As you like it'


"If one intrudes on the Heavens when they are balancing their
volt-accounts; if one disturbs the High Gods' market rates by
hurling steel hulls across tremblingly adjusted electric
tensions, one must not complain of any rudeness in the reception."
 --Rudyard Kipling, "With the Night Mail"


"You can rub my head until I turn 180 years old and I'm not going to have
an orgasm." 
 -- Betty Dodson (countering ``The biggest sex organ is between the ears'')


The French, they are a funny race, 
They fight with their feet 
And they fuck with their face.


Knowledge is power. Power corrupts. Study hard. Be evil.


"Not easy, sure. Not 100% successful, sure. But assuming that 'Not
easy' = 'impossible' and that 'Not 100%' = 0% is just silly."
 -- John Vinson in a.c.


A man unable to recognize and come to terms, on a level much more 
personal and direct than a politically correct, guilty acknowledgement 
of collective male misdeeds, with his own aggressive and destructive 
impulses, with his capacity for wildness will be unable to access and 
use his deepest, most instinctual masculinity for fear of it getting 
out of control. Beset by guilt, fear, and shame, he dares not venture 
out into the world or down into the dark wilderness of his own soul, 
but shuts himself up, safely impotent and lifeless, within the walls he 
erects around himself.
 -- Jim Moyers, "From Wildman to King: Another Look at Male Myth 
    and Initiation"


"When I was a boy, our Nintendo
Was carved from an old apple tree;
We used garden hose to connect it
To our steam-powered color TV
But it still beat that ancient Atari
'Cause I nearly went blind, don't ya know
Playin' Breakout and Pong on a video game
Hooked up to the radio!

And we walked twenty miles to the schoolhouse
Barefoot, uphill both ways
Through blizzards in summer and winter
Back in the good old days.
Back when FORTRAN was not even THREE-TRAN
And a PC was barely a toy
And we did our computing by gaslight
Back when I.....was a boy!"
 -- Excerpt from "When I Was a Boy" (C)1997 by Frank Hayes


Act well your part, for there all the honor lies.


"What are the thoughts of the canvas on which a masterpiece is 
being painted? `I am being soiled, brutally treated and concealed 
from view.' Thus men grumble at their destiny, however fair."
 --Jean Cocteau


 "You're opinionated!"
Well, gosh, Sherlock, that's awfully observant. What's your point?
I have bad news for you, kiddo: In this cruel and confusing world,
identifying who's "opinionated" helps you not at all in
determining who's correct. Deal with it.

 "You're not showing respect for my views!"
And your point is...?
The underlying assumption is that everyone must "respect everyone
else's views". Wrong. Each featherless biped is entitled to decide
that anyone else's views are without merit, and might also elect
to state this position along with reasons for thinking so. Don't
like it? Better luck next universe.

This isn't the same as being rude. If that's what you mean,
convince me. If any rudeness of mine seems unwarranted, I'll be
grateful for the feedback, and try not to repeat the behaviour.
 -- Rick Moen, rick@linuxmafia.com


"Past Tense -- the point at which you quit gritting your teeth
and start baring them instead."
 -- BC


"The fastest way to succeed is to double your failure rate."
 -- Thomas J. Watson Sr., founder of IBM


"We shape tools and they in turn shape us."
 -- Marshall McLuhan


"Under a proper social system, a private individual is legally free 
to take any action he pleases (so long as he does not violate the
rights of others), while a government official is bound by law in 
his every official act. A private individual may do anything except 
that which is legally forbidden; a government official may do nothing 
except that which is legally permitted."
 -- Ayn Rand, Objectivist Newsletter, December 1963


"Once, a heckler demanded: 'Who the hell are you to talk about America?
You're a foreigner!' Calmly, she answered: 'That's right. I _chose_ 
to be an American. What did _you_ do, besides having been born?' 
The crowd laughed and applauded -- and the heckler was silent."
 -- Barbara Branden, "The Passion of Ayn Rand", pg. 161.


"If you ask me to name the proudest distinction of Americans, I would 
choose - because it contains all the others - the fact that they were 
the people who created the phrase `to make money.' No other language 
or nation had ever used these words before; men had always thought of 
wealth as a static quantity - to be seized, begged, inherited, shared, 
looted or obtained as a favor. Americans were the first to understand 
that wealth has to be created. The words `to make money' hold the 
essence of human morality."
 -- Ayn Rand, "Atlas Shrugged"


Everything I needed to know in life, I learned in kindergarten. Like: 
we only truly die when we run out of love. Strangely, though, giving 
love replenishes our supply as much or more than accepting it does.
 -- John Palmer in a.c.


An infallible method of conciliating a tiger is to allow oneself to be
devoured.
 -- Konrad Adenauer


                                       _
                                      | |
                                     /| ||\
                                    / | || \
                                   /  | ||  \
                                  /   | ||   \
                                 /    | ||    \
                                /     | ||     \
                               /      | ||      \
             H                /       | ||       \
            /H               /        | ||        \
           / H              /         | ||         \
          /  H             /          | ||          \
         /   H            /,  ,  ,  , | ||           \
        /    H           /            | ||            \
       /     H          /             | ||             \
      /      H         /,  ,  ,  ,  , | ||              \
     /       H        /               | ||               \
    /, , , , H       /                | ||                \
   /         H      /                 | ||                 \
  /          H     ===================| ||                  \
 ============H      c========o        | ||_ o/_______________\
    _________H_      | |_____\\       | |  `O                 Q
  [|    __     \_____|_________\______|_|__/_\___________oo_=====
  [|   (__)          __      __     __                     /
  [| Ulysses        (__)    (__)   (__)                   /
  [|                                                     /
~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~


"All over the place, from the popular culture to the propaganda system, there 
is constant pressure to make people feel that they are helpless, that the only 
role they can have is to ratify decisions and to consume."
 -- Noam Chomsky


We drove to the hotel and said goodbye. How hypocritical to go upstairs
with a man you don't want to fuck, leave the one you do sitting there alone,
and then, in a state of great excitement, fuck the one you don't want to
fuck while pretending he's the one you do. That's called fidelity. That's
called civilization and its discontents.
 -- Erica Jong, "Fear of Flying"


...Of course a typical document database has thousands of keywords and
accordingly thousands of dimensions, but the arithmetics involved in 
multi-dimensional distances do not matter much to modern computers, and 
if they bother you, you just have to smoke something illegal and matters 
will rapidly become clear. If only till the next morning. 
 -- Hans Paijmans <paai@kub.nl>, "Indexing texts with SMART", LinuxGazette


The only people for me are the mad ones -- the ones who are mad to live,
mad to talk, mad to be saved, desirous of everything at the same time,
the ones who never yawn or say a commonplace thing, but burn, burn, burn
like fabulous yellow Roman candles.
 -- Jack Kerouac, "On the Road"


    \|/ ____ \|/
    "@'/ ,. \`@"
    /_| \__/ |_\ 
       \__U_/ 


"I'm dying," he croaked.
"My experiment was a success," the chemist retorted.
"You can't really train a beagle," he dogmatized.
"That's no beagle, it's a mongrel," she muttered.
"The fire is going out," he bellowed.
"Bad marksmanship," the hunter groused.
"You ought to see a psychiatrist," he reminded me.
"You snake," she rattled.
"Someone's at the door," she chimed.
"Company's coming," she guessed.
"Dawn came too soon," she mourned.
"I think I'll end it all," Sue sighed.
"I ordered chocolate, not vanilla," I screamed.
"Your embroidery is sloppy," she needled cruelly.
"Where did you get this meat?" he bridled hoarsely.
  -- Gyles Brandreth, "The Joy of Lex"


We are the Network of Borg. You will be interconnected. Resistance, if
less than one ohm, is futile.
 -- somebody in alt.callahans


They are fools that think that wealth or women or strong drink or even
drugs can buy the most in effort out of the soul of a man. These things offer
pale pleasures compared to that which is greatest of them all, that task which
demands from him more than his utmost strength, that absorbs him, bone and
sinew and brain and hope and fear and dreams -- and still calls for more.

They are fools that think otherwise. No great effort was ever bought.
No painting, no music, no poem, no cathedral in stone, no church, no state was
ever raised into being for payment of any kind. No Parthenon, no Thermopylae
was ever built or fought for pay or glory; no Bukhara sacked, or China ground
beneath Mongol heel, for loot or power alone. The payment for doing these
things was itself the doing of them.

To wield oneself -- to use oneself as a tool in one's own hand -- and
so to make or break that which no one else can build or ruin -- THAT is the
greatest pleasure known to man! To one who has felt the chisel in his hand
and set free the angel prisoned in the marble block, or to one who has felt
sword in hand and set homeless the soul that a moment before lived in the body
of his mortal enemy -- to those both come alike the taste of that rare food
spread only for demons or for gods.
 -- Gordon R. Dickson, "Soldier Ask Not"


There's a trick to the Graceful Exit. It begins with the vision to
recognize when a job, a life stage, a relationship is over -- and to let
go. It means leaving what's over without denying its validity or its
past importance in our lives. It involves a sense of future, a belief
that every exit line is an entry, that we are moving on, rather than out.
The trick of retiring well may be the trick of living well. It's hard to
recognize that life isn't a holding action, but a process. It's hard to
learn that we don't leave the best parts of ourselves behind, back in the
dugout or the office. We own what we learned back there. The experiences
and the growth are grafted onto our lives. And when we exit, we can take
ourselves along -- quite gracefully.
 -- Ellen Goodman


"The only thing we have to fear is fear itself - nameless,
unreasoning, unjustified terror which paralyzes needed efforts to
convert retreat into advance."
 -- FDR - First Inaugural Address, March 4, 1933


"Fear - jealousy - money - revenge - and protecting someone you love."
 -- Frederick Knott (Max Halliday) listing the five major motives
    in "Dial M for Murder" (1952)


"Men fear death as children fear to go in the dark."
 -- Francis Bacon


"The oldest and strongest emotion of mankind is fear."
 -- H.P. Lovecraft


"I must not fear. Fear is the mind-killer. Fear is the little death
that brings total obliteration. I will face my fear. I will permit it
to pass over me and through me. And when it has gone past I will turn
the inner eye to see its path. Where the fear has gone there will be
nothing. Only I will remain."
 -- Frank Herbert, Dune - Bene Gesserit Litany Against Fear


"I have almost forgot the taste of fears.
The time has been my senses would have cool'd
To hear a night shriek, and my fell of hair
Would at a dismal treatise rouse and stir
As life were in't. I have supp'd full with horrors;
Direness, familiar to my slaughterous thoughts,
Cannot once start me."
 -- William Shakespeare - "Macbeth"


"There isn't a lot left. But when you get to this stage, what's left
can seem more important because that's all there is on the table."
 -- A US official in the Madeleine Albright entourage, commenting
    on the Israel/Palestinian peace talks.


"In Germany they first came for the Communists, and I didn't speak up
because I wasn't a Communist. Then they came for the Jews, and I didn't
speak up because I wasn't a Jew. Then they came for the trade unionists,
and I didn't speak up because I wasn't a trade unionist. Then they came
for the Catholics, and I didn't speak up because I was a Protestant.
Then they came for me - and by that time no one was left to speak up."
 -- Pastor Martin Niemoller


"When they took the 4th Amendment, I was silent because I didn't deal
drugs. When they took the 6th Amendment, I was silent because I am innocent.
When they took the 2nd Amendment, I was silent because I don't own a gun.
Now they have taken the 1st Amendment, and I can only be silent." 
 -- Lyle Myhr


"Wisdom does not give you all the answers; it just redefines the questions."
 -- Dave Duncan


"When they kick out your front door,
How are you gonna come?
With your hands upon your head,
Or on the trigger of your gun?"
 -- The Clash, "Guns of Brixton", 'London Calling', 1979


We shall prove ourselves once again able to defend our island
home, to ride out the storm of war, and to outlive the menace of
tyranny, if necessary for years, if necessary alone... Even
though large tracts of Europe and many old and famous states have
fallen or may fall into the grip of the Gestapo and all the
odious apparatus of the Nazi rule, we shall fight in France, we
shall fight on the seas and oceans, we shall fight with growing
confidence and growing strength in the air, we shall defend our
island, whatever the cost may be, we shall fight on the beaches,
we shall fight on the landing grounds, we shall fight in the
fields and in the street, we shall fight in the hills; we shall
never surrender, and even if, which I do not for a moment believe,
this island or a large part of it were subjugated and starving,
then our Empire beyond the seas, armed and guarded by the British 
fleet, would carry on the struggle, until, in God's good time, the 
New World, with all its power and might, steps forth to the rescue 
and liberation of the Old.
 -- Winston Churchill, June 4, 1940


"I know by now that the glitter of romance as seen from afar often turns
out to be pretty shoddy at close quarters, and what appears to be a 
romantic life is invariably an uncomfortable one; but I know, too, that
the values in such living are usually sound. They have to be, or you 
don't survive. And occasionally you are rewarded by an insight into 
living so splendid, so wholly magnificent, you can be satisfied with
nothing less ever after, so that you go on hoping and searching for
another glimpse for the rest of your life."
 -- Ann Davison (first woman to cross the Atlantic single-handed), 
    "My Ship is So Small"


"Who has known heights and depths shall not again
Know peace -- not as the calm heart knows
Low ivied walls, a garden close,
The old enchantment of a rose,
And though he tread the humble ways of men
He shall not speak the common tongue again."
 -- Wilfred Noyce, "Springs of Adventure"


I would not interfere with any one's religion, either to strengthen it
or to weaken it. I am not able to believe one's religion can affect his
hereafter one way or the other, no matter what that religion may be.
But it may easily be a great comfort to him in this life -- hence it is a
valuable possession to him.
 -- Mark Twain


"I do not see how eternal punishment hereafter could accomplish any good
end, therefore I am not able to believe in it. To chasten a man in order
to perfect him might be reasonable enough; to annihilate him when he shall
have proved himself incapable of reaching perfection might be reasonable
enough; but to roast him forever for the mere satisfaction of seeing him
roast would not be reasonable -- even the atrocious God imagined by the
Jews would tire of the spectacle eventually." 
 -- Mark Twain


"If you can't drink a lobbyist's whiskey, take his money, sleep with
his women and still vote against him in the morning, you don't belong
in politics."
 -- Speaker of the California Assembly Jesse Unruh


"There is no crueler tyranny than that which is perpetrated under the shield
of law and in the name of justice."
 -- Montesquieu, 1742


"The spirit of resistance to government is so valuable on certain occasions
that I wish it to be always kept alive. It will often be exercised when
wrong, but better so than not to be exercised at all."
 -- Thomas Jefferson (1743-1826)


"When we hate our enemies, we are giving them power over us: power
over our sleep, our appetites, our blood pressure, our health, and
our happiness. Our enemies would dance with joy if only they knew how
they were worrying us, lacerating us, and getting even with us! Our
hate is not hurting them at all, but our hate is turning our own days
and nights into a hellish turmoil."
 -- Dale Carnegie


"The penalty for laughing in a courtroom is six months in jail;
if it were not for this penalty, the jury would never hear
the evidence."
 -- H. L. Mencken


"When I grow up I want to be a little boy."
 -- Joseph Heller, from "Something Happened"


"If you have never been hated by your child, you have
never been a parent."
 -- Bette Davis, The Lonely Life


"One World, One Web, One Program" - Microsoft Promotional Ad
"Ein Volk, Ein Reich, Ein Fuhrer" - Adolf Hitler


Enzymes are things invented by biologists that explain things
which otherwise require harder thinking.
 -- Jerome Lettvin


10 principles of craft:
 -- --------------------
1) Act From Principle
2) Begin Where You Are
3) Define your aim simply, clearly & briefly
4) Establish the possible, move gradually toward the impossible
5) Honor necessity
6) Honor sufficiency
7) Offer no violence
8) Suffer cheerfully
9) Take your work seriously but not solemnly
10) Without commitment, all the rules change


"My country is the world, and my religion is to do good."
 -- Thomas Paine ("The Rights of Man")


"I was a passionate actress and wanted to get better roles. But then
I saw that I had the talent of making interesting documentaries out
of minimal content."
 -- Leni Riefenstahl, Hitler's favorite filmmaker, defending her Third
    Reich propaganda films.


We make presidential candidates go through a lengthy and highly
embarrassing process that a person with even the tiniest shred of
dignity would never get involved in. It's analogous to the ice-breaking
party game "Twister," wherein somebody spins a pointer, and the players
have to put their hands and feet on whatever colored circles it points
to, thus winding up in humiliating positions. And the people who want
to be president have to play. If the spinning pointer of political
necessity points to SUCK UP TO UNIONS, they have to put their left hands
over on that circle; if the spinner points to SUCK UP TO RELIGIOUS NUTS,
they have to put their right feet in that circle; and so on, month
after month, with candidates dropping out one by one as the required
contortions become too difficult, until finally there's only one
candidate left--some sweaty, exhausted, dignity-free yutz in a
grotesquely unnatural pose, with his tie askew and his shirt untucked
and his butt crack showing.
 -- Dave Barry


One man's word is no man's word; we should quietly hear both sides.
 -- Goethe


"Act as free men, but do not let your freedom be a cover for evil."
 -- Apostle Peter to churches in the Mediterranean


You... you mean, I *can't* save the world single-handedly? Then how come I
can tell that the world needs saving? Surely the perception wouldn't
overreach the responsibility and capacity to intervene?
 -- Rivka, in sarcastic mode


Jeez... The really important lessons are never 'cheap'. And the cheap
ones don't seem to be very useful. Seems like it takes a HEAVY bloody
hammer to produce good, high-quality steel...
 -- me, in an e-mail to Rivka


Never attribute to malloc that which can be adequately explained by
stupidity.
 -- Joerg Pommnitz


The local betaware broker was sitting in the bar, keeping an eye
for potential customers. It was easy to spot him, once you knew
the signs. A slightly paranoid look, but still eager to meet
new people. Not unlike a drug dealer or prostitute. This guy,
however, was carrying a laptop.
   I sat in the chair beside him. "Any new stuff for
Linux configuration?", I said, looking at the opposite wall
of bottles.
   The broker looked at me, startled, then quickly away. Then
back at me. "What are you, a cop?" The traditional greeting of
the underworld. It made me feel right at home.
   "Nope, I just want to install Deb..."
   "Shutup. I don't want to go to jail."
   I turned around, looked around, then turned back, and put my
knife against his ribs. "Sing or die: where's software for
managing a group of Debian boxes easily?"
   His face was pale, and he whispered through his teeth. "cfgtool.
At Lasu's site. http://www.iki.fi/liw/programs/".
   I stood up, and walked quickly to the kitchen, and on
out. As I was closing the kitchen door behind me, I heard the all too
familiar sound of MessySoft Police Cars braking in the street. It
would be a hectic night, but I was still one step ahead.
 -- Lars Wirzenius, advertising his cfgtool program


> Dear kernel
>  i would most appreseate if you sent me some information on how to hack
> because i am deply confused on how people do hack.thankyou from acid burn.
> email address anikola@ibm.net

Ja.

vi /vmlinuz

 -- tgakem@chem.tue.nl


"...I'm not one of those who think Bill Gates is the devil. I simply
suspect that if Microsoft ever met up with the devil, it wouldn't need an
interpreter."
 -- N. Petreley


Anyone can build a fast processor. The trick is to build a fast system.
 -- Seymour Cray


Besides, its really not worthwhile to use more than two times your physical
ram in swap (except in a select few situations). The performance of the system
becomes so abysmal you'd rather heat pins under your toenails while reciting
Windows95 source code and staring at porn flicks of Bob Dole than actually try
to type something.
 -- Seen on c.o.l.development.system


"Whoa... I did a 'zcat /vmlinuz > /dev/audio' and I think I heard God..."
 -- mikecd on #Linux


Linux: The OS people choose without $200,000,000 of persuasion.
 -- Mike Coleman


What's this script do?
    "unzip ; touch ; finger ; mount ; gasp ; yes ; umount ; sleep"
Hint for the answer: not everything is computer-oriented. Sometimes you're
in a sleeping bag, camping out with your girlfriend.
 -- Frans van der Zande


The only "intuitive" interface is the nipple. After that, it's all learned.
 -- Bruce Ediger in comp.os.linux.misc, on X interfaces.


...And here be merry murtherings, and steeds with fiery hooves;
And furious hordes with guns and swords, and clamberings over rooves;
And horrid tumblings down from Heaven, and flights with wheels and wings;
And always one weak virgin that is chased through all these things.
 -- Rudyard Kipling, "Naaman's Song"


"Disbelief in magic can force a poor soul into believing in government
and business."
 -- Tom Robbins


"Loyalty to a petrified opinion never yet broke a chain or freed a
human soul."
 -- Mark Twain


"Talent develops in tranquility, character in the full current of human
life."
 -- Johann Wolfgang von Goethe (1749-1832)


The U.S. Constitution: void where prohibited by law.
 -- unknown poster on alt.cyberpunk


I am not sure what this is, but an 'F' would only dignify it.
 -- unknown English Professor


You can't teach intelligence.
 -- unknown


When the conscious becomes unconscious, you're drunk. When the unconscious
becomes conscious, you're stoned.
 -- unknown


The only difference between graffiti and philosophy is the word "fuck".
 -- unknown


In a world without fences, who needs Gates?
 -- unknown


Beware the lollipop of mediocrity. Lick it once and you suck forever.
 -- unknown


A friend who used to work at 'research lab' related a story about a
customer support line at 'company'. The support person said something on
the order of "You're not our only customer, you know," to which his
reply was, "Perhaps not, but we're one of the few with tactical nuclear
weapons."
 -- unknown


Courage is not the absence of fear. Courage is the mastery of fear.
 -- Mark Twain


There is a limit to the practical application of democratic methods. You
can inquire of all the passengers as to what type of car they like to ride
in, but it is impossible to question them as to whether to apply the
brakes when the train is at full speed and accident threatens.
 -- Leon Trotsky


Given enough eyeballs, _all_ bugs are shallow.
 -- Linus Torvalds


I am Pentium of Borg. Arithmetic is irrelevant. Prepare to be approximated.
 -- Andrew Toppan


They're my friends, they're my toys, and they have OFF switches. All these
things are good.
 -- tkil@scrye.com


Never write it in C if you can do it in 'awk'; 
Never do it in 'awk' if 'sed' can handle it; 
Never use 'sed' when 'tr' can do the job; 
Never invoke 'tr' when 'cat' is sufficient; 
Avoid using 'cat' whenever possible.
 -- Taylor's Laws of Programming


Childbirth is _not_ a miracle. Life is _not_ sacred. When you have twenty
thousand nomads huddled between two rivers in the Middle East and that's
it for Homo sapiens, when one in five children is a live birth, one in ten
living past the age of ten, then childbirth is a miracle and life is
sacred. When the average age of a grandmother in Philadelphia's housing
projects is twenty-five, to call childbirth a miracle is at least a
tasteless joke and at worst a true obscenity.
 -- Dave Sim


I am dyslexic of Borg. Your ass will be laminated.
 -- Joshua Schachter


We try to name all our hard drives something easy to remember, like Bum
Cleaver, Cunny or Big Hairy Pussy. Sometimes it gets complicated when we
don't remember if the file we're looking for is Assfuck 25 on the Fuckfuck
12 drive, or Fuckfuck 12 on the Assfuck 25 drive. And when we're talking
to each other in the studio, wondering aloud whether running the Cunnykick
file through the Fuckchop program on the Asslick disk would help us access
the Turbocunt compression... it's really like speaking another language
altogether.
 -- Trent Reznor


Does anyone else ever get the distinct impression that some day a group of
people in suits are going to walk into your office or your home and say,
'We've got you now! You had everyone *thinking* you were a grown up, but
you're not. Now get your things. Your mother's got supper on the table and
you have to be in bed by 7:30.' Or is it just me?
 -- Cynthia Melcher


A small case of mood poisoning... must have been something I hate.
 -- Eli Levitt, Wild Palms


If the enemy is in range, so are you.
Incoming fire has the right of way.
There is always a way.
The easy way is always mined.
Try to look unimportant, they may be low on ammo.
Professionals are predictable, it's the amateurs that are dangerous.
The enemy invariably attacks on two occasions: when you're ready for
them, and when you're not ready for them.
Teamwork is essential, it gives them someone else to shoot at.
If you can't remember, then the claymore is pointed at you.
The enemy diversion you have been ignoring will be the main attack.
A sucking chest wound is nature's way of telling you to slow down.
If your attack is going well you have walked into an ambush.
Never draw fire, it irritates everyone around you.
Anything you do can get you shot - including nothing.
Make it tough enough for the enemy to get in and you won't be able to get
out.
Never share a foxhole with anyone braver than yourself.
If you're short of everything but the enemy, you're in a combat zone.
When you have secured an area, don't forget to tell the enemy.
Never forget that your weapon is made by the lowest bidder.
Remember, once you pull the pin, Mr. Hand Grenade is no longer your friend.
It's not the bullet with your name on it you have to worry about, it's all
those other ones labeled 'to whom it may concern'.
 -- The Laws of Combat


You know you're no longer a teenager when the mere sight of one annoys
the fuck out of you.
 -- Jennifer Knipper


Those who make peaceful revolution impossible will make violent revolution
inevitable.
 -- John F. Kennedy


Washington is a city of southern efficiency and northern charm.
 -- John F. Kennedy


I wish something exciting would happen, like an alien invasion or
something. Do you ever wonder whether someone like me is sitting in a
missile silo somewhere thinking, "Life has gotten just a little TOO BORING."
 -- Sam Kass


That which does not kill me is surely defective and should be returned to
the manufacturer for replacement.
 -- Anu Kapoor


Human errors can only be avoided if one can avoid the use of humans.
 -- joker@diku.dk


Never eat there. Under no circumstances eat at that mcdonalds. If it's
the last food left on earth, die.
 -- Faisal Jawdat


I regret to say that we of the F.B.I. are powerless to act in cases of
oral-genital intimacy, unless it has in some way obstructed interstate
commerce.
 -- J. Edgar Hoover


When the only hammer you have is C++, the whole world looks like a thumb.
 -- Keith Hodges


I went to my first computer conference at the New York Hilton about 20
years ago. When somebody there predicted the market for microprocessors
would eventually be in the millions, someone else said, "Where are they
all going to go? It's not like you need a computer in every doorknob!"
Years later, I went back to the same hotel. I noticed the room keys had
been replaced by electronic cards you slide into slots in the doors.
There was a computer in every doorknob.
 -- Danny Hillis


If you put an infinite amount of monkeys in front of an infinite amount of
typewriters, they'd eventually produce the entire works of Shakespeare.
Do the same with humans and computers and you get Windows NT. Score:
Monkeys 1, Humans 0.
 -- Jordan Hardgrove


UNIX was never designed to keep people from doing stupid things, because
that policy would also keep them from doing clever things.
 -- Doug Gwyn


You're damn right we need a rational code of morality and ethics. But not
much progress can be made in that direction while we've still got a
majority ranting about gods, devils, souls, and absolute morality, and
using an ancient book written by ignorant nomads as a guide.
 -- Doug Graham


In science, "fact" can only mean "confirmed to such a degree that it would
be perverse to withhold provisional assent." I suppose that apples might
start to rise tomorrow, but the possibility does not merit equal time in
physics classrooms.
 -- Stephen Jay Gould


I have two glowsticks, you have two nether orifices. Coincidence? I think
not.
 -- Vijay Gill


I must admit my education in the assgoblin arena has been sadly lacking,
perhaps you can clue me in.
 -- Vijay Gill


If we want to hear your pathetic squealing, we'd bend you over the sofa
and fuck you up the ass!
 -- Vijay Gill


He is dead. Something that he disagreed with ate him.
 -- Vijay Gill


With reasonable men, I will reason; with humane men I will plead; but to
tyrants I will give no quarter, nor waste arguments where they will
certainly be lost.
 -- William Lloyd Garrison


The price of liberty is, always has been, and always will be blood: the
person who is not willing to die for his liberty has already lost it to
the first scoundrel who is willing to risk dying to violate that person's
liberty.
Are you free?
 -- Andrew Ford


Four people attack you with screwdrivers, you have a gun, they're supposed
to die. That's not racism. That's Darwin.
 -- Chip Flatow


36 is significant because at 36 you can sleep with someone half your age
and not go to jail.
 -- Jon Ferro


Diet Caffeine Free Mountain Dew - I don't like sex, I just enjoy wearing a
condom.
 -- Jon Ferro


Don't call me 'white male'; I'm 'differently oppressed', OK?
 -- Andrew Bulhak


I used to program my IBM PC to make hideous noises to wake me up. I
also made the conscious decision to hard-code the alarm time into the
program, so as to make it more difficult for me to reset it. After I
realized that I was routinely getting up, editing the source file,
recompiling the program and rerunning it for 15 minutes extra sleep, before
going back to bed, I gave up and made the alarm time a command-line
option.
 -- B.M. Buck


The way to deal with bureaucrats is with stealth and sudden violence.
 -- UN Secretary General Boutros Boutros-Ghali


If you kill one person, you are an assassin. If you kill a million
people, you are a conqueror. If you kill everyone, you are a god.
 -- Conrad Bland


"Anger makes dull men witty, but it keeps them poor."
 -- Elizabeth I, in Francis Bacon, Apophthegms, 1625


"When angry, count ten before you speak; if very angry, a hundred."
 -- Thomas Jefferson, Writings


"When angry, count four; when very angry, swear."
 -- Mark Twain


Art and science are the same basic fabric, just in art you tend to
arrive at important developments without the need for documentation on how
you got there.
 -- Brad Barkett


Only the free have disposition to be truthful. Only the truthful have the
interest to be just. Only the just possess the willpower to be free.
 -- W.H. Auden


7 deadly sins in one sentence: It enrages me that I, a clearly superior
person, should have less money than my neighbor, whose wife I would love to
fuck - if I weren't so busy eating pork chops and sleeping all day.
 -- Steve Archer


You see, that's the difference between us. I assume the best about people,
while you assume the worst. So I get hurt, but you get nothing.
 -- Sondra Ahlen


Technology will definitely solve all our problems, but in the process it
will create brand-new ones. But that's OK because the most you can expect
from life is to get to solve better and better problems.
 -- Scott Adams


Until a man is twenty-five, he still thinks, every so often, that under
the right circumstances he could be the baddest motherfucker in the world.
If I moved to a martial-arts monastery in China and studied real hard
for ten years. if my family was wiped out by Colombian drug dealers
and I swore myself to revenge. If I got a fatal disease, had one year
to live, devoted it to wiping out street crime. If I just dropped out
and devoted my life to being bad.
 -- Neal Stephenson, "Snow Crash"


The first sign of maturity is the discovery that the volume knob also
turns to the left.
 -- anonymous


If I wanted to sleep with someone that effeminate, I'd be heterosexual.
 -- anonymous


Delaying Win 98 would be like throwing sand in the anal lubricant. It
would not change anything, just make it a bit more painful for Gates
and the customers preparing themselves.
 -- anonymous


It's called DIS-information for God's sake! The clue phone is ringing,
pick it the fuck up!
 -- Richard Metzger


The laws of Congress and the laws of physics have grown increasingly
divergent, and the laws of physics are not likely to yield.
 -- Bill McKibben


The Air Force pinned a medal on me for killing a man and discharged me
for making love to one.
 -- Leonard Matlovich


I've had a perfectly wonderful evening. But this wasn't it.
 -- Groucho Marx


With Word 97, Microsoft has at last succeeded in reproducing in the Windows
arena the elusive success of Word 6.0 for the Mac: an upgrade so vile, so
utterly beyond accommodation, that users will go digging through their
attics in search of the media needed to install the previous version.
 -- Dan Martinez


You are talking about the Count Dracula of the computing world. The tree
large enough that a stake capable of killing COBOL could be fashioned from
its trunk has not yet grown anywhere upon the face of this verdant planet.
 -- Dan Martinez


...it was more a process of incrementation than revelation. I started by
not fretting over minor missteps, and built my way gradually upward from
there, to the point where I can now fuck up in ways that plunge the
ecologies of entire third-world nations into dry and dusty ruin, send
whole planeloads of widows and orphans screaming to fiery deaths, deliver
dozens of pounds of weapons-grade plutonium to fanatics convinced they're
on a direct line to God, and still keep a beatific smile upon my face.
 -- Dan Martinez


Have I ever told you how much more authoritative and convincing your
arguments sound when you sprinkle them liberally with expletives? No,
really. I'm just so completely won over by the forcefulness and lucidity
of your rhetoric.
 -- Dan Martinez


But while we're on the subject of file formats, let's pause for a moment
in frank admiration of the way in which Microsoft brazenly built
backward-incompatibility into its product. By initially making it virtually
impossible to maintain a heterogenous environment of Word 95 and Word 97
systems, Microsoft offered its customers that most eloquent of arguments
for upgrading: the delicate sound of a revolver being cocked somewhere
just out of sight.
 -- Dan Martinez


Ahem. UPS are a bunch of cretinous, knuckle-dragging fuckwads who couldn't
find their own assholes with both hands, a differential GPS suppository,
and a licensed proctologist, hired as a full-time consultant, on
'round-the clock call. To their credit, they are stunningly coordinated,
or at least ambidextrous, insofar as their total and absolute incompetence
is not the slightest bit affected by the outcome of the decision as to
which hand is to hold the bong and which is to choke the chicken. I
wouldn't trust in their ability to get water downhill or toothpaste out of
a tube, let alone a box across the country. If any of you should, for any
reason, at any time, engage in an agreement, business contract, licensing
deal, or other arrangement with UPS which will in any way result in a net
benefit to them, I will KILL you. If said arrangement actually involved
your entrusting items of any actual value to this company of gibbering,
hell-spawned idiots, I will be doing you a FAVOR.
 -- Dan Martinez


Called up the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and Firearms regional office and asked, "What wine goes best with an M-16?" The guy who answered did his best to be helpful: "That depends. What are you smoking?"
 -- Michael Maciolek


"O senseless man, who cannot possibly make a worm and yet will make
Gods by the dozen!"
 -- Michel de Montaigne (1533-1592)


"The direct use of force is such a poor solution to any problem, it is
generally employed only by small children and large nations."
 -- David Friedman


"Ah, you know the type. They like to blame it all on the Jews or the Blacks,
'cause if they couldn't, they'd have to wake up to the fact that life's one
big, scary, glorious, complex and ultimately unfathomable crapshoot -- and
the only reason THEY can't seem to keep up is they're a bunch of misfits
and losers."
 -- an analysis of neo-Nazis and such, Badger comics


"Yes, evil comes in many forms, whether it be a man-eating
cow or Joseph Stalin, but you can't let the package hide
the pudding! Evil is just plain bad! You don't cotton to it.
You gotta smack it in the nose with the rolled-up newspaper
of goodness! Bad dog! Bad dog!"
 -- The Tick


'Friends are God's apology to us for our families.'


"In respect to lock-making, there can scarcely be such a thing as
dishonesty of intention: the inventor produces a lock which he
honestly thinks will possess such and such qualities; and he
declares his belief to the world. If others differ from him in
opinion concerning those qualities, it is open to them to say so;
and the discussion, truthfully conducted, must lead to public
advantage: the discussion stimulates curiosity, and curiosity
stimulates invention. Nothing but a partial and limited view
of the question could lead to the opinion that harm can result:
if there be harm, it will be much more than counterbalanced by good."
 -- Charles Tomlinson's Rudimentary Treatise on the Construction of
    Locks, published around 1850.


"If language is not correct, then what is said is not what is meant;
if what is said is not what is meant, then what must be done remains
undone; if this remains undone, morals and art will deteriorate; if
justice goes astray, the people will stand about in helpless
confusion. Hence there must be no arbitrariness in what is said. This
matters above everything."
 -- Confucius


"The truth that many people never understand, until it is too late,
is that the more you try to avoid suffering the more you suffer, because
smaller and more insignificant things begin to torture you in proportion
to your fear of being hurt."
 -- Thomas Merton


You gain strength, courage, and confidence by every experience in
which you really stop to look fear in the face. You must do the
thing which you think you cannot do.
 -- Eleanor Roosevelt


"If evolution really works, how come mothers only have two hands?"
 -- Ed Dussault


"Science can be introduced to children well or poorly. If poorly,
children can be turned away from science; they can develop a lifelong
antipathy; they will be in a far worse condition than if they had
never been introduced to science at all."
 -- Isaac Asimov


"Habits - the only reason they persist is that they are offering
some satisfaction. You allow them to persist by not seeking any
other, better form of satisfying the same needs. Every habit, good
or bad, is acquired and learned in the same way - by finding that
it is a means of satisfaction."
 -- Juliene Berk


"Our bombs are smarter than the average high school student. At least
they can find Kuwait."
 -- A. Whitney Brown


"Suppose you were an idiot... And suppose you were a member of Congress
 ... But I repeat myself."
 -- Mark Twain


"We are the Redneck of Borg. Y'all will be assimilated. That thar
resistance is stupid."
 -- G. Robert Perye III


A machine without soul, men call it,
But its soul is the sweat of my comrades,
Within it lie the years of our lives,
Disappointment, friendship, sadness, joy,
The algorithmic exultations,
The long nights filled with thankless toil,
I hear the echoes of sighs and laughter,
And in the darkened offices
The terminals shine like stars.
 -- The Zen of Programming


"Every aspect of a living system is inherently unstable."
 -- Michael Crichton


If you can't convince them, confuse them.

Death is hereditary.

Multitasking - screwing up several things at once.

Dyslexics of the world, untie!

How do you tell when you run out of invisible ink?

Artificial intelligence is no match for natural stupidity.

Polynesia: memory loss in parrots.

Oh Lord, give me patience...and GIVE IT TO ME NOW!

A good pun is its own reword.

I used to be indecisive. Now I'm not sure.

Why do psychics have to ask you for your name?

Friends may come and go, but enemies tend to accumulate.

Corduroy pillows: They're making headlines!

Black holes are where God divided by zero.

All those who believe in psychokinesis raise my hand.

I was going to procrastinate, but I put it off.


"Would you drive any better with that car phone up your butt?"


"You must take part in the action and passion of your times, at pain of
being judged not to have lived."
 -- Oliver Wendell Holmes


You were born together, and together you shall be forevermore.
You shall be together when the white wings of death scatter your days.
Aye, you shall be together even in the silent memory of God.
But let there be spaces in your togetherness,
And let the winds of the heavens dance between you.
 -- Kahlil Gibran


"Oh, nobody knows when the Lord is goin ter call, Roll dem bones.
It may be in de wintertime, and maybe in de Fall, Roll dem bones
But yer got ter leabe yer baby and yer home an all - So roll dem bones."
 -- SuBose Heyward


"Life: a spiritual pickle preserving the body from decay."
 -- Ambrose Bierce


"The triumph of libertarian anarchy is nearly (in historical terms)
at hand... *if* we can keep the Left from selling us into slavery and
the Right from blowing us up for, say, the next twenty years."
 -- Eric Rayman, usenet guy, about nanotechnology


"The quality of American life must keep pace with the quantity of
American goods. This country cannot afford to be materially rich and
spiritually poor."
 -- John F. Kennedy


"Failures are divided into two classes--those who thought and never
did, and those who did and never thought."
 -- John Charles Salak


"I don't have a 'lifestyle', I have a life."
 -- Neil Simon


"Any idiot can face a crisis - it's this day-to-day living that wears you
out."
 --Anton Chekhov


"Games are very educational. Scrabble teaches us vocabulary,
Monopoly teaches us cash-flow management, and D&D teaches us
to loot the bodies."
 -- Steve Jackson


"Actually, I've found that Usenet has helped a lot with my terror of
social stupidity. Seeing people I really like and respect behave like
idiots in public has been very beneficial."
 --Rachael Lininger


Arma virumque cano, Trojae qui primus ab oris...
("Arms, and the man I sing who first from shores of Troy...")
 -- Virgil's Aeneid I.1-14


...equo ne credite, Teucri. Quidquid est, timeo Danaos et dona ferentes.
("Do not trust the horse, Trojans. Whatever it is, I fear Greeks even when
bearing gifts.")
 -- Laocoon, Virgil's Aeneid II.48-49


"Doctors and nurses are people who give you medicine until you die."
 -- Deborah Martin


"don't lose faith in yourself, and if you do don't worry you'll get it back."
 -- johncoot@my-dejanews.com, the madman of a.c.


"Saying that men talk about football in order to avoid discussing
their feelings is precisely the same thing as saying that women talk
about their feelings in order to avoid discussing football."
 -- Deborah Tannen


Statistics are like bikinis: what they show is interesting, but what they
conceal is essential.


"We are just an advanced breed of monkeys on a minor planet of a
very average star. But we can understand the Universe. That makes
us something very special."
 -- Stephen Hawking


May you live in interesting times; may you come to the attention of
people in high places; and may you get exactly what you deserve.


ROTTEN FIRST LINES FOR NOVELS ...by Alan Meiss
 -- ---------------------------
It was many years before Timmy realized how much growing up he'd
done that day, when he'd said goodbye to his cherished pet and
closest companion, the best buddy who'd been with him as he romped
through sundrenched meadows and splashed through babbling forest
brooks in the great woods behind Grandma's cottage, sharing her
gingerbread cookies hot from the oven and fragrant pies left to
cool in country breezes; only old Doctor Burrows could separate
the two, and Timmy had emptied the specimen jar containing his
beloved tapeworm Ralph into the great brass commode with a tear
in his eye.


"Pick battles big enough to matter, small enough to win."
 -- Jonathan Kozol


"New Year's is another day. By the time you get to Jan. 7, you forget the
new year. The bills keep coming, you're trying to get skinny ... Life
goes on."
 -- Chubby Checker


"The ACLU believes that no matter how important the quarry or
how serious the charges, we must be careful to impose appropriate
limits on the means by which evidence is gathered. If we do not, we
may end up living in a country that we no longer recognize, a
country where people we trust are encouraged by the law
secretly to record our conversations, where prosecutors may
without a judicial warrant persuade our friends and
colleagues to become informers and to spy on us, where
prosecutors can operate outside their jurisdiction and before
obtaining the necessary legal authority, and where people may
be bullied into giving evidence because of what has already
been obtained from them by stealth or even illegally."
 -- From a Statement on the Investigation Of President Clinton
 dated Wednesday, January 28, 1998, by Ira Glasser, Executive
 Director, American Civil Liberties Union


"Don't be ashamed to say what you are not ashamed to think."
 -- Montaigne


A mathematician is a machine for converting coffee to theorems.


If once a man indulges himself in murder, very soon he comes to think
little of robbing; and from robbing he next comes to drinking and
Sabbath-breaking, and from that to incivility and procrastination.
 -- Thomas De Quincey (1785-1859)


"... one of the main causes of the fall of the Roman Empire was that,
lacking zero, they had no way to indicate successful termination of
their C programs."
 -- Robert Firth


In a free society, standards of public morality can be measured only by 
whether physical coercion, violence against persons, or property occurs. 
There is no right not to be offended by words, actions or symbols.
 -- Richard E. Sincere, Jr.


"It has been said that a bride's attitude towards her betrothed
can be summed up in three words: Aisle, Altar, Hymn."
 -- Frank Muir & Dennis Norden


"Justice" is all get some. And none get a lot more than me, or a lot
less. And if they try to take more, we toss them out.

"Justice" is if you kill my mate, I get to kill you. If you take my
goat, I get it back and you get the tribe mad at you.

Later extrapolations are just improvements on a theme.
 -- Suze Hammond (Feb 26, 1992)


"We are just tenants on this world. We have just been given a new
lease, and a warning from the landlord."
 -- Arthur C. Clarke (2010)


"A great deal of intelligence can be invested in ignorance when the
need for illusion is deep."
 -- Saul Bellow


"Have I no friend who will rid me of this troublesome priest?"
 -- Henry II


"X11 is the second worst windowing system in the world. First place is
a tie between all the other windowing systems that have sold more than
10 seats."
 -- Paul Tomblin in a.s.r.


2000 BC -- Here, eat this root.
1000 AD -- That root is heathen. Here, say this prayer.
1850 AD -- That prayer is superstition. Here, drink this potion.
1940 AD -- That potion is snake oil. Here, swallow this pill.
1985 AD -- That pill is ineffective. Here, take this antibiotic.
2000 AD -- That antibiotic doesn't work anymore. Here, eat this root.


Q: Why don't they make white M&M's?
A: Because they'd enslave the brown M&Ms, steal all the red M&Ms' land,
accuse the yellow M&Ms of obstructing trade, and complain that the damn
coffee M&Ms were taking all their jobs.
 -- published in rec.humor.funny


***WARNING:
You are currently using an unregistered evaluation copy of your life.
Register now for the full-featured version and cheat codes!


The Church of the SuperGenius continues to worship Wile E. Coyote. We
are currently denying the existence of a secret gnostic inner group,
known as the Church of Wile E. Coyote, Scientist, whose esoteric 
doctrine is that this entire world was built by ACME.
 -- Arthur D. Hlavaty


Windows 98: n.
minor patch release for 32-bit extensions and a graphical shell for
an 16-bit patch to an 8-bit operating system originally coded for a
4-bit microprocessor, written by a 2-bit company that can't stand for 
1 bit of competition.


"The main reason Santa is so jolly is because he knows where all the bad
girls live."
 -- Steven Wright


"I never believed in Santa Claus because I knew no white dude would
come into my neighborhood after dark."
 -- Dick Gregory


Those who agree with you aren't necessarily your friends.
Those who disagree with you need not be your enemies.


Question all of it, and the parts you accept, keep.
 -- Big Al, in alt.callahans


"For de little stealin' dey gits you in jail soon or late. For de big
stealin' dey makes you emperor and puts you in de Hall o' Fame when
you croaks."
 -- Eugene O'Neill


"In vain we call old notions fudge,
And bend our conscience to our dealing;
The Ten Commandments will not budge,
And stealing *will* continue stealing.'
 -- James Russell Lowell, International Copyright


In labor as in life there can be no cheating. The thief steals from
himself.
 -- Emerson


"There is only one way in which a person acquires a new idea; by
combination or association of two or more ideas he already has
into a new juxtaposition in such a manner as to discover a
relationship among them of which he was not previously aware."
 -- Francis A. Carter


"Eat a third and drink a third and leave the remaining third of your
stomach empty. Then, when you get angry, there will be sufficient
room for your rage."
 -- Babylonian Talmud, tractate Gittin


"Hating people is like burning down your own house to get rid of a rat."
 -- Henry Emerson Fosdick


"Monarchies, aristocracies, and religions are all based upon that large
defect in your race -- the individual's distrust of his neighbor, and his 
desire, for safety's or comfort's sake, to stand well in his neighbor's 
eye. These institutions will always remain, and always flourish, and always 
oppress you, affront you, and degrade you, because you will always be and 
remain slaves of minorities. There was never a country where the majority 
of people were in their secret hearts loyal to any of these institutions."
 -- Mark Twain, _The Mysterious Stranger_


"Do not confine your children to your own learning, for they were
born in another time."
 -- Hebrew proverb


"Of all the self-fulfilling prophecies in our culture, the assumption
that aging means decline and poor health is probably the deadliest."
 -- Marilyn Ferguson, The Aquarian Conspiracy, 1980


"One could not be a successful scientist without realizing that,
in contrast to the popular conception supported by newspapers and
mothers of scientists, a goodly number of scientists are not only
narrow-minded and dull, but also just stupid."
 -- J. D. Watson, "The Double Helix"


"Every artist dips his brush in his own soul, and paints his own
nature into his pictures."
 -- Reverend Henry Ward Beecher, Proverbs from Plymouth Pulpit, 1887


"Works of imagination should be written in very plain language;
the more purely imaginative they are the more necessary it is
to be plain."
 -- Samuel Taylor Coleridge


As Wiener Schnitzel looked back on his career as a mathematician,
he rued the fast life he'd led; his angry, drunken proofs, the cheap
tawdry theorems scrawled in lipstick on the naked bellies of
unconscious groupies, the lemmas he'd hustled for fixes in the
smoke-filled back rooms of conferences, and determined to go back
to his origin, to rationalize his singular life with the common
denominator.


He that is of the opinion money will do everything may
well be suspected of doing everything for money.
 -- Ben Franklin


Impossible, adj.:
(1) I wouldn't like it and when it happens I won't approve;
(2) I can't be bothered;
(3) God can't be bothered.
Meaning (3) may perhaps be valid but the others are 101% whaledreck.
 -- Chad C. Mulligan, "The Hipcrime Vocab"


"There is nothing worse than a sharp image of a fuzzy concept."
 -- Ansel Adams


"Indecision is like a stepchild: if he does not wash his hands, he is
called dirty, if he does, he is wasting water."
 -- African Proverb


"A thorn defends the rose, harming only those who would steal the
blossom."
 -- Chinese proverb


"Always do sober what you said you'd do drunk. That will teach you
to keep your mouth shut."
 -- Ernest Hemingway


"Don't you know there ain't no devil, it's just god when he's drunk."
 -- Tom Waits


"I prefer to think that God is not dead, just drunk."
 -- John Huston


"Who are we? We find that we live on an insignificant planet of a
humdrum star lost in a galaxy tucked away in some forgotten corner
of a universe in which there are far more galaxies than people."
 -- Carl Sagan


"The sum of intelligence on the planet is a constant; the population
is growing."
 -- Cole's axiom


"I would rather be ashes than dust! I would rather that my spark
should burn out in a brilliant blaze than it should be stifled
by dry-rot. I would rather be a superb meteor, every atom of me
in magnificent glow, than a sleepy and permanent planet. The
proper function of man is to live, not to exist. I shall not
waste my days in trying to prolong them. I shall use my time."
 -- Jack London, Jack London's Tales of Adventure


"The size of a man is measured by the size of the thing that makes
him angry."


"He's not dumb; he knows what he's doing. He's done that for
years ... he's learned that if the dream's big enough, the facts
don't count."
 -- Billy Florence, on the value of dreambuilding


"Whenever I watch TV and see those poor starving kids all over the world, I
can't help but cry. I mean I'd love to be skinny like that but not with
all those flies and death and stuff."
 -- Mariah Carey, pop singer


"They asked me to go in front of the Reagans. I'm not used to going in
front of President Reagan, so we went out behind the Bushes."
 -- Dan Quayle, Former U.S. Vice President (1947-)


....computer hardware progress is so fast. No other technology since
civilization began has seen six orders of magnitude in
performance-price gain in 30 years.
 -- Fred Brooks, Jr.


"It is not enough to be busy, so are the ants. The question is: what
are we busy about?"
 -- Henry David Thoreau


"I was recently on a tour of Latin America, and the only regret I have was
that I didn't study Latin harder in school so I could converse with those
people."
 -- Former U.S. Vice-President Dan Quayle


"If a mute swears, does his mother wash his hands with soap?"
 -- Steven Wright


They say a person needs just three things to be truly happy in
this world. Someone to love, something to do, and something to
hope for.
 -- Tom Bodett


"Although plastic was brought into industrial use in 1909 by L.H.
Baekeland of Yonkers, it was not until after World War II that
the modern miracle substance was used in a wide variety of consumer
goods, among them speedboats, dentures and flamingos. Previously
flamingos were made of cement. Before that they were made by other
flamingos."
 -- William E. Geist, The New York Times


Great spirits have always encountered violent opposition from
mediocre minds.
 -- Albert Einstein


Vici Venei VD - I conquered, I came, I cankered.


How much wilderness do we need? Well, how many of Mozart's symphonies do
we *need*?
 -- Nash


The greatest political concept of the twentieth century is that of 
Stalinist Communism. People ask me why, and I shoot them. Pretty 
basic concept.


If a man speaks in a forest, and there is no woman
around to hear him, is he still wrong?


"Just keep telling yourself you are immortal."
 -- Albert Hofmann


"If the women don't find you handsome, they should at least find you
handy." 
 -- Red Green


"Never criticize anybody until you have walked a mile in their shoes,
because by that time you will be a mile away and have their shoes."


"Biography lends to death a new terror."
 -- Oscar Wilde


"The busiest of living agents are certain dead men's thoughts;
they are forever influencing the opinions and destinies of men."
 -- John Christian Bovee


"You must not lose faith in humanity. Humanity is an ocean; if a
few drops of the ocean are dirty, the ocean does not become dirty."
 -- Mohandas K. Gandhi


Only presidents, editors, and people with tapeworms have the right to use
the editorial ``we''.
 -- Mark Twain


"I went to the hardware store and bought some used paint. It was in
the shape of a house. I also bought some batteries, but they weren't
included. So I had to buy them again."
 -- Steven Wright


"Armitage crossed stiffly to the table and took three fat bundles of
New Yen from the pockets of his trenchcoat. "You want to count it?"
he asked Yonderboy. "No," the Panther Modern said. You'll pay. You're
a Mr. Who. You pay to stay one. Not a Mr. Name."
 -- William Gibson, "Neuromancer"


In Dungeons And Dragons, the average house cat can kill a first level
wizard. Novice wizards, remember this when choosing your familiar.


"If you want to travel around the world and be invited to speak at a lot
of different places, just write a Unix operating system."
 -- Linus Torvalds


I searched through rebellion, drugs, diets, mysticism, religions,
intellectualism and much more, only to begin to find...that truth is
basically simple - and feels good, clean and right.
 -- Chick Corea


"The police are not here to create disorder. They're here to preserve
disorder."
 -- Former Chicago mayor Daley during the infamous 1968 Democratic
Party convention


"The moment of victory is much too short to live for that and nothing
else."
 -- Martina Navratilova


The secret of getting ahead is getting started. The secret of
getting started is breaking your complex overwhelming tasks into
small manageable tasks, and then starting on the first one.
 -- Mark Twain


"If you have a talent, use it in every which way possible. Don't
hoard it. Don't dole it out like a miser. Spend it lavishly like a
millionaire intent on going broke."
 -- Brendan Francis


"I have every sympathy with the American who was so horrified by what
he had read about the effects of smoking that he gave up reading."
 -- Henry G. Strauss


"It's like he always says -- his goal is to be the healthiest man in
the cemetery."
 --Lou Gadless after his father, SAM GADLESS, 91, finished the New York
   City Marathon in 8:25:55, two months after being hit by a car.


"We cannot be more sensitive to pleasure without being more sensitive
to pain."
 -- Alan Watts


"What is the use of a house if you haven't got a tolerable planet
to put it on?"
 -- Henry David Thoreau


"Maybe this world is another planet's hell."
 -- Aldous Huxley


"There is no limit to stupidity. Space itself is said to be bounded
by its own curvature, but stupidity continues beyond infinity."
 -- Gene Wolfe


"A friend is one to whom one may pour out all the contents of one's
heart, chaff and grain together, knowing that the gentlest of hands will
take and sift it, keep what is worth keeping, and with a breath of
kindness, blow the rest away."
 -- Arabian Proverb


Cats are not clean, they're covered in cat spit!!


"I hear these guys talking, say 'Hey, I can fuck for eight, nine hours,
Jack.' <laugh> Y'all some lyin' motherfuckers. You fuck nine hours, we
comin' to bury your ass on the tenth."
 -- Richard Pryor


"Access to power must be confined to those who are not in love with it."
 -- Plato


"The whole aim of practical politics is to keep the populace alarmed (and
hence clamorous to be led to safety) by menacing it with an endless series
of hobgoblins, all of them imaginary."
 -- H. L. Mencken


"We used to laugh at Grandpa when he'd head off and go fishing. But
we wouldn't be laughing that evening when he'd come back with some
whore he picked up in town."
 -- Jack Handey


"Real Programmers always confuse Christmas and Halloween because
OCT 31 == DEC 25 !"
 -- Andrew Rutherford (andrewr@ucs.adelaide.edu.au)


"I went to a bookstore and asked the saleswoman, "Where's the self-help
section?" She said if she told me, it would defeat the purpose."
 -- Steven Wright


"In Virginia, police are looking for a stripper who stabbed a man for
telling her she was too fat to strip. Police warn that the woman is
armed and extremely fat."
 -- Norm MacDonald


"And it came to pass that in the hands of the ignorant, the words of the
Bible were used to beat plowshares into swords."
 -- Alan Wilson Watts


Carpe PM : Seize at least half the day


"Obscenity is anything that gives a judge an erection." 


Do entomologists commit insect?


Those who live by the sword get shot by those who don't.


"It is better to be roughly right than to be precisely wrong."
 -- John Maynard Keynes


"The game of life is not so much in holding a good hand as playing a
poor hand well."
 -- H. T. Leslie


"If you think education is expensive, try ignorance."
 -- Derek Bok, President, Harvard University


"Home is is the place where your computer lives and runs your life."
 -- Chrome Cowboy, sobiloff@thor.acc.stolaf.edu


"Yup, my gast has been totally flabbered and my fuses are all con... it
happens."
 -- SailorJim


No matter how spicy you like your food, someone will tell you it is
too bland and someone else will tell you it is too hot. Season to your
own taste.
 -- Ancient Kung Foole Proverb


"Last year I went fishing with Salvador Dali. He was using a dotted
line. He caught every other fish."
 -- Steven Wright


"I don't like the sound of my phone ringing so I put my phone inside
my fish tank. I can't hear it, but every time I get a call I see the
fish go like this <<<>>><<>><<<<. I go down to the pet store --
 "Gimme another ten guppies, I got a lotta calls yesterday."
 -- Steven Wright


"They couldn't hit an elephant at this dist-----"
 -- Union Army General John Sedgewick, last words, 1864


'"Reality" is the only word in the English language that should
always be used in quotes.'
 -- Unknown


"Worry is like a rocking chair - it gives you something to do but it
doesn't get you anywhere."
 -- Dorothy Galyean


Remember: the net is phenomenological. Do a perfect impression of being a
total jerk, and you *are*.
 -- Bruce Baugh


"He's dead, Jim. You grab his tricorder, I'll get his wallet..."


     The fact of the matter is, if you say something, you're not just
saying the exact words you say. You're saying everything that is made
true by those words. Trying to say that the direct implications of
your words is NOT what you said is dishonest at worst, and foolish at
best.
 -- John Palmer, a.c.


"Temper gets you into trouble. Pride keeps you there."
 -- Anonymous


"When a man is wrong and won't admit it, he always gets angry."
 -- Thomas C. Haliburton


"Holding on to anger, resentment and hurt only gives you tense muscles,
a headache and a sore jaw from clenching your teeth."
 -- Joan Lunden, in Healthy Living Magazine


"If you can spend a perfectly useless afternoon in a perfectly useless
manner, you have learned how to live."
 -- Lin Yutang


"People take different roads seeking fulfillment and happiness. Just
because they're not on your road doesn't mean they've gotten lost."
 -- H. Jackson Browne [P.S. I Love You]


"And the fox said to the little prince: men have forgotten this
truth, but you must not forget it. You become responsible, forever,
for what you have tamed."
 -- Antoine de Saint-Exupery [The Little Prince]


"Nature teaches more than she preaches. There are no sermons in
stones. It is easier to get a spark out of a stone than a moral."
 -- John Burroughs


"If a parsley farmer is sued, can they garnish his wages?"
 -- Steven Wright


"You hear about 'constitutional rights,' 'free speech,'
and the 'free press.' Every time I hear these words I say
to myself, 'That man is a Red....' You never hear a REAL
American talk like that."
 -- Mayor Frank Hague, Jersey City


"If I was doing it over again I wouldn't have done it, but I can't
shoot them now that they're here."
 -- Media mogul TED TURNER, who espouses a worldwide one-baby-per-family
policy, explaining that if he could do things over again, he wouldn't
have had five children.


"In Milwaukee, Wisconsin, a man allowed his eight-year-old daughter to
take the wheel of his car, and an accident ensued that damaged seven
other cars and injured six people. Which once again proves my theory
- women can't drive."
 -- Norm MacDonald


Not to know is bad.
Not to want to know is worse.
Not to hope is unthinkable.
Not to care is unforgivable.
 -- Nigerian folk saying


Everything I needed to know in life I learned in kindergarten. Like: There
is great power in both creation and destruction, but creation focuses power,
and destruction disperses it. This is the superiority of creation.
 -- John Palmer, in a.c.


"Evolution never stopped, you always have to choose;
the thug who waits to mug you is collecting Darwin's dues . . ."
 -- Leslie Fish, "Dirty Harry"


Smart people who don't think are worse than idiots who try.
 -- D. Porowski


I was playing poker with tarot cards the other night. I got a
full house and four people died.
 -- Steven Wright


Last night I was trying to make love to my wife. It wasn't
going too well, so she looked at me and said, "What's the
matter, can't you think of anyone either?"
 -- Rodney Dangerfield


Question with boldness even the existence of God; because if there 
be one, He must approve the homage of Reason rather than that of 
blindfolded Fear.
 -- Thomas Jefferson


Nine megs for the secretaries fair, Seven megs for the hackers scarce
Five megs for the grads in smoky lairs, Three megs for system source;
One disk to rule them all, One disk to bind them,
One disk to hold the files, and in the darkness grind 'em.


"Sergeant, what should I do should I happen to unexpectedly encounter a
land mine?"
"Well, sir, normal procedure is to jump two hundred feet into the air and
scatter oneself over a wide area."


"Deru kugi wa utareru (The nail that sticks up gets hammered down)"
 -- Japanese saying


Integrity without knowledge is weak and useless; knowledge without
integrity is dangerous and dreadful.
 -- Anonymous


If you're not living on the edge, you're taking up too much space.
 -- Anonymous


"I told the doctor I broke my leg in two places. He told me to quit
going to those places."
 -- Henny Youngman


"Nancy Reagan fell down and broke her hair."
 -- Johnny Carson


"Keep your broken arm inside your sleeve."
 -- Chinese Proverb


"I broke my arm trying to fold a bed. It wasn't the kind that folds."
 -- Steven Wright


From Stettin in the Baltic to Trieste in the Adriatic, an iron curtain 
has descended across the continent.
 -- W. Churchill


"We can no more blame our loss of freedom on congressmen than we can
prostitution on pimps. Both simply provide broker services for their
customers."
 -- Dr. W Williams


"All national institutions of churches, whether Jewish, Christian, or
Turkish, appear to me no other than human inventions, set up to terrify 
and enslave mankind, and monopolize power and profit."
 -- Thomas Paine


"The three most dangerous things in the world are a programmer with
a soldering iron, a hardware type with a program patch and a user
with an idea."
 -- "The Wizardry Compiled" by Rick Cook


"He illustrated the power, which all historians learn to recognize,
of a good but simple idea pursued singlemindedly by a man of
implacable will."
 -- The historian Paul Johnson describing automobile pioneer Henry
    Ford. Ford built a quality product, the Model T, which he sold at
    a very low price ($360), paid his workers very high wages for an
    eight hour day, and made himself very wealthy. ("A History of the
    American People", 1997)


"Lots of folks confuse bad management with destiny."
 -- Kin Hubbard


"Many of us have heard opportunity knocking at our door, but by the
time we unhooked the chain, pushed back the bolt, turned two locks,
and shut off the burglar alarm - it was gone."
 -- Author Unknown


He was a wise man who invented God.
 -- Plato


Don't compromise yourself. You're all you've got.
 -- Janis Joplin


SITCOMs: What yuppies turn into when they have children and one of
them stops working to stay home with the kids. Stands for Single
Income, Two Children, Oppressive Mortgage.


"Having once decided to achieve a certain task, achieve it at all
costs of tedium and distaste. The gain in self-confidence of having
accomplished a tiresome labor is immense."
 -- Dr. Thomas Arnold Bennett


"While one person hesitates because he feels inferior, the other
is busy making mistakes and becoming superior."
 -- Henry C. Link


"Make things as simple as possible, but not simpler."
 -- Albert Einstein


"Power is the ability not to have to please."
 -- Elizabeth Janeway


"Why do they lock gas station bathrooms? Are they afraid someone will 
clean them?"
 -- Steven Wright


"In science it often happens that scientists say, 'You know that's a
really good argument; my position is mistaken,' and then they would
actually change their minds and you never hear that old view from them
again. They really do it. It doesn't happen as often as it should, because
scientists are human and change is sometimes painful. But it happens every
day. I cannot recall the last time someting like that happened in politics
or religion."
 -- Carl Sagan, 1987 CSICOP Keynote Address


"Illegal aliens have always been a problem in the United States.
Ask any Indian."
 -- Robert Orben


"Shame is not for you to feel. Guilt is not for you to feel. This is
not your generation."
 -- filmmaker STEVEN SPIELBERG, telling a room full of German high 
school students that they bear no responsibility for the Holocaust.


"The most beautiful emotion we can experience is the mystical. It is
the power of all true art and science. He to whom this emotion is a
stranger, who can no longer wonder and stand rapt in awe, is as good
as dead. To know that what is impenetrable to us really exists, manifesting
itself as the highest wisdom and the most radiant beauty, which our dull
faculties can comprehend only in their most primitive forms -- this
knowledge, this feeling, is at the center of true religiousness. In this
sense, and in this sense only, I belong to the rank of devoutly
religious men."
 -- Albert Einstein


"Never put off until run time what you can do at compile time."
 -- David Gries, in "Compiler Construction for Digital Computers",
    circa 1969.


"Without self knowledge, without understanding the working and
functions of his machine, man cannot be free, he cannot govern
himself and he will always remain a slave."
 -- George Gurdjieff


"Our problems are man-made, therefore they may be solved by man. And
man can be as big as he wants. No problem of human destiny is beyond
human beings."
 -- John F. Kennedy, speech at The American University, June 10, 1963


A chubby man with a white beard and a red suit will approach you soon.
Avoid him. He's a Commie.


'Isn't it a bit unnerving that doctors call what they do "practice?"'
 -- Steven Wright


"[Medicine is] a collection of uncertain prescriptions the results
of which, taken collectively, are more fatal than useful to mankind."
 -- Napoleon I


"The physician can bury his mistakes, but the architect can only
advise his client to plant vines - so they should go as far as
possible from home to build their first buildings."
 -- Frank Lloyd Wright, New York Times Magazine, October 4, 1953


"What do you do when you see an endangered animal eating an endangered
plant?"
 -- Steven Wright


REPORTER: Senator, are you for or against the MX missile system?
SENATOR:Bob, the MX missile system reminds me of an old saying that
the country folk in my state like to say. It goes like this: "You
can carry a pig for six miles, but if you set it down it might run
away." I have no idea why the country folk say this. Maybe there's
some kind of chemical pollutant in their drinking water. That is why
I pledge to do all that I can to protect the environment of this great
nation of ours, and put prayer back in the schools, where it belongs.
What we need is jobs, not empty promises. I realize I'm risking my
political career be being so outspoken on a sensitive issue such as 
the MX, but that's just the kind of straight-talking honest person
I am, and I can't help it.
 -- Dave Barry, "On Presidential Politics"


"The right to be let alone is indeed the beginning of all freedom."
 -- Supreme Court Justice William Orville Douglas


"It is easy to take liberty for granted when you have never had it
taken from you."
 -- M. Grundler


"Man invented language to satisfy his deep need to complain."
 -- Lily Tomlin


"...difference of opinion is advantageous in religion. The several
sects perform the office of a common censor morum over each other.
Is uniformity attainable? Millions of innocent men, women, and
children, since the introduction of Christianity, have been burnt,
tortured, fined, imprisoned; yet we have not advanced one inch
towards uniformity."
 -- Thomas Jefferson, "Notes on Virginia"


"If all those psychics know the winning lottery numbers, why are they
all still working?"
 -- Steven Wright


"Conscience is what hurts when everything else feels good."
 -- Unknown


"So-called Christian rock. . . . is a diabolical force undermining
Christianity from within."
 -- Jimmy Swaggart, hypocrite and TV preacher, self-described pornography
    addict.


"Happiness is not a station you arrive at, but a manner of traveling."
 -- Margaret Lee Runbeck


"Kids have *never* taken guidance from their parents. If you could
travel back in time and observe the original primate family in the
original tree, you would see the primate parents yelling at the
primate teenager for sitting around and sulking all day instead of
hunting for grubs and berries like dad primate. Then you'd see the
primate teenager stomp up to his branch and slam the leaves."
 -- Dave Barry, "Kids Today: They Don't Know Dum Diddly Do"


"A college education never hurt anybody who was willing to learn
after he got it."
 -- Author Unknown


"And whose cruel idea was it for the word "Lisp" to have a "S" in it?"
 -- Steven Wright


"All you need in this life is ignorance and confidence, and then
success is sure."
 -- Mark Twain (1835-1910)


"Live your life as an exclamation, not an explanation."
 -- Unknown


"Journalism largely consists of saying 'Lord Jones is Dead' to people
who never knew that Lord Jones was alive."
 -- G. K. Chesterton


"Is it true that cannibals don't eat clowns because they taste
funny?"
 -- Steven Wright


"Happiness is Planet Earth in your rear-view mirror."
 -- Sam Hurt


"If we knew what it was we were doing, it would not be called
research, would it?"
 -- Albert Einstein


"He that will not apply new remedies must expect new evils; for
time is the greatest innovator."
 -- Francis Bacon


"Man's mind stretched to a new idea never goes back to its original
dimensions."
 -- Oliver Wendell Holmes


"The worst moment for an atheist is when he feels grateful and has no
one to thank."
 -- Wendy Ward


"The trouble with born-again Christians is that they are an even
bigger pain the second time around."
 -- Herb Caen


"When there is no enemy within, the enemies outside cannot hurt you."
 -- African proverb


"It is not the fact of liberty but the way in which liberty is
exercised that ultimately determines whether liberty itself
survives... When liberty is taken away by force it can be restored
by force. When it is relinquished voluntarily by default it can never
be recovered."
 -- Dorothy Thompson, American journalist, author (1894-1961)


"If language is not correct, then what is said is not what is meant;
if what is said is not what is meant, then what must be done remains
undone; if this remains undone, morals and art will deteriorate; if
justice goes astray, the people will stand about in helpless
confusion. Hence there must be no arbitrariness in what is said. This
matters above everything."
 -- Confucius


"It is absurd to divide people into good and bad. People
are either charming or tedious."
 -- Oscar Wilde


"I think animal testing is a terrible idea; they get all nervous and
give the wrong answers."


"I woke up this morning, and I realized that somebody had broken
into my apartment, stolen all my things and replaced them with
exact duplicates. I asked my roommate if he noticed anything, and
he said, 'Who are you?'"
 --Steven Wright


"What other dungeon is so dark as one's own heart. What jailer so
inexorable as one's self?"
 -- Nathaniel Hawthorne


"Observe that for the programmer, as for the chef, the urgency of the
patron may govern the scheduled completion of the task, but it
cannot govern the actual completion. An omelette, promised in two
minutes, may appear to be progressing nicely. But when it has not set
in two minutes, the customer has two choices -- wait or eat it raw.
Software customers have had the same choices."
 -- Frederick P. Brooks, Jr, _The Mythical Man-Month_


"The best way to escape from a problem is to solve it."
 -- Alan Saporta


"A religion which requires persecution to sustain it is of the
devil's propagation."
 -- Hosea Ballou


"If people are good only because they fear punishment, and hope for
reward, then we are a sorry lot indeed."
 -- Albert Einstein


"The important thing in science is not so much to obtain new facts
as to discover new ways of thinking about them."
 -- Sir William Bragg


"A new idea is delicate. It can be killed by a sneer or a yawn; it
can be stabbed to death by a joke or worried to death by a frown
on the right person's brow."
 -- Charles Brower


"Only in quiet waters do things mirror themselves undistorted. Only
in a quiet mind is adequate perception of the world."
 -- Hans Margolius


"Language is not an abstract construction of the learned, or of dictionary
makers, but is something arising out of the work, needs, ties, joys,
affections, tastes, of long generations of humanity, and has its bases
broad and low, close to the ground."
 -- Noah Webster


"Don't part with your illusions. When they are gone you may still
exist but you have ceased to live."
 -- Mark Twain


"The longing to produce great inspirations didn't produce anything
but more longing."
 -- Sophie Kerr


"Everyone has talent. What is rare is the courage to follow the talent
to the dark place where it leads."
 -- Erica Jong


Fortune Cookies You'll Never See:

 * "Man who drop watch in toilet have shitty time."
 * "Man trapped in pantry have ass in jam."
 * "Virgin like balloon... one prick, all gone."
 * "Baseball wrong... man with four balls cannot walk!"
 * "Work to become, not to acquire."
 * "Baby conceived in automatic car shiftless bastard."
 * "A bird in hand makes hard to blow nose."
 * "Find old man in dark, not hard!"
 * "Man who smoke pot choke on handle."
 * "OK for shit to happen... will decompose."
 * "Man who put head on railroad track to listen for train likely to
    end up with splitting headache."
 * "Sailor who gets discharged from Navy leave buddies behind."
 * "Secretary becomes permanent fixture when screwed on desk."
 * "Don't drink and park, accidents cause people."
 * "He who crosses the ocean twice without washing
      is a dirty double-crosser."
 * "Man who tell one to many light bulb jokes soon burn out!"
 * "It takes many nails to build crib, but one screw to fill it."
 * "Never raise hands to angry child, it leave groin exposed."
 * "Woman who cooks carrots and peas in same pot is unsanitary."
 * "Man who eat many prunes, sit on toilet many moons."
 * "Confucius say too God damn much!"
 * "Those who quote me are fools."
 * "Man who drive like hell bound to get there!"
 * "Man who keep feet firmly on ground have trouble putting on
    pants!"
 * "Man who stand on toilet is high on pot!"
 * "Man who sit on tack get point!"
 * "Man who runs behind car gets exhausted!"
 * "Man who jump off cliff jump to conclusion!"
 * "War not determine who's right, only who's left."
 * "Woman who goes to man's apartment for snack, gets tidbit."
 * "Man who lay woman on ground, get piece on earth."
 * "Man who gets kicked in testicles, left holding the bag."
 * "Man who kisses girl's behind, gets crack in face."
 * "Passionate kiss like spider web...lead to undoing of fly."
 * "Man with holes in pants pockets, feels cocky all day."
 * "Man who fight with wife all day, get no piece at night."
 * "Kotex not best thing on earth, but next to best thing."
 * "Man who walk through airport door sideways is going to Bangkok."
 * "Man who take lady on camping trip, have one intent."


ONE LINERS...

Incontinence Hotline...Can you hold, please?
Lysdexia: a peech imspediment we live to learn with...
If only women came with pulldown menus and on-line help.
Would the Standing Committee please sit down?
43.3% of statistics are meaningless!
The difference between tax avoidance and evasion is 10 Years.
Circular Definition: see Definition, Circular.
A.A.A.A. - An organization for drunks who drive.
Madness takes its toll; please have exact change...
It said 'Insert disk #3,' but only two will fit.
For a REAL sponge cake, BORROW all the ingredients.
Why experiment on animals with so many lawyers out there?
Bacon & eggs - Hens are involved but pigs are committed.
Which is the nonsmoking lifeboat?
 |||||||//////__ __ __ __ __ The domino effect at work.
Originality is the art of concealing your sources.
Just fill out one simple form to win an IRS Audit!
Paper clips are the larval stage of coat hangers.
Grow your own Dope - Plant a Politician.
Contents may have settled out of court.
If idiots could fly, then this would be an airport.
A day without sunshine is like night.
A seminar on Time Travel will be held two weeks ago....
Would you trust a POLITICIAN to run the country?
Improve mail delivery ... mail the posties their pay!
Thank you for holding your breath while I smoke.
Treat each day as your last, one day you will be right.
Old is always fifteen years older than I am.
5 out of 4 people have trouble with fractions.
I am the root of some evil... send some money.
The buck doesn't even slow down here!
Don't assume malice for what stupidity can explain.
If you think talk is cheap, try hiring a lawyer.
Don't be sexist. Broads hate that.
Oh, no! Not ANOTHER learning experience!
The only cure for insomnia is to get more sleep.
Don't question authority..... It hasn't got a clue!!!!!
Advice is free: The right answer will cost plenty.
He who laughs last is SLOW.
Stupidity does not qualify as a handicap, park elsewhere!
Multitasking = screwing up several things at once.
Looking for a helping hand? There's one on your arm.
Don't take life too seriously, it's not permanent.
Don't Insult the Alligator till after you cross the river.
The trouble with political jokes is they get elected.
A conclusion is where you got tired of thinking.
Nothing's impossible for those who don't have to do it.
History is a set of lies agreed upon by the Victor.
After four decimal places, nobody cares.
One good turn gets all the blankets.
Almost all loan officers have artificial hearts.
Two can live as cheaply as one, for half as long.
A job is nice but it interferes with my life.
'Criminal Lawyer' is a redundancy.
Don't worry: the answer's at the back of the book.
A crowded elevator smells different to a midget.
Support the right to arm bears.
We do precision guesswork.
My life has a superb cast, but I can't figure out the plot.
Don't let school interfere with your education.
'Oh what a tangled web we weave' - Hair Club for Men.
Where there's a will, there's a lawsuit.
A penny saved is a Congressional oversight.
Smash forehead on keyboard to continue...
Shin - Device for finding furniture in the dark.
How does AVON find so many women willing to take orders?
Depression is merely anger without enthusiasm.
Eagles may soar, but weasels don't get sucked into jet engines.
I'm not cheap, but I am on special this week.
I drive way too fast to worry about cholesterol.
Mind Like A Steel Trap - Rusty And Illegal In 37 States.
Support bacteria -- they're the only culture some people have.
Televangelists: The Pro Wrestlers of religion.
The only substitute for good manners is fast reflexes.
When everything's coming your way, you're in the wrong lane.
If everything seems to be going well, you have obviously overlooked something. 
Many people quit looking for work when they find a job.
When I'm not in my right mind, my left mind gets pretty crowded.
Laughing stock: cattle with a sense of humor.
Black holes are where God divided by zero.
Make a speech interesting, say: I stand here before you to look
  behind you to tell you of something I know nothing about...


"Good communication is as stimulating as black coffee, and just as
hard to sleep after."
 -- Anne Morrow Lindbergh


"USA Today has come out with a new survey - apparently, three out of
every four people make up 75% of the population."
 -- David Letterman


"The Truth shall set you free... But first it will piss you off! "


"In order to keep a true perspective of one's importance, everyone
should have a dog that will worship him and a cat that will ignore him."
 -- Dereke Bruce, Taipei, Taiwan


"Don't accept your dog's admiration as conclusive evidence that you
are wonderful."
 -- Ann Landers


"I wonder if other dogs think poodles are members of a weird
religious cult."
 -- Rita Rudner


"The scientific name for an animal that doesn't either run from or
fight its enemies is lunch."
 -- Michael Friedman


"There is more religion in men's science, than there is science in
their religion."
 -- Henry David Thoreau


"Skeptical scrutiny is the means, in both science and religion,
by which deep insights can be winnowed from deep nonsense."
 -- Carl Sagan


"Obedience. A religion of slaves. A religion of intellectual death.
I like it. Don't ask questions, don't think, obey the Word of the
Lord -- as it has been conveniently brought to you by a man in a
Rolls with a heavy Rolex on his wrist. I like that job! Where can
I sign up?"
 -- Oleg Kiselev,oleg@cs.ucla.edu


"Thoughts lead on to purposes; purposes go forth in action; actions
form habits; habits decide character; and character fixes our destiny."
 -- Tyron Edwards


"The one function TV news performs very well is that when there is no
news we give it to you with the same emphasis as if there were."
 -- David Brinkley


"There is nothing more difficult to take in hand, more perilous to
conduct or more uncertain in its success than to take the lead in
the introduction of a new order of things."
 -- Niccolo Machiavelli, The Prince (1532)


"It's all right to tell a man to lift himself by his own bootstraps,
but it is a cruel jest to say to a bootless man that he ought to lift
himself by his own bootstraps."
 -- Martin Luther King, Jr. (1929-1968)


The Net interprets censorship as damage, and routes around it.
 -- John Gilmore


"Don't worry about people stealing your ideas. If your ideas are that
good, you'll have to ram them down people's throats."
 -- Howard Aiken


"The person who thinks there can be any real conflict between science and
religion must be either very young in science or very ignorant of religion."
 -- Joseph Henry, early American physicist


"Science advances funeral by funeral."
(Max Planck?)


"The skeptic will say, 'It may well be true that this system of
equations is reasonable from a logical standpoint, but this does not
prove that it corresponds to nature.' You are right, dear skeptic.
Experience alone can decide on truth."
 -- Albert Einstein


"Stocks have reached what looks like a permanently high plateau."
 -- Irving Fisher, Professor of Economics, Yale University, 1929


"Seize the moment of excited curiosity on any subject to solve your
doubts; for if you let it pass, the desire may never return, and you
may remain in ignorance."
 -- William Wirt


"Men are like steel. When they lose their temper, they lose their
worth."
 -- Chuck Norris


"My father was often angry when I was most like him."
 -- Lillian Hellman


"There is only one admirable form of the imagination: the imagination
that is so intense that it creates a new reality, that it makes
things happen."
 -- Sean O'Faolain


"One doesn't discover new lands without consenting to lose sight
of the shore for a very long time."
 -- Andre Gide


"In science one tries to tell people, in such a way as to be understood
by everyone, something that no one ever knew before. But in poetry,
it's the exact opposite."
 -- Paul Dirac (1902-1984)


Woe unto the world because of offenses! for it must needs be that
offenses come; but woe to that man by whom the offense cometh!
 -- KJV Bible, Matthew 18:7


"Men are punished by their sins, not for them."
 -- Elbert Hubbard


"Every revolution evaporates and leaves behind only the slime of a
new bureaucracy."
 -- Franz Kafka


"Language shapes the way we think, and determines what we can think about."
 -- B. L. Whorf


"There is no course of life so weak and sottish as that which is managed
by order, method, and discipline."
 -- Montaigne


If at first you don't succeed, destroy all evidence that you tried.
A clean desk is a sign of a cluttered desk drawer.
Everyone has a photographic memory. Some don't have film.
There's no future in time travel.
Tonight's weather: Dark with continued darkness until dawn.
Boycott shampoo! Demand the REAL poo!
Smith & Wesson: The original point and click interface.
Radioactive cats have 18 half-lives.
Who is General Failure and why is he reading my hard disk?
Energizer Bunny arrested, charged with battery.


"Anyone who wants to be paid for writing software is a fascist
asshole."
 -- Richard M. Stallman


"Obstacles cannot crush me. Every obstacle yields to stern resolve.
He who is fixed to a star does not change his mind."
 -- Leonardo DaVinci, Notebooks (c. 1500)


"The problems that exist in the world today cannot be solved by the
level of thinking that created them."
 -- Albert Einstein (1897-1955)


I need no warrant for being, and no word of sanction upon my being. I am
the warrant and the sanction.
 -- Ayn Rand, "Anthem"


"Evil is obvious only in retrospect."
 -- Gloria Steinem, Outrageous Acts and Everyday Rebellions, 1983


"If life doesn't offer a game worth playing, then invent a new one."
 -- Anthony J. D'Angelo, The College Blue Book


"Be not astonished at new ideas; for it is well known to you that
a thing does not therefore cease to be true because it is not
accepted by many."
 -- Spinoza


"There are two possible outcomes: If the result confirms the hypothesis,
then you've made a measurement. If the result is contrary to the
hypothesis, then you've made a discovery."
 -- Fermi


"In America, sex is an obsession; in other parts of the world it's a fact."
 -- Marlene Dietrich


"Sex between 2 people is a beautiful thing; between 5 it's fantastic ... "
 -- Woody Allen


"Obviously crime pays, or there'd be no crime."
 -- G. Gordon Liddy


"Now I know what a statesman is; he's a dead politician.
We need more statesmen."
 -- Bob Edwards


"Retirement kills more people than hard work ever did."
 -- Malcolm S. Forbes


"Dream as if you'll live forever. Live as if you'll die today."
 -- James Dean


111,111,111 x 111,111,111 = 12,345,678,987,654,321


"If I were punished for every pun I shed, there would not be
left a puny shed of my punnish head."
 -- Samuel Johnson


"Our constitution protects aliens, drunks and U.S. Senators."
 -- Will Rogers


"The fact that a believer is happier than a skeptic is no more to
the point than the fact than a drunken man is happier than a sober one."
 -- George Bernard Shaw (1856-1950)


"When I'm working on a problem, I never think about beauty. I think
only how to solve the problem. But when I have finished, if the
solution is not beautiful, I know it is wrong."
 -- Richard Buckminster Fuller


"The idea that is not dangerous is not worthy of being called
an idea at all."
 -- Elbert Hubbard


"Any medium powerful enough to extend man's reach is powerful enough
to topple his world. To get the medium's magic to work for one's
aims rather than against them is to attain literacy."
 -- Alan Kay, "Computer Software", Scientific American, September 1984


"Why does the Air Force need expensive new bombers? Have the people we've
been bombing over the years been complaining?"
 -- George Wallace


"Oil prices have fallen lately. We include this news for the benefit of gas
stations, which otherwise wouldn't learn of it for six months."
 -- Bill Tammeus, in Toronto's National Newspaper, 1991


"It is from numberless diverse acts of courage and belief that human
history is shaped. Each time a man stands up for an ideal, or acts to 
improve the lot of others, or strikes out against injustice, he sends 
forth a tiny ripple of hope, and crossing each other from a million 
different centers of energy and daring, those ripples build a current 
that can sweep down the mightiest walls of oppression and resistance."
 -- Robert F. Kennedy, South Africa, 1966


"The outward freedom that we shall attain will only be in exact proportion
to the inward freedom to which we may have grown at a given moment. And if
this is a correct view of freedom, our chief energy must be concentrated on
achieving reform from within."
 -- Gandhi


"The man who claims to be the boss in his own home will lie about other
things as well."
 -- Amish saying


"I wonder what goes through his mind when he sees us peeing in his
water bowl."
 -- Penny Ward Moser


You can't start worrying about what's going to happen. You get spastic
enough worrying about what's happening now.
 -- Lauren Bacall


"Creativity can solve almost any problem. The creative act, the defeat
of habit by originality, overcomes everything."
 -- George Lois


"Formerly, when religion was strong and science weak, men mistook
magic for medicine; now, when science is strong and religion weak,
men mistake medicine for magic."
 -- Thomas Szasz


"You can judge your age by the amount of pain you feel when
you come in contact with a new idea."
 -- Author Unknown


"The best way to keep children at home is to make the home
atmosphere pleasant --- and let the air out of their tires."
 -- Dorothy Parker


"A designer knows he has achieved perfection not when there is
nothing left to add, but when there is nothing left to take away."
 -- Antoine de Saint-Exupery


"If people only knew how hard I work to gain my mastery, it wouldn't
seem so wonderful at all."
 -- Michelangelo Buonarroti


"For those who say I can't impose my morality on others, I say just
watch me."
 -- Joseph Scheidler, Executive Director, Pro-Life Action League


"The greatest and noblest pleasure which men can have in this world
is to discover new truths; and the next is to shake off old prejudices."
 -- Frederick The Great


"Man is a dog's idea of what God should be."
 -- Holbrook Jackson


"Organized Religion is like Organized Crime; it preys on peoples'
weakness, generates huge profits for its operators, and is almost
impossible to eradicate."
 -- Mike Hermann (hermann@cs.ubc.ca)


"In a democracy dissent is an act of faith. Like medicine, the test of its
value is not in its taste, but in its effects."
 -- J. W. Fulbright


"The reason there is so little crime in Germany is that it's against the
law."
 -- Alex Levin


"An invasion of armies can be resisted, but not an idea whose time has
come."
 -- Victor Hugo, "Histoire d'un crime," 1852


"You can always spot a well informed man - his views are the same as
yours."
 -- Ilka Chase


"You pathetic jugglers never lowered yourselves to developing the
software. You should have paid a little more attention to R & D."
 -- Cyberpunk comics


"Those who will be able to conquer software will be able to conquer
the world."
 -- Tadahiro Sekimoto, president, NEC Corp.


"Software suppliers are trying to make their software packages more
'user-friendly'.... Their best approach, so far, has been to take all
the old brochures, and stamp the words, 'user-friendly' on the cover."
 -- Bill Gates


"Criminal: A person with predatory instincts who has not sufficient
capital to form a corporation."
 -- Howard Scott


"I've gone into hundreds of [fortune-teller's parlors], and have
been told thousands of things, but nobody ever told me I was a
policewoman getting ready to arrest her."
 -- New York City detective


"When you starve with a tiger, the tiger starves last."
 -- Griffin's Thought


"Trumpet in a herd of elephants; crow in the company of cocks;
bleat in a flock of goats."
 -- Malayan Proverb


"Did you ever walk into a room and forget why you walked in? I
think that is how dogs spend their lives."
 -- Sue Murphy


"There has been opposition to every innovation in the history of
man, with the possible exception of the sword."
 -- Benjamin Dana


"The biggest difference between time and space is that you can't
reuse time."
 -- Merrick Furst


"Injustice anywhere is a threat to justice everywhere."
 -- Martin Luther King, Jr.


"Only the winners decide what were war crimes."
 -- Gary Wills


"People demand freedom of speech as a compensation for the freedom
of thought which they seldom use."
 -- Kierkegaard


"Never doubt that a small group of thoughtful citizens can change the
world. Indeed, it is the only thing that ever has."
 -- Margaret Mead


"You believe that there is one God. Good! Even the demons believe
that - and shudder. "
 -- James 3:19 (The Bible, New International Version)


"Doubt is part of all religion. All the religious thinkers were
doubters."
 -- Isaac Bashevis Singer, New York Times Magazine, Mar. 12, 1978


"A great many people mistake opinions for thoughts."
 -- Herbert V. Prochnow


"Do not wait for leaders; do it alone, person to person."
 -- Mother Teresa


"Sex education classes in our public schools are promoting incest."
 -- Jimmy Swaggart, TV preacher, self-described pornography addict who 
paid prostitutes to commit "pornographic acts"


"To attract men, I wear a perfume called ``New Car Interior.''"
 -- Rita Rudner


"If you want to eat hippopotamus, you've got to pay the freight."
 -- attributed to an IBM guy, about why IBM software uses so much memory


"I knew then (in 1970) that a 4-kbyte minicomputer would cost as
much as a house. So I reasoned that after college, I'd have to live
cheaply in an apartment and put all my money into owning a computer."
 -- Apple co-founder Steve Wozniak


"Nobody realizes that some people expend tremendous energy merely
to be normal."
 -- Albert Camus


"Every now and then when your life gets complicated and the weasels
start closing in, the only cure is to load up on heinous chemicals
and then drive like a bastard from Hollywood to Las Vegas ... with
the music at top volume and at least a pint of ether."
 -- H.S. Thompson


"Honest, Officer, had I known my health stood in jeopardy I would
never had lit one."
 -- Maxim of the Hells Angels


"Researchers have discovered that chocolate produces some of the same
reactions in the brain as marijuana...The researchers also discovered
other similarities between the two, but can't remember what they are."
 -- Matt Lauer on NBC's 'Today' show


"Bad habits are like a comfortable bed, easy to get into, but
hard to get out of."
 -- Unknown


"Military justice is to justice what military music is to music."
 -- Groucho Marx


"Crime does not pay ... as well as politics."
 -- Alfred E. Newman


"I'm astounded by people who want to 'know' the universe when it's
hard enough to find your way around Chinatown."
 -- Woody Allen


"If you don't stand for something, you'll fall for everything."
 -- F. Jeff Stiles, Southern Baptist preacher


"I was brought up in that other service; but I knew from the first
that the Devil was my natural master and captain and friend. I saw
that he was in the right, and that the world cringed to his conqueror
only from fear."
 -- George Bernard Shaw, "The Devil's Disciple"


"In regards to Oral Roberts' claim that God told him that he would
die unless he received $20 million by March, God's lawyers have
stated that their client has not spoken with Roberts for several
years. Off the record, God has stated that "If I had wanted to ice
the little toad, I would have done it a long time ago."
 -- Dennis Miller, SNL News


"An object in possession seldom retains the same charm that it had
in pursuit."
 -- Gaius Plinius (c. 61-112 A.D.)


A Difficulty for Every Solution.
 -- Motto of the Federal Civil Service


"I can't understand why people are frightened of new ideas. I'm
frightened of the old ones."
 -- John Cage


"Outer space is no place for a person of breeding."
 -- Lady Violet Bonham Carter


"For NASA, space is still a high priority."
 -- Vice President Dan Quayle, 9/5/90


"Space isn't remote at all. It's only an hour's drive away if
your car could go straight upwards."
 -- Fred Hoyle


We Are Surrounded By An Insurmountable Opportunity.


"I think my new thing will be to try to be a real happy guy. I'll
just walk around being real happy until some jerk says something
stupid to me."
 -- Jack Handey


"Honest criticism is hard to take, particularly from a
relative, a friend, an acquaintance, or a stranger."
 -- Franklin P. Jones


"The worst-tempered people I've ever met were the people who
knew they were wrong."
 -- Wilson Mizner


"I have learnt silence from the talkative, toleration from the
intolerant, and kindness from the unkind; yet strange, I am
ungrateful to these teachers."
 -- Kahlil Gibran


"Nature magically suits a man to his fortunes, by making them
the fruit of his character."
 -- Ralph Waldo Emerson


"In ecology, as in economics, TANSTAAFL (There Ain't No Such
Thing As A Free Lunch) is intended to warn that every gain
is won at some cost. Failure to recognize the "no free lunch"
law causes the buffalo-hunter mentality syndrome -- the unthinking
assumption that there will always be plenty because there always
has been plenty."
 -- Dr. Robert W. Prehoda


"In nature there are neither rewards nor punishment - there
are consequences."
 -- Col. Robert Ingersoll


"36 percent of the American Public believes that boiling radioactive
milk makes it safe to drink."
 -- results of a survey by Jon Miller at Northern Illinois University


"The release of atomic energy has not created a new problem. It has
merely made more urgent the necessity of solving an existing one."
 -- Albert Einstein (1879-1955)


"When you live in the shadow of insanity, the appearance of another
mind that thinks and talks as yours does is something close to a
blessed event."
 -- R. Pirsig


"The leader has to be practical and a realist, yet must talk the
language of the visionary and the idealist."
 -- Eric Hoffer


"No one has a finer command of language than the person who keeps
his mouth shut."
 -- Sam Rayburn (1882-1961)


"The First Amendment is often inconvenient. But that is besides the
point. Inconvenience does not absolve the government of its
obligation to tolerate speech."
 -- Justice Anthony Kennedy


"We have enough religion to hate each other, but not enough to
love each other."
 -- Jonathan Swift


"You who hate the Jews so, why did you adopt their religion?"
 -- Friedrich Nietzsche, addressing anti-semitic Christians


"There is no kind of dishonesty into which otherwise good people
more easily and frequently fall than that of defrauding the government."
 -- Benjamin Franklin


"Honesty is a good thing, but it is not profitable to its possessor
unless it is kept under control."
 -- Don Marquis


"The best measure of a man's honesty isn't his income tax
return. It's the zero adjust on his bathroom scale."
 -- Arthur C. Clarke


"It is in vain, sir, to extenuate the matter. Gentlemen may cry,
Peace, Peace--but there is no peace. The war is actually begun! The
next gale that sweeps from the north will bring to our ears the clash
of resounding arms! Our brethren are already in the field! Why stand
we here idle? What is it that gentlemen wish? What would they have?
Is life so dear, or peace so sweet, as to be purchased at the price of
chains and slavery? Forbid it, Almighty God! I know not what course
others may take; but as for me, give me liberty or give me death!"
 -- Patrick Henry


"Programming today is a race between software engineers striving to
build bigger and better idiot-proof programs, and the Universe
trying to produce bigger and better idiots. So far, the Universe
is winning."
 -- Rich Cook


"Oh, come on. If you can't laugh at the walking dead, who
can you laugh at?"
 -- Dan Fielding


"When you have solved all mysteries of life you long for death,
for it is but another mystery of life."
 -- Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]


"What is laid down, ordered, factual is never enough to embrace
the whole truth: life always spills over the rim of every cup."
 -- Boris Pasternak


"To punish me for my contempt for authority, fate made me an
authority myself."
 -- Albert Einstein


"A cap of good acid costs five dollars and for that you can hear
the Universal Symphony with God singing solo and the Holy Ghost
on drums."
 -- Hunter S. Thompson


"No punishment of the unrighteous has ever been too severe in the
eyes of the righteous."
 -- Author Unknown


"Men are rewarded or punished not for what they do but for how their
acts are defined. That is why men are more interested in better
justifying themselves than in better behaving themselves."
 -- Thomas S. Szasz


"Charles V. said that a man who knew four languages was worth four men; and
Alexander the Great so valued learning, that he used to say he was more
indebted to Aristotle for giving him knowledge than to his father Philip
for giving him life."
 -- Lord Macaulay


"The policy of being too cautious is the greatest risk of all."
 -- Jawaharlal Nehru


"No man is an island entire of itself. Every man is a part of the continent,
a piece of the whole...if a clod be washed away by the sea, Europe is the
less. Any man's death diminishes me because I'm involved in mankind.
Therefore, never send to know for whom the bell tolls, it tolls for thee."
 -- John Donne


"You know why there are so few sophisticated computer terrorists in
the United States? Because your hackers have so much mobility into
the establishment. Here, there is no such mobility. If you have the
slightest bit of intellectual integrity you cannot support the
government.... That's why the best computer minds belong to the
opposition."
 -- an anonymous member of the outlawed Polish trade union, Solidarity


Real-Life Courtroom Quote:
 - "When he went, had you gone and had she, if she wanted to and were
able, for the time being excluding all the restraints on her not to
go, gone also, would he have brought you, meaning you and she, with
him to the station?"
 - "Objection. That question should be taken out and shot."


"To his dog, every man is Napoleon; hence the constant popularity
of dogs."
 -- Aldous Huxley


Children seldom misquote you. In fact, they usually repeat word for
word what you shouldn't have said.


"Being disintegrated makes me ve-ry an-gry!" <huff, huff>


"If I have ever made any valuable discoveries, it has been owing
more to patient observation than to any other reason."
 -- Isaac Newton


"I believe that a scientist looking at nonscientific problems
is just as dumb as the next guy."
 -- Richard Feynman


"The shortest answer is the doing of the thing."


"We've learned how to destroy, but not to create; how to
waste, but not to build; how to kill men, but not how to
save them; how to die, but seldom how to live."
 -- General Omar Nelson Bradley


"If you go on with this nuclear arms race, all you are going
to do is make the rubble bounce."
 -- Winston Churchill (1874-1965)


"If your morals make you dreary, depend on it, they are wrong."
 -- Robert Louis Stevenson


"The art of medicine consists in amusing the patient while nature
cures the disease."
 -- Voltaire


"I was looking for Leonardo da Vinci's book on anatomy. I learned
a lot about anatomy but didn't find the book."
 -- ROLLING STONES guitarist KEITH RICHARDS, on how he fell and
   broke two ribs in his home library.


"Leadership is getting someone to do what they don't want to do
in order to achieve what they want to achieve."
 -- Tom Landry


"Cover a war in a place where you can't drink beer or talk to a woman?
Hell no!"
 -- Hunter S. Thompson, on the US war against Iraq


"Giving money and power to the government is like giving whiskey and
car keys to teenage boys."
 -- P. J. O'Rourke


"Think like a wise man but communicate in the language of the people."
 -- William Butler Yeats


"The phrases that men hear or repeat continually, end by becoming
convictions and ossify the organs of intelligence."
 -- Johann Wolfgang Von Goethe


"Laziness is nothing more than the habit of resting before you
get tired."
 -- Jules Renard


"It has been my observation that most people get ahead during the
time that others waste."
 -- Henry Ford


"It is our relation to circumstances that determines their
influence over us. The same wind that carries one vessel into
port may blow another off shore."
 -- Christian Bovee


"It is easier to get forgiveness than permission."
 -- Stuart's Law of Retroaction


"It is something to be able to paint a particular picture, or to
carve a statue, and so to make a few objects beautiful; but it
is far more glorious to carve and paint the very atmosphere and
medium through which we look, which morally we can do. To affect
the quality of the day, that is the highest of arts."
 -- Henry David Thoreau, "Where I Live"


"To the habitual reader, reading is a drug of which he is
the slave; deprive him of printed matter and he grows
nervous, moody, and restless; then, like the alcoholic
bereft of brandy who will drink shellac or methylated
spirit, he will make do with the advertisements of a paper
five years old; he will make do with a telephone directory."
 -- W. Somerset Maugham, "The Bum"


"Habits are cobwebs at first; cables at last."
 -- Chinese Proverb


* The fundamental job of a toddler is to rule the universe. *


* You look like you can handle yourself in bed. And often do. *


"I believe that sex is one of the most beautiful, natural, wholesome
 things that money can buy."
 -- Steve Martin


"Sex is hereditary. If your parents never had it, chances are you
wont either."
 -- Joseph Fischer


"Resist, expose, or stop immediately every public school or group sex
education program, no matter what it is called or how it is diffused
into the curriculum."
 -- Fr. Paul Marx, President, Human Life International, as quoted in
   "The Far Right, Speaking For Themselves," a Planned Parenthood pamphlet


Non-violence is the policy of the vegetable kingdom.
 -- H. G. Wells


"We can lie in the language of dress or try to tell the truth;
but unless we are naked and bald, it is impossible to be silent."
 -- Alison Lurie


"It says he made us all to be just like him. So if we're dumb, then
god is dumb, and maybe even a little ugly on the side."
 -- Frank Zappa


In Christianity neither morality nor religion come into contact
with reality at any point.
 -- Friedrich Nietzsche


Every normal man must be tempted at times to spit on his hands, hoist
the black flag, and begin slitting throats.
 -- H.L. Mencken


"You've got to be taught before it's too late,
Before you are six or seven or eight,
To hate all the people your relatives hate;
You've got to be carefully taught!"
 -- Rodgers & Hammerstein, from "South Pacific"


"Hello. My pid is Iniego_Montoya. You kill -9 my parent process.
Prepare to vi."
 -- Brice, in a.c.


"You've got to find what you like and let it kill you."


"St. Peter," said God, indicating the workbench, "hand me a bunch of those
ganglia for the genitalia. I want them screaming my *name* when they do
it."
(The gospel according to Elocutus)
 -- Elocutus, in a.c.


"Jails and prisons are the complement of schools; so many less as
you have of the latter, so many more must you have of the former."
 -- Horace Mann


"I'm not happy until I've violated somebody's civil rights and
then put them in jail. ... That ruins their day ... but it makes
mine."
 -- Christopher Commission report of LAPD car-to-car computer message, 7/91


It is not enough to succeed. Others must fail.
 -- Gore Vidal


The human race has been fascinated by sharks for as long as I can
remember. Just like the bluebird feeding its young, or the spider
struggling to weave its perfect web, or the buttercup blooming in
spring, the shark reveals to us yet another of the infinite and
wonderful facets of nature, namely the facet that it can bite your head
off. This causes us humans to feel a certain degree of awe.
 -- Dave Barry, "The Wonders of Sharks on TV"


program (pro'-gram) [n] A magic spell cast over a computer
allowing it to turn one's input into error messages.


"Internet is a good way to get on the Net."
 -- Bob Dole


To conquer without risk is to triumph without glory.
 -- Pierre Corneille, "Le Cid", 1636


"It is better to be violent, if there is violence in our hearts,
than to put on the cloak of nonviolence to cover impotence."
 -- Mohandas K. Gandhi


"If a person offend you and you are in doubt as to whether
it was intentional or not, do not resort to extreme measures.
Simply watch your chance and hit him with a brick."
 -- Mark Twain, "Advice to Youth" Speech, 1882


The Gods Send Thread For the Web Begun.


"In Paris they simply stared when I spoke to them in French; I never did
succeed in making those idiots understand their language."
 -- Mark Twain (1835-1910)


"Own only what you can carry with you; know language, know countries, know
people. Let your memory be your travel bag."
 -- Alexander Solzhenitsyn


"When I have been asked during these last weeks who caused the riots and
the killing in L.A., my answer has been direct and simple: Who is to blame
for the riots? The rioters are to blame. Who is to blame for the killings?
The killers are to blame".
 -- Dan Quayle, Former U.S. Vice President (1947-)


"There is no law of progress. Our future is in our own hands, to make
or to mar. It will be an uphill fight to the end, and would we have
it otherwise? Let no one suppose that evolution will ever exempt us
from struggles. 'You forget,' said the Devil, with a chuckle, 'that
I have been evolving too.'"
 -- William Ralph Inge


"A cult is a religion with no political power."
 -- Tom Wolfe


"An atheist is a man who has no invisible means of support."
 -- John Buchan


"Knowledge is a process of piling up facts; wisdom lies in their
simplification".
 -- Martin H. Fischer


"Why is it when we talk to God we're praying -- but when God
talks to us, we're schizophrenic?"
 -- Lily Tomlin


"Vacant minds must have their uses, yet it seems a pity to waste
first-class bodies on them."
 -- Author Unknown


"If it weren't for my lawyer, I'd still be in prison. It went a
lot faster with two people digging."
 -- Mister Boffo


Parallel lines never meet, unless you bend one or both of them.


"The greater the difficulty the more glory in surmounting it.
Skillful pilots gain their reputation from storms and tempests."
 -- Epicurus


Seize the day. Then go back to bed.


"We have no more Jesus Christ symbols, we have no more Gandhi symbols.
The only symbols left are the movie stars ... who play the heroes in
the movies. It has come to that."
 -- Ateneo De Manila, a sociology professor, on the plethora of movie stars
    and media celebrities running for public office in the Philippines.


"The law, in its majestic equality, forbids the rich as well as
the poor to sleep under bridges, to beg in the streets, and to
steal bread."
 -- Anatole France


"For every human problem, there is a neat, simple solution;
it is always wrong."
 -- Mencken's Metalaw


"We will rediscover a [New York City] river so extravagantly
polluted that new life forms will emerge from it spontaneously,
demanding welfare and voting rights."
 -- Douglas Adams


"I am I plus my surroundings and if I do not preserve the latter,
I do not preserve myself."
 -- Jose Ortega Y Gasset [Meditations on Quixote] (1883-1955)


"If I could drop dead right now, I'd be the happiest man alive."
 -- Samuel Goldwyn


"But better die than live mechanically a life that is a repetition
of repetitions."
 -- D. H. Lawrence


"I don't think anyone should write their autobiography until
after they're dead."
 -- Samuel Goldwyn


"It is not in giving life but in risking life that man is raised
above the animal; that is why superiority has been accorded in
humanity not to the sex that brings forth but to that which kills."
 -- Simone de Beauvoir, The Second Sex (1950)


"You do not destroy an idea by killing people; you replace it
with a better one."
 -- Edward Keating


"Political language. . . is designed to make lies sound truthful and murder
respectable, and to give an appearance of solidity to pure wind."
 -- George Orwell


"We need a president who's fluent in at least one language."
 -- Buck Henry


"It is often easier to fight for one's principles that to live
up to them."
 -- Adlai E. Stevenson


"I believe in God, only I spell it Nature."
 -- Frank Lloyd Wright


"Our lives begin to end the day we become silent about things that matter."
 -- Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.


"We find that the sexual instinct, when disappointed and unappeased,
frequently seeks and finds a substitute in religion."
 -- Baron Richard Von Krafft-Ebing


"Do you know what a pessimist is? A person who thinks everybody
as nasty as himself, and hates them for it."
 -- George Bernard Shaw


"It is human nature to hate him whom you have injured."
 -- Tacitus


"It is proof of a base and low mind for one to wish to think with the
masses or majority, merely because the majority is the majority. Truth
does not change because it is, or is not, believed by a majority of the
people."
 -- Giordano Bruno


"Peace proposals unaccompanied by a sworn covenant indicate a plot."
 -- Sun Tzu [The Art of War]


"Laws do not persuade just because they threaten."
 -- Seneca, 65 AD


"This country has come to feel the same when Congress is
in session as when the baby gets hold of a hammer."
 -- Will Rogers (1879-1935)


"To be stupid, selfish, and have good health are three requirements
for happiness, though if stupidity is lacking, all is lost."
 -- Gustave Flaubert


"Some people lose their health getting wealth and then lose their
wealth gaining health."
 -- Author Unknown


"The average, healthy, well-adjusted adult gets up at seven-thirty
in the morning feeling just plain terrible."
 -- Jean Kerr


"I know of no more encouraging fact than the unquestionable ability
of man to elevate his life by conscious endeavor."
 -- Henry David Thoreau


"What Every Computer Consultant Needs to Know: 1) In case of
doubt, make it sound convincing. 2) Do not believe in miracles.
Rely on them."
 -- Murphy's Computer Laws (Finagle's Rules)


Health nuts are going to feel stupid someday, lying in hospitals dying
of nothing.
 -- Redd Foxx


"A sparkling house is a fine thing if the children aren't
robbed of their luster in keeping it that way."
 -- Marcelene Cox


"Life is a great big canvas, and you should throw all the paint
on it you can."
 -- Danny Kaye


"Painting: The art of protecting flat surfaces from the weather
and exposing them to the critic."
 -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"


"There is no excellent beauty that hath not some strangeness
in the proportion."
 -- Francis Bacon


"The United States is a nation of laws: badly written and randomly
enforced."
 -- Frank Zappa


"The trouble with fighting for human freedom is that one spends most
of one's time defending scoundrels. For it is against scoundrels
that oppressive laws are first aimed, and oppression must be stopped
at the beginning if it is to be stopped at all."
 -- H. L. Mencken


"If God lived on earth, people would break his windows."
 -- Jewish proverb


"The worst thing about Europe is that you can't go out in the middle
of the night and get a Slurpee."
 -- Tellis Frank


"To you I'm an atheist; to God, I'm the Loyal Opposition."
 -- Woody Allen


"Many a zero thinks it is the ellipse on which the Earth travels."
 -- Stanislaw Lem


"The only people who find what they are looking for in life are the
fault finders."
 -- Foster's Law


"The fact is, that civilization requires slaves. The Greeks were
quite right there. Unless there are slaves to do the ugly, horrible,
uninteresting work, culture, and contemplation become almost
impossible. Human slavery is wrong, insecure, and demoralizing.
On mechanical slavery, on the slavery of the machine, the future
of the world depends."
 -- Oscar Wilde


"Analyzing humor is like dissecting a frog. Few people are interested
and the frog dies of it."
 -- E. B. White


"I'm too shy to express my sexual needs except over the phone
to people I don't know."
 -- Garry Shandling


"Tonight, when we were eating dinner, Marta said something that really
knocked me for a loop. She said, "I love carrots." "Good," I said as
I gritted my teeth real hard. "Then maybe you and carrots would like
to go into the bedroom and have sex!" They didn't, but maybe they will
sometime, and I can watch."
 -- Jack Handey


"Probably the question asked most often is: Do one-celled animals
have orgasms? The answer is yes, they have orgasms almost constantly,
which is why they don't mind living in pools of warm slime.
 -- Dave Barry, "Sex and the Single Amoeba: What Every Teen Should Know"


"Sex is a bad thing because it rumples the clothes."
 -- Jackie Onassis


"There is no good arguing with the inevitable. The only argument
available with an east wind is to put on your overcoat."
 -- James Russell Lowell


"Criminals do not die by the hands of the law. They die by the
hands of other men."
 -- George Bernard Shaw


"If you meet the Buddha on the net, put him in your kill file."
 -- Robert Firth


"I don't know that atheists should be considered citizens, nor should
they be considered patriots. This is one nation under God."
 -- George Bush in Free Inquiry magazine, Fall 1988


"If you give me six lines written by the most honest man, I will
find something in them to hang him."
 -- Cardinal de Richelieu (and any KGB agent)


"Anarchy - it's not the law, it's just a good idea."


"Where there is no vision, the people perish."
 -- Proverbs 29:18


"Once a newspaper touches a story, the facts are lost forever,
even to the protagonists."
 -- Norman Mailer


"Each has his past shut in him like the leaves of a book known
to him by heart and his friends can only read the title.
 -- Virginia Woolf


"If you consult enough experts, you can confirm any opinion."
 -- Unknown


"Toe: A part of the foot used to find furniture in the dark."
 --Rilla May


"The young do not know enough to be prudent, and therefore
they attempt the impossible -- and achieve it, generation
after generation."
 -- Pearl S. Buck


"Fundamentalists are to Christianity what paint-by-numbers is to art."
 -- Robin Tyler


"Many a doctrine is like a window pane. We see truth through it
but it divides us from truth."
 -- Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931)


"I don't want to get to the end of my life and find that I lived
just the length of it. I want to have lived the width of it as well.
 -- Diane Ackerman


"The only way I can lose this election is if I'm caught in
bed with a dead girl or a live boy."
 -- Louisiana governor Edwin Edwards


"Take time to deliberate, but when the time for action has arrived,
stop thinking and go in."
 -- Napoleon Bonaparte


"Love your country but never trust its government."
 -- from a hand-painted road sign in central Pennsylvania


"There's so much pollution in the air now that if it weren't for
our lungs there'd be no place to put it all."
 -- Robert Orben


"It shouldn't be too much of a surprise that the Internet has
evolved into a force strong enough to reflect the greatest hopes
and fears of those who use it. After all, it was designed to
withstand nuclear war, not just the puny huffs and puffs of
politicians and religious fanatics."
 -- Denise Caruso (digital commerce columnist, New York Times)


"The only function of economic forecasting is to make astrology
look respectable."
 -- John Kenneth Galbraith


"Technology is dominated by two types of people: those who
understand what they do not manage, and those who manage what
they do not understand."
 -- Unknown


"I learned this, at least, by my experiment: that if one advances confidently
in the direction of his dreams, and endeavors to live the life which he has
imagined, he will meet with a success unexpected in common hours."
 -- Henry David Thoreau, "Walden"


"Conceal a flaw, and the world will imagine the worst."
 -- Martial


I think that if most guys in America could somehow get their fave-rave
poster girl in bed and have total license to do whatever they wanted with 
this legendary body for one afternoon, at least 75 percent of the guys in 
the country would elect to beat her up.
 -- Lester Bangs (1948-82), U.S. rock journalist


When you see something that is technically sweet, you go ahead and do it
and you argue about what to do about it only after you have had your technical
success. That is the way it was with the atomic bomb.
 -- J. Robert Oppenheimer


It comes to pass oft that a terrible oath, with a swaggering accent sharply
twang'd off, gives manhood more approbation than ever proof itself would
have earned him.
 -- William Shakespeare


Grant me some wild expressions, Heavens, or I shall burst.
 -- George Farquhar


There is nothing makes a man suspect much, more than to know little.
 -- Francis Bacon


Suspicion is not less an enemy to virtue than to happiness; he that
is already corrupt is naturally suspicious, and he that becomes
suspicious will quickly be corrupt.
 -- Joseph Addison


"A thousand cups of wine do not suffice when true friends meet,
but half a sentence is too much when there is no meeting of minds."
 -- Chinese proverb


"Be not afraid of growing slowly, be afraid only of
standing still."
 -- Chinese Proverb


"The reverse side also has a reverse side."
 -- Japanese proverb


"War is a series of catastrophes that results in a victory."
 -- Georges Clemenceau


"Somebody has to do something, and it's just incredibly
pathetic that it has to be us."
 -- Jerry Garcia (of the Grateful Dead)


"Remember, people will judge you by your actions, not your
intentions. You may have a heart of gold -- but so does a
hard-boiled egg."
 -- Unknown


"I am astounded ... at the wonderful power you have developed - and
terrified at the thought that so much hideous and bad music may be
put on record forever."
 -- Arthur Sullivan, on seeing a demonstration of Edison's new talking
    machine in 1888


"When you're riding in a time machine way far into the future, don't
stick your elbow out the window, or it'll turn into a fossil."
 -- Jack Handey


"The country needs and, unless I mistake its temper, the country
demands bold, persistent, experimentation. It is common sense to
take a method and try it, if it fails, admit it frankly and try
another. But above all, try something."
 -- Theodore Roosevelt


"Natural ability without education has more often raised a man
to glory and virtue than education without natural ability."
 -- Cicero


"We cannot glimpse the essential life of a caged animal, only
the shadow of [her] former beauty."
 -- Julia Allen Field [Reflections on the Death of an Elephant]


"It's too bad that whole families have to be torn apart
by something as simple as wild dogs."
 -- Jack Handey


"Life is hard. After all, it kills you."
 -- Katherine Hepburn


"A killer stalks the halls of my high school. Innocent cheerleaders
die by knife. Teachers lock the classroom doors. I must find him,
or I'll flunk."
 -- From a poem by Peggy Nadramia


"It's a small world, but I wouldn't want to paint it."
 -- Steven Wright


"Van Gogh became a painter because he had no ear for music."
 -- Nikki Harris


"If I hadn't started painting, I would have raised chickens."
 -- Grandma Moses


"Humor is just another defense against the universe."
 -- Mel Brooks


"There can be no offense where none is taken."
 -- Japanese proverb


"Nothing shocks me more in the men of religion and their flocks
than their pretensions to be the only religious people."
 -- Jean Guehenno


"Religion is a man using a divining rod. Philosophy is a man using
a pick and shovel."


"All humanity is passion; without passion, religion, history,
novels, art would be ineffectual."
 -- Honore De Balzac


"Man is certainly stark mad; he cannot make a flea, yet he makes
gods by the dozens."
 -- Michel De Montaigne


 'A verbal contract isn't worth the paper it's written on. '
 -- Samuel Goldwyn


"The pain of dispute exceeds, by much, its utility. All
disputation makes the mind deaf, and when people are
deaf I am dumb."
 -- Joseph Joubert


"I never cease being dumbfounded by the unbelievable
things people believe".
 -- Leo Rosten


"Our achievements speak for themselves. What we have to keep track
of are our failures, discouragements and doubts. We tend to forget
the past difficulties, the many false starts, and the painful groping.
We see our past achievements as the end results of a clean forward
thrust, and our present difficulties as signs of decline and decay."
 -- Eric Hoffer


"Bill Gates says no matter how much more power we can supply, he'll
develop some really exciting software that will bring the machine
to its knees."
 -- Intel VP David House, In _EE_Times_, 16 October 1989


"It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick
society."
 -- Krishnamurti


"I can picture in my mind a world without war, a world without hate.
And I can picture us attacking that world, because they'd never expect it."
 -- kson@apk.net


"If we don't change our direction we're likely to end up where
we're headed."
 -- Chinese Proverb


"You can't say that civilizations don't advance, however, for in every war
they kill you in a new way."
 -- Will Rogers


"In parts of the world, people still pray in the streets.
In this country they're called pedestrians."
 -- Gloria Pitzer


"In the republic of mediocrity genius is dangerous."
 -- Robert G. Ingersoll


"A myth is a religion in which no one any longer believes."
 -- James Feibleman


"To become a popular religion, it is only necessary for a superstition
to enslave a philosophy."
 -- William Ralph Inge, 1920


"It is not God's will merely that we should be happy, but that we
should make ourselves happy."
 -- Immanuel Kant


Whatsoever thy hand findeth to do, do it with thy might; for there
is no work, nor device, nor knowledge, nor wisdom, in the grave,
whither thou goest.
 -- Ecclesiastes, 9:10


"When politics and religion are intermingled, a people is suffused
with a sense of invulnerability, and gathering speed in their
forward charge, they fail to see the cliff ahead of them."
 -- Frank Herbert


"It is a mistake to suppose that God is only, or even chiefly,
concerned with religion."
 -- Archbishop William Temple, 1955


"Laughter is the shortest distance between two people."
 -- Victor Borge


"One machine can do the work of fifty ordinary men. No machine
can do the work of one extraordinary man."
 -- Elbert Hubbard


"The real problem is not whether machines think but whether men do."
 -- B. F. Skinner


"Don't think; let the machine do it for you!"
 -- E. C. Berkeley


"If a machine can be made so that an idiot can use it, then only
an idiot will use it."
 -- Tadao Ichikawa


"Man is not a machine... Although man most certainly processes
information, he does not necessarily process it in the way computers
do. Computers and men are not species of the same genus... However
much intelligence computers may attain, now or in the furture, theirs
must always be an intelligence alien to genuine human problems and
concerns."
 -- Joseph Weizenbaum


"If it bleeds, you can kill it."
 -- Predator


"If rich people could hire other people to die for them, the
poor could make a wonderful living."
 -- Yiddish Proverb


"So long as governments set the example of killing their enemies,
private citizens will occasionally kill theirs."
 -- Elbert Hubbard


"The worst thing is when you have to kill someone you love
because they're SATAN."
 -- Judy Tenuta


"The secret of man's being is not only to live but to have something
to live for."
 -- F. Dostoyevsky


If you want to build a ship, don't drum up people together to collect
wood and don't assign them tasks and work, but rather teach them to long
for the endless immensity of the sea.
 -- Antoine de Saint Exupery


If you want to build a man, don't gather up skin and bone. Inspire a
mind to seek its own greatness, and help with advice, council, and
support. 
 -- William C. Gawne


THEORY
Into love and out again,
Thus I went and thus I go.
Spare your voice, and hold your pen:
Well and bitterly I know
All the songs were ever sung,
All the words were ever said;
Could it be, when I was young,
Someone dropped me on my head?
 -- Dorothy Parker


Love is a fire. But whether it is going to warm your hearth or
burn down your house, you can never tell.
 -- Joan Crawford


"One of the most difficult things to contend with in a hospital is
that assumption on the part of the staff that because you have lost
your gall bladder you have also lost your mind."
 -- Jean Kerr


"My doctor told me to stop having intimate dinners for four. Unless
there are three other people."
 -- Orson Welles


While there is a chance of the world getting through its
troubles, I hold that a reasonable man has to behave as
though he were sure of it. If at the end your cheerfulness
is not justified, at any rate you will have been cheerful.
 -- H.G. Wells


"Only two things are infinite, the universe and human stupidity,
and I'm not sure about the former."
 -- Albert Einstein


"Nobody can be exactly like me. Sometimes even I have trouble
doing it."
 -- Tallulah Bankhead


"I do not want people to be agreeable, as it saves me the
trouble of liking them."
 -- Jane Austen


I did not know
Until you walked away
You had the perfect ass
Forgive me
For not falling in love
With your face or your conversation
 -- Leonard Cohen, "The Energy of Slaves"


Symbolic representation of quantitative entities is doomed to
its rightful place of minor importance in a world where
flowers and beautiful women abound.
 -- Albert Einstein


The personal computer market is about the same size as the
total potato chip market. Next year it will be about half the
size of the pet food market and is fast approaching the total
worldwide sales of panty hose.
 -- James Finke, President, Commodore International Ltd. (1982)


Is it OK to yell 'MOVIE' in a crowded firehouse?


Cuisine: something like food, but the portions are smaller
and the prices are higher. If it's French cuisine, the waiter
will insult you as you are served.


You can pretend to be serious; you can't pretend to be witty.
 -- Sacha Guitry


Reason can answer questions, but imagination has to ask
them.
 -- Ralph Gerard


The other day, I dropped a piece of bread and it fell butter
side up. I was convinced that I'd buttered the wrong side of
the bread.


Innkeeper! I'll have what the man on the chandelier is having!


In this chapter, the present tense includes the past and
future tenses, and the future, the present; the masculine
gender includes the feminine, and the feminine, the
masculine, and the singular includes the plural, and the
plural the singular.
 -- Code of Dept. of Consumer Affairs, CA


"Few things are needful to make the wise man happy, but nothing
satisfies the fool; and this is the reason why so many of mankind
are miserable."
 -- Duc Francois de La Rochefoucauld


Piss off, you pretentious little git. Carl Lydick was
informative and entertaining - 50 of you would merely make a
thicket.
 -- Terry Smith, in a.c.


Tyranny, like hell, is not easily conquered; yet we have this consolation
with us, that the harder the conflict, the more glorious the triumph.
What we obtain too cheap, we esteem too lightly: it is dearness only that
gives every thing its value.
 -- Thomas Paine


Silly rabbit... Tricks are for HOOKERS!


"Moral excellence comes about as a result of habit. We become just by
doing just acts, temperate by doing temperate acts, brave by doing brave 
acts."
 -- Aristotle


 "The trick is to keep an open mind, without it being so open that your
brain falls out."


"It seems that 'national security' is the root password to the Constitution.
As with any dishonest superuser, the best countermeasure is strong
encryption."
 -- Phil Karn


"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything."
 -- Mark Twain


If I've got a choice between "honest" and "deceitful," then unless there's
obvious reason for going with "deceitful," I'm gonna go with "honest."
 -- Carl Lydick, (SpeakerToMinerals), in a.c. <R.I.P.>


If I think I'm being attacked, I'll defend myself. And if I wasn't the
initial agressor, I don't honor any conventional rules, except for one:
If your opponent asks to stop the fight, the fight stops (the first time; 
if he later demonstrates that the cessation of hostilities was merely a 
ploy to give him breathing time, you don't make the same mistake again).
 -- Carl Lydick, in a.c. <R.I.P.>


I try very hard to say exactly what I mean. I'd appreciate it if you'd
bear that in mind and not try to "interpret" my posts to fit your own
preconceived notions if I'm posting in a serious thread. Remember: If you
throw a strawman into a heated debate, flames are likely to be the result.
 -- Carl Lydick (SpeakerToMinerals) <R.I.P.>


"Chivalry is not dead. It just smells funny."


If you need me, I'll be down in the lab, mixing metaphors.


"I have a life; I just don't have time for it."


"Never insult anyone unintentionally."
 -- Arthur H. Quirmbach


"Strange women lying in ponds distributing swords is no basis for a system
of government."
 -- M. Palin


A Catalyst speeds up a process.
An Analyst slows it down.


"If you're not making any mistakes, you're probably not building anything."
 -- Terry Sumner


"Give me control over a nation's currency and I care not who makes its
laws."
 -- Baron M.A. Rothschild (1744 - 1812)


Like most things, idiots are safe if you allow for their hazardous
properties.
 -- Simon White, rec.crafts.metalworking


Among a man's many good possessions, a good command of speech has no equal.


"Always tell the truth, or as much of it as seems safe. You will
eventually end up with people around you who you don't have to lie to."
 -- an Ancient Kung Foole Proverb from Phillip the Foole in s.s.b.b.


"One death is a tragedy; a million is a statistic."
 -- I. V. Stalin


Every Mission Statement ever written can be summarized in four words --
"All Babies Must Eat."


I like my women the way I like my coffee: in a bag, tied up and thrown on
the back of a donkey by Juan Valdez.


Bagpipes (n): an octopus wearing a kilt.


I never argue with fools. People might not know the difference.


Democracy is two wolves and a sheep voting on what to have
for dinner. Liberty is two wolves attempting to have a sheep
for dinner and finding a well-informed, well-armed sheep.


The limits of my language mean the limits of my world.
 -- Ludwig Wittgenstein


Bes den heb tavas a holhas e dir.
(A man who has lost his tongue has lost his land.)
 -- 18th century Cornish proverb


Most people say that as you get old you have to give up things.
I think that you get old *because* you give up things.


I just hate handcuffs. When I'm not in bed, that is.


"Governments, like diapers, should be changed often
and for the same reasons."


In order to make an apple pie from scratch, you must first
create the universe.
 -- Carl Sagan, Cosmos


"Jesus saves! Passes to Moses...he shoots...HE SCORES!!"
 -- Berek Halfaxe, in a.c.


"Anybody for a baby Cthulhu?"
 -- Badger, regarding pickled baby octopi (a.c.)


Live every second as if your ass was on fire.
 --ONE of Misha's buttons (a.c.)


"Of course, when discussing the shelf-life of Twinkies, the limiting
factor is the life of the shelf."
Paraphrase of MTR, in a.c.


It is a principle of the law that people are presumed to intend the
reasonably foreseeable consequences of their actions. Anyone who applies
this principle to the actions of government is a paranoid conspiracy
theorist.
 -- Nicholas Rosen


"We all agree on the necessity of compromise. We just can't agree on
when it's necessary to compromise."
 -- Larry Wall


"I couldn't get youse a habeas corpus writ, so I brung youse a saw!"


Home is where you keep your stuff while you're out getting other stuff.
 -- George Carlin


'There are some people who are so irritating that merely ignoring them
is somehow unsatisfactory; every fibre in your body screams out at you
to grab them by the throat with both hands, shake them until their teeth
rattle, and shout in their face "We're not fucking interested, understand?
And you're a waste of space!".
Sadly, my newsreader doesn't seem to implement this feature.'
 -- Tequila Rapide in alt.peeves


I Do Whatever My RICE CRISPIES Tell Me To.


To quote the old family motto, of the women in my family :)
"Vine, Vide, Visa"
We came, we saw, we shopped.
 -- Dreamweaver, in a.c.


Cacatne ursa en silva?
(Does a bear shit in the woods?)


Quantum est ille canis in fenestra?
(How much is that doggie in the window?)


I came THIS close to seeing Elvis... and then my shovel broke!


Although the hippopotamus has no sting,
the wise man would rather be sat upon by a bee.


True glory consists in doing what deserves to be written;
in writing what deserves to be read; and in so living as to
make the world happier and better for our living in it.
 -- Pliny the Elder (23 - 79 a.d.)


Do monomaniacal paranoid schizophrenic agnostic dyslexic
insomniacs lie awake at night wondering if they might
*be* the dog that's out to get them?


There are two secrets to sucess:
 1) Never tell everything you know.


Heisenberg filing system: It's all in one house, but if you
look for something, the results of all subsequent and some prior
searches are changed.


Keep honking. I'm reloading.


"If you really want to meet a lot of undersocialized men, log in with an
account name that is not merely recognizably female, but *recognizably
female only to geeks who read lots of science fiction novels*."
 -- http://www.omnigroup.com/People/cirocco/people.html


"You do realize you can be charged with being the dominant species
while under the influence of a consumer-driven market, don't you?"
 -- Terry Pratchett


Remember, any time, anywhere, our snipers can drop you.
Have a nice day.


"STOP! (blam! blam! blam!) Klingon Security! (blam! blam! blam!)
Halt or We'll Shoot!"


Everything I needed to know in life, I learned in
kindergarten. Like, always check for extraneous roots
when squaring to remove the radicals.
 -- John Palmer, in a.c.


One of the unkindest things about the Universe is that more often than not
the bullet doesn't have _your_ name on it; it likes to mass produce ones
with "to whom it may concern".


Honesty is paramount to me. Lying to me to avoid hurting me never works.
Being lied to always causes me more pain than the truth ever could.
 -- Sandy, in a.c.


At a formal dinner, Lady Astor scolded Churchill, "Winston, you're
drunk!" He gave her a walleyed glare and replied, "Yes, I am. And 
you, madam, are ugly - and in the morning, *I* shall be sober!"


The essence of engineering is applied laziness.


The border between the Real and the Unreal is not fixed, but just marks the
last place where rival gangs of shamans fought each other to a standstill.
 -- Robert Anton Wilson


In the province of the mind, what one believes to be true either is true or
becomes true.
 -- John Lilly


It doesn't matter that you stand your ground
if the ground you stand on doesn't matter.
 -- John Weatherly


--A HAIKU--
Christmas
A small boy takes his new sled out --
and waits for snow to fall.
 -- John Weatherly


I sang off key.
I was alone;
It sounded beautiful to me.
 -- John Weatherly


Times are bad. Children no longer obey their parents,
and everyone is writing a book.
 -- Cicero


I'm all in favor of keeping dangerous weapons out of
the hands of fools. Let's start with typewriters.
 -- Solomon Short


If nominated, I will not run. If elected, I will not serve.
If forced to serve, I'll run away really really fast.
 -- Lydia <maenad@aa.net>, erotica@cyberca.com


For the truth is that I already know as much about my fate as I need to
know... I can remain on shore, paralyzed with fear, or I can raise my
sails and dip and soar in the breeze.
 -- Richard Bode


Biting my truant pen,
Beating myself for spite,
'Fool,' said my Muse to me,
'Look in thy heart and write'.
 -- Sir Philip Sydney


Everyone that plays golf cheats.
Any golfer that claims not to cheat is a liar AND a cheat.


Welcome to the influence of the bunnies! With ky00t, we will
rule the world!


Pain and suffering are always inevitable for a large
intelligence and a deep heart. The really great men must, I
think, have great sadness on Earth.
 -- Fyodor Dostoyevsky


Intel: putting the "backwards" in "backwards compatible"!


If you shoot a Mime, do you need a silencer?


There's nought, no doubt, so much the spirit calms as rum and true
religion.
 -- Lord Byron


Man is not the creature of circumstances; circumstances are
the creatures of men.
 -- Benjamin Disraeli, The Earl Beaconsfield


> C:DOS
> C:DOS RUN
> RUN DOS RUN
> RUN RUN RUN

C:\DOS\RUN
C:\DOS\STOP
C:\USER\FREAK
C:\USER\CALL_BEN /SCREAM /RANT /RAVE


Writing is easy. You just sit down at the typewriter and open a vein.
 -- Red Smith


Writing is easy. All you do is stare at a blank sheet of paper until
drops of blood form on your forehead.
 -- Gene Fowler


There are two major products that come out of Berkeley: LSD
and UNIX. We don't believe this to be a coincidence.
 -- Jeremy S. Anderson


"Well, see, Joyce, there we were, trapped in the elevator. Now, I had
my tennis racquet and the goldfish; she was holding the Crisco. Surely
you can imagine how one thing naturally led to another!"


If you love something, set it free. If it comes back, it's yours;
if it doesn't, change the locks and forward the mail.


If you love something, kill it. If it comes back, it owns you forever.


The only thing necessary for the triumph of evil is for good
men to do nothing.
 -- Edmund Burke


         \   /
     :-P #==8(-:
         /   \
World  Peace  Through  Oral  Sex


A crusader's wife slipped from the garrison
And had an affair with a Saracen.
She was not oversexed,
Or jealous or vexed,
She just wanted to make a comparison.


*</ 0\__    M*O*N*S*T*E*R*S F*O*R J*E*S*U*S   __/0 \>*
*<|  vvv|                                    |vvv  |>*
*</  ^^^    Putting 'God' back in "Godzilla"  ^^^  \>*


To be really medieval, one should have no body.
To be really modern, one should have no soul.
To be really Greek, one should have no clothes.
 -- Oscar Wilde


We laugh at honor and are shocked to find traitors in our midst.
 -- C.S. Lewis


I have abandoned my search for truth and am now looking for a good fantasy.
 -- Ashleigh Brilliant


I publish a piece in order to kill it, so that I won't have to fool around
with it any longer.
 -- William Gass


"Just write the damn book." -- Tom Clancy
"Work, relax, don't think." -- Ray Bradbury
"Sorry, it's not for us."  -- *.*, Literary Agent
"Dead authors sell better than dead agents."  -- Pete Murphy


Look wise, say nothing, and grunt. Speech was given to conceal thought.
 -- Sir William Osler


The superfluous is very necessary.
 -- Voltaire


Happiness is good health and a bad memory.
 -- Ingrid Bergman


Happiness is bumping into Raquel Welch... very slowly.


I'm afraid you have more of a problem than I anticipated.
Your battery needs a new car.
 -- Mechanic to customer


Never apologize for showing feeling. When you do so you
apologize for truth.
 -- Benjamin Disraeli


A Monarchist Credo: Practice safe government - use kingdoms.
Anarchist reply: Abstinence is the only way to be 100% sure.


I can't stand this proliferation of paperwork. It's useless to
fight the forms. You've got to kill the people producing them.
 -- Vladimir Bakaidze, General Director of Ivanovo Machine Building Works.


Someone once told me I have a mind that's like a bad
neighborhood; I shouldn't go in there alone.
 -- Sharon Stone


You're aware the boy failed my grade school math class, I take
it? And not that many years later he's teaching college. Now I
ask you: Is that the sorriest indictment of the American
educational system you ever heard? [pauses to light cigarette.]
No aptitude at all for long division, but never mind. It's him
they ask to split the atom. How he talked his way into the Nobel
prize is beyond me. But then, I suppose it's like the man says,
It's not what you know...
 -- Karl Arbeiter, former teacher of Albert Einstein


Why do writers write? Because it isn't there.
 -- Thomas Berger


Yes, making mock of uniforms
That guard you while you sleep
Is cheaper than them uniforms,
And they're starvation cheap;
And hustlin' drunken soldiers
When they're going large a bit
Is five times better business
Than paradin' in full kit.
 -- R. Kipling, "Tommy"


Sir, I shall not allow myself on this occasion, I hope on no occasion,
to be betrayed into any loss of temper; but if provoked, as I trust I
never shall be, into crimination and recrimination, the honorable
member may perhaps find that, in that contest, there will be blows to
take as well as blows to give; ...and that his impunity may possibly
demand of him whatever powers of taunt and sarcasm he may posess. I
commend him to a prudent husbandry of his resources.
 -- Daniel Webster


The worst sin toward our fellow creatures is not to hate
them, but to be indifferent to them: that's the essence of
inhumanity.
 -- George Bernard Shaw


I am tired and sick of war. Its glory is all moonshine. It is
only those who have neither fired a shot, nor heard the
shrieks and groans of the wounded, who cry aloud for more
blood, more vengeance, more desolation. War is hell.
 -- General William Tecumseh Sherman


The fact that slaughter is a horrifying spectacle must make
us take war more seriously, but not provide an excuse for
gradually blunting our swords in the name of humanity.
Sooner or later someone will come along with a sharp sword
and hack off our arms.
 -- Carl von Clausewitz


Without friends no one would choose to live, though he had
all other goods.
 -- Aristotle


No want work. Want pound on keyboard.


That cat's fine, he's one with jazz, man.
 -- Janet Pack


Please don't shoot. I'm only the keyboard player.


Say what?  I should explain that I know _nothing_ about computers. When I
want to boot my computer in the morning I dance around it naked, chanting
and swinging a dead rooster over my head. If I have to do a soft reboot,
I cook the chicken first.
 -- Jim Luce, writing@psu.uvm.edu


"I haven't committed a crime. What I did was fail to comply with the
law."
 --  David Dinkins, New York City Mayor, answering accusations that he
failed to pay his taxes.


"They gave me a book of checks. They didn't ask for any deposits."
 -- Congressman Joe Early (D-Mass) at a press conference to answer questions
about the House Bank scandal.


"He didn't say that. He was reading what was given to him in a speech."
 -- Richard Darman, director of OMB, explaining why President Bush wasn't
following up on his campaign pledge that there would be no loss of
wetlands.


"It depends on your definition of asleep. They were not stretched out.
They had their eyes closed. They were seated at their desks with their
heads in a nodding position."
 -- John Hogan, Commonwealth Edison Supervisor of News Information, 
responding to a charge by a Nuclear Regulatory Commission inspector 
that two Dresden Nuclear Plant operators were sleeping on the job.


"I didn't accept it. I received it."
 -- Richard Allen, National Security Advisor to President Reagan, 
explaining the $1000 in cash and two watches he was given by two 
Japanese journalists after he helped arrange a private interview 
for them with First Lady Nancy Reagan.


"I was a pilot flying an airplane and it just so happened that where I was
flying made what I was doing spying."
 -- Francis Gary Powers, U-2 reconnaissance pilot held by the Soviets for 
    spying, in an interview after he was returned to the US.


"I was under medication when I made the decision not to burn the tapes."
 -- President Richard Nixon


"Smoking kills. If you're killed, you've lost a very important part of
your life."
 -- Brooke Shields, during an interview to become spokesperson
for a federal anti-smoking campaign.


"I've never had major knee surgery on any other part of my body."
 -- Winston Bennett, University of Kentucky basketball forward.


"I support efforts to limit the terms of members of Congress, especially
members of the House and members of the Senate." 
 -- Vice-President Dan Quayle.


"Outside of the killings, Washington has one of the lowest crime rates in
the country."
 -- Mayor Marion Barry, Washington, D.C.


"Sure, it's going to kill a lot of people, but they may be dying of
something else anyway."
 -- Othal Brand, member of a Texas pesticide review board, on chlordane.


Are you any relation to your brother Marv?"
 -- Leon Wood, New Jersey Nets guard, to Steve Albert, Nets TV commentator.


"The Holocaust was an obscene period in our nation's history... this
century's history.... We all lived in this century. I didn't live in this
century."
 -- Dan Quayle, then Indiana senator and Republican vice-presidential 
 candidate during a news conference in which he was asked his opinion 
 of the Holocaust.


"The streets are safe in Philadelphia. It's only the people who make them
unsafe."
 -- Frank Rizzo, ex-police chief and mayor of Philadelphia.


"I've always thought that underpopulated countries in Africa are vastly
underpolluted."
 -- Lawrence Summers, chief economist of the World Bank,
explaining why we should export toxic wastes to Third World countries.


"The crime bill passed by the Senate would reinstate the Federal death
penalty for certain violent crimes: assassinating the President;
hijackiing an airliner; and murdering a government poultry inspector."
 -- Knight Ridder News Service dispatch


"After finding no qualified candidates for the position of principal, the
school board is extremely pleased to announce the appointment of David
Steele to the post."
 -- Philip Streifer, Superintendent of Schools, Barrington, Rhode Island


"The doctors X-rayed my head and found nothing."
 -- Dizzy Dean explaining how he felt after being hit on the head by a 
 ball in the 1934 World Series.


Front sight, front sight, front sight!
 -- Kent Turnipseed


Placing my posterior on a properly positioned and plushly padded
prop, I partook of a portion of a picked potable, and pontificated:


He believes in civil liberties, pansexual play, and the two-party
system, except when a three-day weekend allows for more.
 -- Margaret Hodson, erotica@cyberca.com


When you have all your balls in the air, remember that two of them
are your own.
 -- Claire Pere


ERROR: Coffee not found, operator halted.


Pretend to spank me - I'm a pseudo-masochist!


Is a computer language with goto's totally Wirth-less?


Any IC protected by a fast acting fuse will protect the fuse by
blowing first.


Neutrinos have bad breadth.


Programmers get overlaid.


Jesus Saves. Johnson scores on the rebound.


In case of injury notify your superior immediately - He'll kiss
it and make it better!


Charlie was a chemist, but Charlie is no more.
What Charlie thought was H2O was H2SO4.


E. COLI eats shit.


People with narrow minds usually have broad tongues.


Heisenberg may have slept here.


Wernher von Braun settled for a V-2 when he coulda had a V-8.


Your program is sick! Shoot it and put it out of its memory.


Santa's elves are a bunch of subordinate Clauses.


Health is merely the slowest possible rate at which one can die.


I disagree with what you say, but will defend to the death your right
to tell such LIES!


Every interesting program has at least one variable, one branch,
and one loop... and at least one bug!


No problem is so formidable that you can't just walk away from it.


Chemistry professors never die, they just smell that way!


The problem with the gene pool is that there is no lifeguard.


Schizophrenia beats being alone.


To err is human, to forgive is against company policy.


Jesus Saves. Vishnu invests.


If you have nothing to do, don't do it here.


Please keep your hands off the secretary's reproducing equipment.


Old musicians never die, they just decompose.


Kiss me twice. I'm schizophrenic.


Atheism is a non-prophet organization.


Walt Disney is in suspended animation.


An elephant is a mouse built to Mil-Spec.


Alex Haley was adopted!


He who always plows a straight furrow is in a rut.


Insomnia isn't anything to lose sleep over.


Everyone is entitled to my opinion.


Help stamp out and abolish redundancy!


Call out the vice squad! Someone's mounting a disk drive!


While money can't buy happiness, it certainly lets you choose
your own form of misery.


The cost of feathers has risen.... Now even down is up!


COLE'S LAW - Thinly sliced cabbage.


Do married women make the best wives?


Morfy's law - Enythink thit ken go rong willl.


Is a Jamaican terminal a raster-farian?


Mount St. Helens should have used earth control.


Then there was the Formosan bartender named Taiwan-On.


Orcs really aren't so bad (if you use lots of catsup).


Nuke the Gay Christian Whales!


BASIC is a high level languish.


Buying prunes gives you a run for your money.


Drilling for oil is boring.


More people have died in Teddy Kennedy's car than
in nuclear power plants.


Found on a door in the MSU music building:
     This door is baroquen, please wiggle Handel.
   (If I wiggle Handel, will it wiggle Bach?)


Tennis players have fuzzy balls.


Physicists get hadrons.


Chemistry professors never die, they just fail to react.


Radioactive cats have 18 half-lives.


Next time, give 'the gift that keeps on giving': a female kitten.


Mobius strippers never show you their back side.


Klein bottle for rent - inquire within.


    ***
  *******
 *********
 ****** Confucious say: 'Is stuffy inside fortune cookie.'
  *******
    ***


Midas was into golden showers.


Computer programmers never die, they just get lost in the processing.


Neutrinos are into physicists.


On the wall of the women's restroom on the Enterprise:
'Where no man has gone before'


Celibacy is NOT hereditary.


On a clear disk you can seek forever.


Programming Department: Mistakes made while you wait.


Microbiology Lab: Staph Only!


Neuroses are red,
      Melancholia's blue.
     I'm schizophrenic,
     What are you?


Keep your mouth shut, and some people will think you stupid;
Open it, and you remove all doubt.


Save Soviet Jews! Collect them or trade them with your friends.


Everyone hates me because I'm paranoid.


Weekend, where ARE you?


Acid consumes 47 times its weight in excess reality.


LSD melts your mind, not in your hand.


Individualists unite!


Money is the root of all wealth.


Men have many faults,
Women only two:
Everything they say,
And everything they do!


Teamwork is vital!
  (It gives you someone to blame.)


Keep America Beautiful.... emigrate.


If God had been in favor of homosexuality,
     He never would have created Anita Bryant!


If all men were brothers,
     would you let one marry your sister?


Chemists really know their bismuth.


If everything is coming your way, you're in the wrong lane!


Documentation is the castor oil of programming ...
   Managers know it must be good because the programmers
   hate it so much.


The human mind ordinarily operates at only ten percent of its
   capacity - the rest is overhead for the operating system.


The bearing of a child takes nine months,
   no matter how many women are assigned to the project.


The generation of random numbers is too important
   to be left to chance.


If debugging is the process of removing bugs, then programming
   must be the process of putting them in.


Computers Unite!  You have nothing to lose but your operators.


Eschew Obfuscation!


Recursive, adj.; see Recursive


Do it today. Tomorrow it will be illegal.


Postmen never die, they just lose their zip.


Old frogs never die, but they do croak!


COBOL programs are an exercise in Artificial Inelegance.


Every time I lose weight, it finds me again!


An idle mind is worth two in the bush.


A hangover is the wrath of grapes.


An atheist is a man with no invisible means of support.


Whom computers would destroy, they must first drive insane.


It's better to copulate than never!


A zygote is a gamete's way of producing more gametes.


God is omnipotent, omniscient, and omnibenevolent -
     it says so right here on the label.


Anyone who cannot cope with mathematics is not fully human.


Taxes are not levied for the benefit of the taxed.


Clones are people two.


Got Mole problems?        23
   Call Avogadro at  6.02 X 10


Neil Armstrong tripped.


God did not create the world in seven days.
    He partied for six and then pulled an all-nighter.


When taxes are due, Americans tend to feel quite bled-white and blue.


To make tax forms true they should read 'Income Owed Us' and
     'Incommode You'.


Whatever you say about pornography, sex is here to stray.


Heard on Noahs' ark:  Sailing is fun, but scrubbing the decks is aardvark.


Why do so many foods come packaged in plastic? It's quite uncanny.


America has the best politicians money can buy!


Going the speed of light is bad for your age.


White dwarf seeks red giant for binary relationship.


Polymer physicists are into chains.


Vitamin C deficiency is apauling.


Darth Vader sleeps with a Teddywookie.


On all lasergrams: Don't forget the Zap code.


There's no future in time travel.


Cloning is the sincerest form of flattery.


Test-tube babies shouldn't throw stones.


Jealousy is all the fun you think they have.


Sentient plasmoids are a gas.


Xerox never comes up with anything original.


Never hit a man with glasses; hit him with your fist.


Never leave anything to chance; make sure all your crimes are premeditated.


If rabbits feet are so lucky, what happened to the rabbit?


Small programs are for small minds.


I BM. You BM. We all BM for IBM!


Satyrs have more faun.


Lawyers do it in their briefs.


Two can live as cheaply as one, for half as long.


Fauns are never Satyr-sfied!


If your feet smell and your nose runs - you're built upside down.


Mrs. Gandhi is in a sari state.


Part-time musicians are semiconductors.


It is impossible to make anything foolproof; fools are too ingenious.


In which level of metalanguage are you now speaking?


To iterate is human; to recurse, divine.


The problem with any unwritten law is that you don't know where to go to
erase it.


Let him who is stoned cast the first sin.


Children should be obscene and not heard.


Love thy neighbor, but make sure her husband is away first!


He who hesitates is constipated.


Money is the root of all evil. Man needs roots.


He who is flogged by fate and laughs the louder is a masochist.


If all the girls at Vassar were laid end to end, I wouldn't be suprised!


How many priests are needed for a Boston Mass?


Topologists are just plane folks.
   Pilots are just plane folks.
      Carpenters are just plane folks.
  Midwest farmers are just plain folks.
     Musicians are just playin' folks.
        Whodunit readers are just Spillaine folks.
     Some Londoners are just P. Lane folks.


Let us remember that ours is a nation of lawyers and order.


People who live in stone houses shouldn't throw glasses.


Zen Druids practice Transcendental Vegetation.


Be alert. America needs more lerts.


Joseph Stalin's grave is a Communist Plot.


Winning isn't everything, but then losing is nothing.


Engineers do it precisely. Technicians do it a lot.


All I ask for is an opportunity to prove that
     money doesn't buy happiness.


Poverty is the root of all evil.


If I want your opinion, I'll beat it out of you!


Archaeologists take sedimental journeys.


Remember, the paper is always strongest at the perforations.


A closed mouth gathers no foot.


After all is said and done, usually more is said than done.


There are two kinds of people in this world:
     Those that want to BE something,
     and those that want to DO something.
     (There is less competition in the second category.)


Drop the vase and it will become a Ming of the past.


Vice Versa - poems about brothels?


Gargling twice daily is a good way to see if your neck leaks.


Rubbing hair restorer into your scalp is a good way
     to insure hairy fingers.


Preventing baldness is simple. Just knot your hair from the inside.


Old bakers never die, they just quit making dough.


Old doughnut makers never die,
     they just get tired of the hole business.


Remember: if you're not part of the solution,
   you're part of the precipitate!


Geometer turned general - a sphereless leader.


Old bakers never die, you just can't get a rise out of them.


Sado-necro-bestiality is beating a dead horse.


Old truck drivers never die, they just get a new Peterbuilt.


Old accountants never die, they just lose their balance.


A linguist thought it a farce
That memory space was so sparse.
One day they increased it.
Said he as he seized it:
'At last! Enough core for the parse'.


Indecision is the basis of flexibility.


We are not punished for our sins, but by them.


Middle Age:
   Halfway between adolescence and obsolescence!


Eat Shit!
     10 Billion flies can't be wrong.


Fighting for peace is like screwing for virginity.


A zygote is a gamete's method of producing more gametes.
     This may be the purpose of the universe.


If God had intended man to have computers,
    he would have given him 16 fingers.


If we can't fix it - it's BROKEN!


Engineers never die - they just lose their tolerance.


She offered her honor,
He honored her offer.
And all through the night,
It was honor and offer.


To do is to be. -- Nietzsche
To be is to do. -- Kant
Do be do be do. -- Sinatra


Roses are red;
Violets are blue.
I'm schizophrenic,
And so am I.


You can never get rid of a bad temper by losing it.


Would the last person to leave Michigan please turn out the lights?


Did Mt. St. Helens make Seattle Wash.?


298,000 kps: It's not just a good idea -- It's the law.


The only way to get rid of temptation is to yield to it.


The only thing worse than being talked about is not being talked about.


Marriage is one of the chief causes of divorce.


Egypt's actions are often Suez-cidal.


Nice computers don't go down.


To be born rich is an accident; to die rich is a miracle.


Nothing makes a politician forget campaign promises faster
  than being elected.


Behind every successful man you'll find a woman with nothing to wear.


The perfect secretary is one who types fast and runs slow.


Lt. Uhura says:'Subspace Communications-
     It's the next best thing to beaming there!'


Syntactic sugar causes cancer of the semi-colons.


Every program is part of some other program and rarely fits.


It is easier to write an incorrect program than to understand a correct one.


Everything should be built top-down, except the first time.


Every program has (at least) two purposes: the one for which
  it was written and another for which it wasn't.


Once you understand how to write a program, get someone else to do it.


Structured Programming supports the law of the excluded muddle.


There are two ways to write error-free programs; only the third one works.


There are two ways to write error-free programs; unfortunately, no one
knows either one of them.


The best book on programming for the layman is 'Alice in Wonderland';
but that's because it's the best book on anything for the layman.


If your computer speaks English it was probably made in Japan.


A year spent in Artificial Intelligence is enough to make
one believe in God.


Prolonged contact with computers turns mathematicians into
clerks and vice versa.


In computing, turning the obvious into the useful is a living
definition of the word 'frustration'.


The computer is the ultimate polluter: its feces are indistinguishable
from the food it produces.


The debate rages on: Is PL/I Bachtrian or Dromedary?


Editing is a rewording activity.


Why did the Roman Empire collapse? What's Latin for 'office automation'?


In seeking the unattainable, simplicity only gets in the way.


Epigrams are macros, since they are executed at read time.


COBOL programmers understand why women hate periods.


Economics is called the dismal science, but that's just
because most economists are dismal scientists.


Streakers repent! Your end is in sight.


Your karma just ran over my dogma.


Get off your ASCII.


My computer puts out.


Bugs are Sons of Glitches!


Your ZIP file is open.


My components are indiscreet.


Jesus saves. Immanuel Kant.


Archimedes had no principles!


Old soldiers never die - young ones do.


Pray for the success of atheism.


Sacred cows make the tastiest hamburgers.


Spare the rod and spoil the drag race.


Philadelphia isn't dull - it just seems so because
  it is next to exciting Camden, NJ.


Eliminate government waste no matter how much it costs.


The reason the government thinks you're just a number
  is because it's just a machine.


Chastity is its own punishment.


For those of you who think life is a joke...
  just think of the punchline.


Give me librium or give me meth.


Mankind has an incestuous relationship with Mother Earth.


Save our virgin forests - buy a tree a chastity belt.


Hawaii is as American as apple poi.


Keep grandmothers off the streets - legalize bingo.


These days govt. is a four letter word.


Any government that's strong enough to give the people
everything they want is a government that's strong
enough to take it all away.


Graffiti has changed deface of the nation.


Boy Hippie: a guy who looks like a Jill and smells like a john.


Oedipus come home, all is forgiven.
Mother


Computers can never replace human stupidity.


Christ died for our sins, so let's not disappoint him.


Immanuel Kant but Kubla Khan.


Lives there a man with soul so dead
Who never to himself hath said,
'Screw this shit, I'm going to bed!'


The cost of liberty is less than the price of oppression.


Life is like a diaper - short and loaded.


  x        n
Se   = f(u)


Daisies of the world unite! You have nothing to lose
but your chains.


Paranoia is nothing but heightened awareness.


All the world's a stage and the people on it are poorly rehearsed.


A bird in the hand can be messy.


Support striking Air Traffic Controllers!
And don't forget the ugly ones, either.


Reagan can't act, either.


Nostalgia isn't what it used to be.


Serfs up - Spartacus.


Clark Kent is a transvestite.


The only difference between an unclear war
  and a nuclear war is the way you use the UN.


An American's a person who isn't afraid to criticize the President - but
is always polite to traffic cops.


War is good business - invest your sons.


Give - help send a girl to Boy's Town.


Stamp out philately.


Whistler's mother is off her rocker.


The person who is all wrapped up in himself is overdressed.


Pain is just God's way of hurting you.


Only cream and bastards rise to the top.


You can never tell which way the train went by looking at
the tracks.


The attention span of a computer is only as long as its
electrical cord.


A meeting is an event at which the minutes are kept
and the hours are lost.


It is better to have loved a short woman than never to have
loved a tall.


Go Hawaiian: Give your gal a lei.


Abolish first marriages!


Anal erotics are behind us all the way.


Hire the morally handicapped.


The way to a man's heart is through the left ventricle.


11-PDP eht edisni deppart ma I !pleH


A guy has to get fresh once in a while so the girl doesn't lose her
confidence.


A wise man can see more from a mountain top than a fool can from the
bottom of a well.


An idea is not responsible for the people who believe in it.


As scarce as truth is, the supply has always been in excess of demand.


Beauty seldom recommends one woman to another.


Bedfellows make strange politicians.


Between two evils, I always pick the one I never tried before.
Mae West


Beware of all enterprises that require new clothes.
 -- H.D. Thoreau


By failing to prepare, you are preparing to fail.


Conversation enriches the understanding, but solitude is the school of
genius.


Creditors have much better memories than debtors.


Do not clog intellect's sluices with knowledge of questionable uses.


Don't worry if you're a kleptomaniac, you can always take something for it.


God gives us relatives; thank God we can chose our friends.


He was so narrow-minded he could see through a keyhole with two eyes.


Here comes the orator, with his flood of words and his drop of reason.


I like work, it fascinates me; I can sit and look at it for hours.


Ideas don't stay in some minds very long because they don't like
solitary confinement.


If you always postpone pleasure you will never have it. Quit work and
play for once.


If you make people think they're thinking, they'll love you; but if you
really make them think they'll hate you.


Integrity is praised, and starves.


It is better to wear out than to rust.


It is impossible to enjoy idling thoroughly unless one has plenty of
work to do.


Lonely men seek companionship. Lonely women sit at home and wait.
They never meet.


Love and scandal are the best sweeteners of tea.


Marriage is the only adventure open to the cowardly.
 -- Voltaire


Matrimony is the root of all evil.


Might as well be frank, monsieur. It would take a miracle to get you out
of Casablanca.


My interest is in the future because I am going to spend the rest of my
life there.


Never call a man a fool; borrow from him.


Never say you know a man until you have divided an inheritance with
him.


No doubt Jack the Ripper excused himself on the grounds that it was
human nature.


Now and then an innocent man is sent to the legislature.


Of all forms of caution, caution in love is the most fatal.


Often statistics are used as a drunken man uses lampposts - for support
rather than illumination.


Old men are fond of giving good advice to console themselves for their
inability to give bad examples.


Ours is a society where people don't know what they want and are willing
to go through hell to get it.


People who have never tried it have no idea how pleasant being nasty can be!


Publishing a volume of verse is like dropping a rose petal down the
Grand Canyon and waiting for the echo.


Reputation: what others are not thinking about you.


She's learned to say things with her eyes that others waste time putting
into words.


Some men are discovered; others are found out.


Some rise by sin and some by virtue fall.


The attacker must vanquish; the defender need only survive.


The average woman would rather have beauty than brains because the
average man can see better than he can think.


The best prophet of the future is the past.


The brave man is known only in war; the wise man in anger; the friend in
time of need.


The purpose of computing is insight, not numbers.


The value of knowledge lies not in its accumulation, but in its
utilization.


There are more old drunkards than old doctors.


There is many a good man to be found under a shabby hat.


To iterate is human, to recurse is divine.


To laugh at men of sense is the privilege of fools.


To profit from good advice requires more wisdom than to give it.


What orators lack in depth they make up in length.


What passes for woman's intuition is often nothing more than man's
transparency.


What this country needs is a dime that will buy a good five-cent bagel.


When God endowed human beings with brains, He did not intend to
guarantee them.


Why did the Lord give us so much quickness of movement unless it was to
avoid responsibility?


Words must be weighed, not counted.


Your mind understands what you have been taught; your heart, what is
true.


eHpl ! I ma tarppde esndi eht DP-P11!
